Oh at first I think you were just innocently under-educated, I didn't realize it was your annoying personality. Thanks for clearing that up!
You're the Donald Trump of spreading Falsehoods.  It's noteworthy that you started flinging poop when your myth got busted. It's always revealing who answers civil questions with personal attacks, and it shows much about your character.

As someone who has benefitted from a lot of NSF awards, it's a bit sad that someone with your vile personality is a recipient, but that's how it goes.  Sometimes people with pedantic and reprehensible personalities like you get money.  It's no secret why you aren't employable or fit for any situation that involves human interaction.  As for your dishonest wish to have a good day, if you weren't a thorough liar you'd actually do something to make sure others have a good day instead of doing your utmost to make the world a worse place. 
Your lies about government spending got called out and now youre launching more lies and instigating personal attacks.  You're the Donald Trump and Fox News and Donald Sterling of this sub.  [I'd tell you to read this and inform yourself](http://www.google.ca/search?q=canadian+government+advetising+budget) but we both know the truth is of no concern to you, as spreading neo-Conservative lies is your main interest.
I weep at the thought of how close we came to having Klepper as the new host. He would have been great.
I do too, but in moderation.  Hopefully he has other gears.
On reddit yes. I'm not digging him, and the real world/public are split.
I wouldn't put it that way, but I'm missing the classic Daily Show.  Trevor Noah doesn't work for me, and "all-skits, all-the-time" doesn't work for me either. 

The skit:news parody ratio so far is much higher than before.
Before we start mass fellatio let me express an alternate view.  The most legendary field pieces are when the subjects create the humor with their genuine but hilarious answers.  Having the civilians serve as coached amateur actor props is not my idea of legendary, especially given the hundreds of better pieces over the years.
The Chinese interpreter Allstate piece was fairly lame, Noah's impersonation was cringe.
Crazy huge jump cut during the Christie interview.  Moment of zen isn't always a gaffe, sometimes it's an oddity, a poignant bit, a noteworthy happening from the day that didn't merit a full story, a memorial tribute, and so on.  I think most DVR softwares have an extra minute option, might check into that
I concur with almost all of this.  As much as I don't like Trevor Noah's style, I can admit this interview wasn't completely bad, with the exception of when Noah took a break to applaud Christie, and when he unnecessarily stood up to flash his butt. Prepare yourself for mass hive mind downvotes and attack PM's though, because Reddit appears to be a Trevpr Noah fan club (this week)

Reddit votes have long since lost their original intent, they seem to just get used as hate buttons.  I'm pretty underwhelmed with the Trevor Noah Daily Show, but worst case is it will free up some time on my TV watching schedule if it doesn't get better.

Amy Schumer is great, but she had no business hosting this show.  Nor did Chris Rock or several of the other prospects.  

Hearing who they were offering it to, and who they overlooked, it just confirms to me that Comedy Central executives are idiots.
To me the cringe was with Trevor Noah.There have been so many good ones, I mean Jason Jones and Sam Bee each had 20+ that were better than this one.  And many with John Oliver, and both Steve's.  Then go way back to the early years when none of the subjects would ever know the correspondents.  So much gold.  Those were *actually* legendary.  This was basically Roy and Jordan doing a skit in front of people.
Good pickup.  I knew it had to be some kind of clue.  But why not 8869 then?
You calling me a troll makes you the inveterate troll.  And a nuisance.
You're the Jenny McCarthy of numbers.  During the similar time frame Chretien's government spent $270 million to Harper's $750 million.  And even if we ignore the scale of waste, the content of Harper's advetising has been predominantly partisan glory-holing and bullshit.  Useful things like tax cuts that didnt happen, job programs that didnt happen, painfully False drug fear mongering, balanced budget bragging that wasn't True.
Disney lawyers are warming up the Assholemobile, should be on scene shortly
It's not budget reasons.  Talk show guests cost almost nothing, even if they are top A listers. The actual reason is a combination of lazy booking with th fact that it's actually hard work to book guests, let alone multiple guests, let alone 4 days a week.  

Early on, the Nightly Show conceded this, and chopped the panel from 4 to 3.  Then they started using staff as seat fillers when they were short a guest.  Then they just decided what the hell, let's use staff members whenever we feel like it.  And whoever produces the show (Albanese) apparently has set any quality standards for how staff should prepare or act when they are seat filling.
I see this incorrect comment was gilded.  Too bad, because in fact Larry Wilmore is a big fan and promoter of science and space science in particular.  His earnest interest has helped TNS access people like Buzz Aldrin, and it wouldn't surprise me if he played a hand in bringing in Bill Nye.  
CBS isn't mind controlling Stephen Colbert.  Where do people come up with this stuff?I'm delighted about the advanced pictures and basic discoveries being made about Mars.  

But I just can't jump on the manned colony by 2030 bandwagon.  

Civilians don't seem to understand the actual challenge of manned space flight, even a manned day trip to the moon today would vastly outstrip NASA's budget.  

We've turned the space program into an austerity program decades ago.  The shuttles are museum relics, and we lack the ability to even send packages to ISS, which is basically hanging around the earth's doorway.  

The capitalist's wet dream of the free market funding space exploration has amounted to the grand sum total of Branson's repeatedly delayed flights, which will be called "space" flights only by technicality and will really just be like high altitude plane rides.  

Our other big hope is the Paypal guy who is struggling to produce car volumes much smaller than 1% of his competitors and seems focused on things like BTTF gull wing doors and snake-y power charging cords, while being yet unable to even create a reliable rocket.

There's no way we're having manned Mars missions coming out of this base environment. We'll need a way different approach and way different funding or else it's all just happy talk.
Exactly.  Trevor Noah appeared to know only of Christie^2015 and none of his history or issues.  Well I think it was Jon Stewart that really wanted that.  
It's the Polar Express publicity tour
Wash not watch
Yes this redeemed the premise quite a bit
Yes, S&amp;P is a funny thing.  You can't show someone giving the finger, but you can show a mini handshake.  You can say finger as a noun but not as a vern.  You can use pussy for a cat or box for cardboard, but not for other meanings.  Some shows have done great bits about this topic.
Good point.  But I think the reason people are hating these CEO placements is that most stars promoting their product are interesting and amusing, so we get the trade off of entertainment received in exchange for watching the ad. But the CEO's have been duds, offering little in the way of entertainment but getting a full shot of advertising.
You know, when we started our computers, um, back in the eighties, it was huge! In a business, they were machines, you know. We started in garages. I hope everybody buys Microsoft, continues, continues the business, we can always use it and we're so grateful that we have accomplished.
When this version of the dot com crash happens, we'll look back and ask why we valued things like a simplistic AOL messenger app at more than the  GDP of major countries.
Can't disagree.  Here's another great [Ed Sheeran cover of Atlantic City](http://m.youtube.com/watch?v=tXGqhViirVE)I don't get the fascination with that guy, so we'll see if Colbert can make it interesting.
Evan Speigel totally missed Colbert's Ashley Madison dig (charge people later to actually delete their snaps)
If Carrell would have done a surprise walk-on during that?
I think Bill Withers would be interesting in a long form interview, has he ever done anything like Howard Stern maybe?I'm thinking along the same lines.  Letterman had a big 10 minute block of commercials before the final act, and you could usually discard the musical close out.  

Unfortunately many of the Cobert Late Show musical acts have been standouts so far and not ripe for cutting.
Neither will [Maziar Bahari](http://www.imdb.com/title/tt2752688/)That would seem to be our only option.I've said that exact sentence on many occasions. Jon Stewart's rapid rips reeled off his tongue, without even a glance at the prompter, and that's because the words - whether he wrote them or not - were his voice.  

Trevor Noah, even on his own stand ups, gives the impression he is carefully reading though either physical or mental cue cards to say words he's supposed to say, and lead up to a punch line that he's memorized.  It's all so deliberate and unnatural.
Yes, it's something that doesn't even need a study, it's just obvious.  And it's not exactly the same as women getting the vote, or the ability to work outside the home. It's the ability to gang message a guy whose profile picture shows his abs.  How world-changing.

Except for the fallacy that if it's been in progress for years, what's today's urgency, and why wasn't the Harper regime putting some of its $750 million advertising towards updating us on the features and benefits of it, instead of buying commercials the were mostly just lies or party propaganda?
Yes, but that's only for the vast majority of regular people.  If you're a politician, or a political patronage appointee, a billionaire, or a CPC insider, this deal could easily improve your personal situation.It's part of the CPC's new "truth in campaigning" strategy. They're trying to show how through their campaign choices how unreachable, uncaring, unaccountable and uncommunicative they will be if re-elected.  TIL, Conservative candidate Robert Strickland turns into a mean asshole when someone fact checks his bullshit.
He has a "magical" question where he tries to entrap dissenters into saying they aren't good Canadians.

Does this guy even know what "magical" means?  Guy is a born CPC character, that's for sure.

From Harper's speeches and history, can we assume the terrorist who will be stripped of citizenship is Donald Sutherland?
Now where would your kid have learned his murderous ideas?
One problem is figuring out which "terrorists" are the mall bombers and which are people whose terror act was attending a rally to protect a freshwater lake from becoming a foreign corporation's chemical toilet.  

And associated with that problem is that the guys asking us to trust their ability to make that call can't even be trusted to manage small issues with any level of competence, ethics, or common sense. 
(Un)Fair Election Act, C-24, C-51, TPP, "Tax lock" laws, killing the census, shutting down long term science, education, culture and social programs.... it's like the CPC is setting up a gauntlet of time bombs meant to make Canada shitty for years even after the CPC has been ousted.
Just to be clear, you're saying the TPP provisions won't go into effect until the citizens of all participating countries have voted to adopt it? Why am I not believing that?
If you'll grant me the right to review and overrule the conservative government's decisions on who they consider to be a terrorist then I'm listening.  But as it stands, they can't tell the truth about much so who knows who they'd deem to be a terrorist.  

And your generalizations about whether or not terrorists attend rallies appear to be fantasy based not fact based.
I kind of suspected that other poster was misleading us, thanks for confirming.
Oh. If it's an "existing agreement that we're expanding into" (whatever that means) then obviously waiting a few weeks to see if we actually want to "expand into" it shouldn't be a problem then, right?
I actually find it entirely non-unbelievable that a Conservative party candidate is a prick.  Given their current policies and practices, you'd kind of have to be one just to be a supporter.  Being a candidate surely requires an even larger commitment.
Seems to have nudged up from the initial reactions which seemed to be around equal.  1) No,I was accusative AFTER you instigated.  That makes you the troll.  A victim who pummels their mugger isn't the offender.  And just to be clear, you're the mugger.

2) Here it's YSF whose awards paid for my books through undergraduate.  
Yes that's about as bad as the panel has ever been.  I like to watch the first part of the news parody.  Sometimes the middle block is a decent skit or more news parody.  Sometimes it's a junk skit.  So for me block A is must watch, then B is hit or miss and C is usually a miss.

Sure, even though that's not True and doesn't make sense, whats the problem with that "signature" being done in November when Harper has his super majority. Or ideally, after Canadians hear what secret compromises we'll be subjected to, and how Mr Harper plans to counteract the associated job and industry losses.Stephen Colbert and Jon Stewart would counter the notion that a host can't be funny.Who says a "signature needs to happen by October 15"?  Or else what happens?  Comet strikes the earth?Actually we *COULD* know what's happening, if secretive government forces weren't so hell bent on keeping it secret.  

Legal deals don't "often have a deadline in order to speed things up".   

And listen to how silly you're talking.  If our participation is so critical on Oct 15, then it won't magically become irrelevant on Oct 16. 

Corporations that want to fleece the public will happily do so on Oct 16th.  Or 17th.  

But hey, if the big imaginary emergency you're talking about is True, then why did Harpers people not share the key details long ago, back when Parliament WAS in session?  Or why doesn't Harper go to the nation and use some of that advertising money tell the country about this mega-life-threatening emergency?  Why doesn't he go to the puppet GG and get a quick Parliamentary session to approve this awesome deal and the get back to the second half of the mega-sized election campaign that his puppet GG gave him?
Where you finding that?  My searching shows no instances, and that he's still signing with a swastika as always.  There is [this however.](http://famous-celebrity-autographs.com/images/Charles-Manson-Autograph.gif)The phrase "needs to happen by Oct 15" is the imaginary part of this.

What about the fact that Parliamentary approval hasn't happened yet, and no valid "signature" can or should happen without that?
That's fictional, but even if it were True then I guess the Harper government blew it by procrastinating and not getting the proper reviews and Parliamentary approvals in place in time for the arbitrary deadline.  I guess some other country will get the chance to take our place and give up their resources and self-determination.  

I guess we missed this one, and we'll have to just go begging to have our jobs and industries get screwed at a later date.  So "the signature doesn't matter", according to you.  So then we're agreed.  Don't sign it.  

Publish the details for Canadians to review and help them decide.  When Harper gets his landslide, he can claim he had a mandate to ram it home.  

But if he keeps the details secret, then any such claim would be cynical and dishonest.
Your legal knowledge appears to be lacking.  An unexecuted house deal isn't "legally binding", nor is a unexecuted insurance settlement.  There are laws governing exclusion periods, but that has no relevance here, and it sounds like you don't know about that subject anyway so I won't muddy the water.  

Think about it.  If some other party is so arbitrary and capricious that they will refuse to deal with us if we don't roll over instantly on a secret deal, how is it smart to rush into a deal with such an incompatible and untrustworthy partner?  Avoiding such an unreasonable partner is dodging a bullet.

And if - again according to you - our participation is so small and meaningless - then let's just skip it and look for agreements where we will matter.
So this you've contradicted a ton of your earlier statements about how critical (oops, not critical) we are, and how urgent (oops, not that urgent) this is, and how Parliament will (oops, won't) get a chance to thoroughly review.  

This kind of double talk is why nobody trusts your party and your leader.
That answer was in reference to how much $ he'd want to sanitize Colbert's compromising content, not an acknowledgement of the Ashley Madison False delete transaction business model reference.
The irony of the announcer commenting on how bored spectators are at a boring event, and how televising their boredom is the most interesting highlight of the entire 3+ hour event.
So if you actually knew that a unexecuted agreement isn't binding, why'd you try bullshitting is that it was?  Why'd you spout the BS about a house deal or insurance settlement having deadlines even before they are realized?  Did you know but were delibrately passing off bullshit, or did you not know until I told you, and now you're bullshitting about that? 

And as for playing wannabe with Malaysia and Singapore, I prefer to make agreements based on sense, not country pant size envy.  

Corporations from other countries will still want our wheat and potash and water and gold and uranium and oil.  Signing or not signing won't change that.  Fear mongering to sell a secret deal is not very convincing.

You can't have it both ways, claiming that this is such a big deal we must do it while simultaneously claiming the risks are no big deal because we're (according to you) such a penny ante participant.
You said the timing was critical, and that was your justification for avoiding Parliamentry review and approval. You have yet to explain how Harper failed to diligently review this deal during the years it was being worked, and how that incompetence and/or misconduct have suddenly created a fake or real emergency.
You know what kind of prison time can be given to someone who sells or buys illegal weapons?  Kind of a handy limiting factor there.
And guns.The frequency of senseless gun attacks is now faster then decay of people ceasing to care.  The NRA will continue to be the main domestic terror operator.
Speaking of being delusional, explain why you'd want to make tragedies like this more frequent and easier to orchestrate?Here we go.  Let's you and I make a deal.  I'll let you know later what the terms and consequences to you will be. There might be some good things for you, but there could also be some fairly significant risks and costs. Do you accept?
By your logic we should just sell grenades at Walmart and anti-aircraft missiles at the airport.

Why make mass murder any less convenient, amiright?
I guess.  I mean he's only had all year to get ready.
I think people have a warped impression of who runs the show.  Hint: it's not Trevor Noah.  


Why do you need to know the terms of our deal before signing?  And yet Canadians don't need to know anything before the arbitrary Oct 15 "deadline"?  

And you've yet to explain away Haprer's misconduct in grievously creating an "emergency" by not sharing details and getting Parliament assent earlier.
He's known since February, and he turned in exactly zero field pieces after that, so your contention that he was "working on the old show" is False.  He made one or two cringey appearances, and that's it.  

As for your "only had a month" contention, the real number is 7 months.
Did you not read [my earlier post?](http://www.reddit.com/r/ScreamQueensTV/comments/3mw11i/episode_discussion_s01e03_chainsaw/cvkrmn4)
Hats are couture, but Grace seems to consistently wear the same kind of hat, I think you'd call it a Tam.  I'm guessing there's some significance to be revealed later, just like Chanel #3's earmuffs.
And carrots are orange, which is equally relevant.  

Would have been interesting to hear about the reasons for several guest cancellations that have already happened
If only you knew what the word meant and weren't misusing it.
Better question, what do you think happens if Harper uncharastically says "I didn't get my act together in time, so this will have to wait until the election - whose date and time I've had the sole knowledge and control over - has passed."
I've long since hated Shirin, with her victimhood mentality, her selfishness, and her inappropriate grudge-holding.  

I will however give her credit for apparently gaining some self awareness by the time tribal council was concluding when she admitted she had a large part in creating her circumstances.  
Before Abi *explicitly* told her, but it was more then obvious long before that.
Ok then, tell us why we shouldn't (or should) sell grenades at Walmart?Actually, until he acted, there was lots of speculation whether he'd bend the election date in a similar manner to how his regime has bent so many other significant issues.  

You've been avoiding my earlier questions.  I guess any things possible. But the chance of that being in his contract would be somewhere between zero percent and one millionth of one percent.  Show runners don't hand off irrelevant responsibilities to unqualified people, especially ones with no leverage.
Yup, and Stewart's instincts have proven to run the spectrum from great to terrible. 
Cool, sounds like you are offering Shadephoenix a good job!  Post back later and tell us now it goes.
They should tie it to the rate of rent increases, insurance premiums, bank fees, utility bills, or packaged foods. The entire day's wage hike wouldn't afford a single pack of skittles.If 20 cents is the difference between him keeping or losing his car, then yes.
Yeah, and it comes with fun side benefits like lethal waste that lasts for thousands of years, super high risk operations, and WMD implications.  Who doesn't love that? 
The answer can be found in the earlier question you keep avoiding: Hoe did Harper drop the ball on publishing the deal and gaining Parliamentary approval in time for the abitrary but election-buzzer-beating emergency deadline?
Can someone provide factual (eg not speculation) on how many of the large scale challenge footage is shot? 

Last night was a good example of many where we have a direct closeup view of someone falling or doing something, but then we also have wide shots that show there is no camera in that position.  

I know the challenge preview shots (where Jeff is explaining the rules) often use obvious stand-in's.  But how were some of yesterday's shots achieved without re-enactments?
Answer the earlier questions you keep avoiding: How did Harper drop the ball on publishing the deal and gaining Parliamentary approval in time for the abitrary but election-buzzer-beating emergency deadline?
I'm not sure the death of their child will change their minds.
Yes, if we ignore the fact it has been an undeniably superior strategy in other places like England and Australia.  Wouldn't want reality to intrude on someone's misinterpreted amendment rights though.
Yes, because responsible governance is about how well you can ad lib a speech.  Bring back Arnold the actor, he could have really smoothly delivered the lines whilst bankrupting the state.I'll accept your proposal that we control guns and make forks unregulated.  I'm prepared to live with the risk that there's a daily mass fork attack if it means we have no more school shootings.  Seems like that would be a good trade off.

Except it's an artificially contrived figure that no longer reflects reality for the vast majority of suffering civilians, especially those for whom hourly wages and things like minimum wages are relevant.Serious question: if the results are overwhelmingly positive, what difference besides obfuscation, does it make?  And secondly, how does this relate to the fact that the original contention - that control can't possibly work - has been thoroughly and utterly disproven?

But you're the one who said he did and would get Parliamentary approval?!?!  You continue to contradict yourself in almost every statement.  And if Harper didnt drop the ball, then what's the sudden emergency to blindly agree to a deal sight unseen?   Oh wait, he did drop the ball, you're just fucking with us right?  

Can you at least use some kind of formatting to show us which parts of your sentences are lies and which are True?  Would make it so much easier.
 If and when there's daily hardware store IED mass murders in schools, we can chat about that and explore sensible measures to reduce it.  Unless you already know in advance that you'd also be a cheerleader for hardware store IED murders when that happily-imaginary-and-far-fetched era arrives.  In the meantime, can we draw your focus back on topic?  Why do you suppose criminals have no problem acquiring guns here?  Think hard. In the meantime, I'll ignore your ridiculous Fox News host interpretation of "destroying the constitution".  Wasn't it already destroyed when got rid of the right to own slaves?  Or impose speed limits?

No, "the question is whether Nuclear provides a better and more practical solution for getting away from coal/oil/gas based power the fastest" this isn't the question or the issue.  

Driving over humans in the park is the fastest way for me to get home, but that doesn't make it safe or sensible. 

Looking for a safe and sustainable alternatives is infinitely better than plunging selfishly into growing the stockpile of waste that will be someone else's problem for 250,000 years.  Hive mind is scary.Ok then, answer the question:

**We SHOULD (or SHOULDN'T) sell grenades at Walmart because ___________________.**"Now I'm just gonna send this white sheet to my new pal Kim Davis, she needs it for some Klub she said she wanted to join."
Table service at McDonalds? Just what nobody asked for.
Answer my earlier question first:   

How is that Harper dropped the ball so badly on sharing the details of this deal and gaining the mandate and Parliamentary approval?
LOL, typical "these days" is only longer than your lifetime?  Even if that weren't scientifically False, it highlights the cognitive dissonance and the "me first, now!" attitude of the nuclear power now fanboy culture.  

Perhaps you'd care to explain how the containment structure at Chernobyl is cheap and safe?  Or how it won't need replacing every 50 years for the next Millenium?  

Or perhaps you'd like to explain how the same over-confident delusion that gave us Fukushima isn't identical to today's laughable pronouncements that today's nuclear sites are magically immune from predictable and unpredictable natural disasters.  

And then explain how nuclear proliferation won't continue to increase the global risk of WDM falling into insane hands.  

Let me save your the time and energy of attempting, or lying: you can't.  These are all undeniably True and valid downsides to nuclear power.  Continuing to deny them renders you non-credible.  

In the meantime, I'll ask you to consider what kind of WMD can be derived from a geothermal well, or whether a city can be rendered permanently a toxic wasteland if an earthquake were to fracture a solar panel.  Then tell us your home address where we can store some of that harmless nuclear waste.

You keep dodging the prior question: 
"How is it that Harper has fumbled this situation so badly on sharing the details of this deal and gaining the mandate and Parliamentary approval that now people like you are running around trying to get us to blind sign something you can't and won't reveal?

But that totally contradicts what you've already posted on multiple occasions.  Please post a truthful answer, not a prank/lie.
You probably mean country not company, but since you missed the entire point and missed the joke too then oh well.  Buy some stock.
Why not just subscribe to a TV service?  Costs a bit, but solves every problem within your rant, and a hundred more.  

For the cost of a dinner out, you get a month of uninterrupted, high definition, digitally storable, commercial-skippable content.  For many, it's money well spent.


Look [here](http://www.reddit.com/r/canada/comments/3n1zn4/mulcair_the_conservative_government_has_no/cvkr3u3)In order.  Here is [some material you should absorb before posting.](
http://www.ducksters.com/science/chemistry/radiation_and_radioactivity.php)

Regarding Chernobyl, do you assert that the current state of the plant was the desired outcome predicted by the same industry you're pimping for?  

And can you also confirm that the devastation at Fukushima was also deliberate?  Is there even the tiniest sliver of doubt in your mind that maybe, just maybe, these massive fuck ups were not the original intent, and that maybe, just maybe, it's brazenly naive for you to go around overconfidently confidently claiming that whatever nuclear project you're fanboying for will be the first one in history to have magic immunity from fuck up risk?

As for trolling, you're becoming quite good at it, but you committed a rookie fuck up by calling the victim of your trolling the troll.  You basically just confessed that your a troll intern.  

As for school age, you're the dolt who doesn't even know elementary school science. 

Maybe you'll flipping your trolling efforts into academic ones, and your hubris will flip too.  Then maybe in 20 years you'll desig the first nuclear power source that doesn't produce harmful waste and doesn't contribute to WMD risk and can be safely operated, even by fallible humans?  That would be awesome.  But in the meantime cut the shit and focus on educating yourself about the actual risks of nuclear energy instead of naively spouting stuff that seems to show you don't even they exist.


Your mom says why is my child such a disgrace, posting idiocy on the Internet and being a waste of human potential?

I obviously understand English far better than you.  As an infant I apparently did.  Look at how many times you said one thing, then almost immediately, the opposite.  Sometimes you did it within one sentence.  You've been given lots of opportunity to explain why this unmanulated deal is suddenly at an emergency status that can't wait for Harper's landslide victory to come through mere days later.  So far "comet strike" is the most credible explanation.
You were told not to post until you understood the material.  Now go do your homework. Oh you're talking about 17 years from now, not current reality.
It's designed to "look" representative.  But it doesn't match reality for the people most affected.  In the real world of the lowest wage earners, dollar store corn goes from $2 to $3 not $2.02, and gas prices go from 90 c/L to $1.15/L.  School fees go from $20 to $30, shoes go from $40 to $50, packaged food sizes shrink in increments of 15-25%.

That's the funny thing about reality. It doesn't obey government propaganda about how wonderful their economic action plan is working to keep prices just as low as wages.

Go back under your bridge loser.
That's not not not the situation.
Still waiting on an honest answer to the prior question.Sure get cable or directv.  Well young lady, if you won't answer the simple question, it confirms the worst assumptions I had about you.
Well that's the first week, and sorry fans, but the new era TDS is decidedly weak. There's been cringeworthy news joke prompter reads, some middling skits that were noticeably stretched to fill empty space, interviews that missed their mark, and tonight, a fluffy quantity of musical padding and pandering, with no moment of zen (?). 

Haters will downvote, but the truth is undeniable. The Daily Show has returned, weak and winded.
Oh.  When you instigated with the silly and ignorantly inaccurate gender perjoratives I assumed you wanted me to respond in kind.  

You've many chances to answer the question and you keep dancing around it, like a graceful ballerina.  And by the way, what makes you a liar are all your lies and contradictions. It wouldn't matter if I were here to expose them or not.
 Full credit for that goes to the tape pullers though who assembled those brilliantly juxtaposed clips.  Trevor even made some mistakes reading the prompter.
FYI, he's releasing a song for song cover of Taylor Swift entire current album.  That's why he's there, and that's why he's playing Taylor Swift songs.Wow, John Kerry just laid down one of the more convincing justifications for the Iran deal.  Much better than Ernest Moniz last week.
Not quite, but still ridiculous earningsLOL, Stephen did a call back to his "non-zero" chance of voting for Jeb Bush.I'm not entirely sure Kerry was the actual architect of the deal.  My unsubstantiated guess is that he was a figurehead to someone else's more detailed construction.  And Kerry's history did set my expectations kind of low.

But other inside players like Moniz and even Obama himself have been less concise and persuasive than this.  

Then when Kerry tied it back to his own war experience, that was the dunk.  It's ok for people to like different things.  To me, Trevor Noah is the Brussels sprout of the available options, but I'm well aware some people dig Brussels Sprouts.  

Gun to my head, I'd take Noah over Fallon.  So there's that.
They just pre-record a stack of these bumpers long in advance and burn them off as needed.  You can see it was laid on top of the audience during a break.You can thank the douchebag swift boat veterans election dirty tricks squad for that one.  

And by extension, I guess we can also thank them for years of senseless wars, eroding the US reputation globally, trillions in wasteful debt, torture as the new normal, the Decider, and god unwilling, J^(E)B!Well the funny thing is they're not even defending their differing view, perhaps because they're incapable, or perhaps because I haven't said anything that's not True. The point the stoner made about all the praise being rooted in excuses is True.  

When Dave Chappelle came along and blew our minds, nobody was saying "well he had a couple sort of OK jokes, let's give him a few years and ignore the bulk of his unfunny stuff."  And when he created the revolutonary Chappelle show, we didn't say "oh he's on the big show now, its HBO, big shoes to fill, let's lower our expectations.". Nor did we have to sift through hours of junk to find that one sort of decent bit.  

His standup was effing great.  All of it.  Chappelle Show was and is amazing.  From day 1.  No excuses.  No training wheels.  No faint praise.  That's how it's done.

Colbert didnt get a raft of excuses why his independent show should be allowed to be sucky for the first few weeks/months/years.  The dude came down with The Word on night one, and he coined "Truthy" which was a key standard bearer against the media bullshit factory and was deservedly added to the English language.  

So while the Trevor Noah fans cheer about how he didnt thoroughly disgrace the show, at least be real with yourself and admit there's another level of debut that did not happen here.

I strongly suspect this was a piece prepared in advance because it seemed to be geared towards October 1st specifically.  I've had the same impression about a few of the skits, because they seem to be covering events from 1-2 weeks prior.
Meanwhile Larry Wilmore - who reddit hates - had two incredible smack down rants this week, both of which were ignored by the hive mind.
I've noticed a similar attitude in all of Trevor Noah's press and jokes.  His entire schtick seems to be that he's the biracial fish out of water, so how can we expect him to have any clue what's happening here.  

Meanwhile guys like James Corden, Craig Ferguson, John Oliver, all had no trouble getting caught up and current on US happenings and culture.
I and many others observed that Trevor Noah's one note standup routines sucked, almost as much as his tweets, which sucked almost as much as his utterly awkward Daily Show appearances.  

And I don't know what alternate universe were John Oliver didnt nail it during his summer as substitute host. Whoever told you that, you should them as a source cause they're messing with you.

There was already a LOT of legends that owned HBO before Chappelle came along, so again I'm not sure where you're getting misinformation.   

But the point about Chappelle, and Colbert, and a bunch more... is that they came us and blew our doors off.  No lame excuses, no saying we'll give them another year and hope they get a little bit funnier. They just threw down.  Noah has not.  

Perhaps he's a really really really late bloomer. That would be great.
Yeah the panels are mostly trash.  But his rants on the Planned Parenthood congress debacle and the way Republicans are enamored with America-hater Vladimir Putin were incredible.  Reddit would have loved them (if they came from anybody else)Stars are prepped with talking points about what they can and can't say.  He caught her off guard with the unexpected question. No conspiracy.
Nobody's questioning it was a good bit, but the strength was in the assembly of the clips, not in Trevor Noah's clumsy cue card reading.  If and when's he gets better, I'll happily say it.  Trevor Noah added slightly to it with the African dialect in one sentence. No, it was during his interview of Jeb bush.  He said "there's a non-zero chance I'll be voting for you".  Some people erroneously heard it as "there's zero chance" and so they started internet beefing on Colbert for being too rude.
The point is that Ferguson and Oliver have been observably strong from the onset of their visible careers.  They didnt spend years sucking, and then somehow metamorphosize into great talents.  

Sure,it's possible Trevor Noah can overcome his slow and inauspicious start.  Anything's possible.  

Now as for Corden, you say he didnt *need* to learn American politics which is True.  But the funny thing is, he has.  He already shows more knowledge of the US political landscape than Noah, which is doubly noteworthy since, as you rightly point out he didn't need to, and the additional point being that Trevor Noah should have been learning that since he lucked his way into a correspondent's job, and then should have really amped that up 7 months ago when he got the host job.  The fact he's this far along and people are making excuses for why he's not in touch with US politics is not to his credit.
LOL, I'm not South African but I follow those comments of other leaders (especially the comedically absurd villains) as do hundreds of millions of intelligent and informed people.  

It does raise the question of The Daily Show can mock Vladimir Putin and yet they haven't replaced Trevor Noah with Yakov Smirnoff (yet).  

The truth is that pieces like that are assembled by diligent tape and research teams, not the host.
If Coca Cola actually cared, they could just cancel their sponsorship.  This is just posturing that will prolong the corruption.
Well I'll say it: Stephen Harper won't be revoking your citizenship, and he won't be declaring you a terrorist just for caring about environmental issues.  

But that doesn't matter.  **What matters is that the operatives working for him have assembled this legislation, and other similarly draconian legislation, and he is selling it.**  

It takes a sick mind and a perverse sense of authority to structure a government the way he and his team have.  

We see more clues of this in their choice of senators and ministers and in their dismissive and dishonest answers.  

We see it in their disgraceful treatment of the press, the Constitution, veterans, voters, workers, retirees, children, foreigners, immigrants, and the planet itself.  

**They need to go.**  The sooner, the better.
Let's be real.  The USA isn't rolling tanks to take our resources.  

Why would they, when our politicians already cheerfully give them away through corporations and secret TPP deals.
Yep, this is the problem that all the people wanting to torch the Senate don't even think about.

I want the senate to remain, but we have to reform some aspects to reduce some of the obvious problems.  Ignoring your boorish use of the word retarded, I'll just make the point that even if they aren't going to abuse these powers, it's sick and scary that they would feel the need to craft and enact such laws.  

It's like your spouse holding a shotgun to your face all day while saying "don't worry, I'd never use it on you, I'm just keeping this gun pointed at your face in case I need to use it on someone else.  Good night honey, sweet dreams."
Nice assumptions, but wrong.  I don't even care that much for Corden, but where I ACTUALLY got my impression of his surprisingly quick grasp of domestic issues and politics is from his various remotes, where he is operating off the cuff and ad libbing.  He's also demonstrated this in his reactions to some guest comments, which are (again) unscripted.

I'm not new to this, and I already know how to filter for scripted versus spontaneous.  And like him or not, I have to give him credit for how quickly he's come up to speed knowledge-wise.  

And even though this will tweak the blindest of Trevor Noah devotees, I'll point out that Corden got his show together and rolling in about a month.  Compare that to Noah, who apologists say shouldn't be given soft treatment because he's had "only" 7 months to prep.Well as I was saying in the other branch, Stephen Harper won't be revoking our citizenship, and he won't be declaring us terrorists just for caring about environmental issues.

But that doesn't matter. What matters is that the operatives working for him have assembled this legislation, and other similarly draconian legislation, and he is selling it.  

It takes a sick mind and a perverse sense of authority to structure a government the way he and his team have.  

We see more clues of this in their choice of senators and ministers and in their dismissive and dishonest answers.  

We see it in their disgraceful treatment of the press, the Constitution, veterans, voters, workers, retirees, children, foreigners, immigrants, and the planet itself.

They need to go. The sooner, the better.LOL at Cuban, back for another season playing Donkey Kong, the angry billionaire with no self control.  

I can probably explain the Splikity thing.  Both Cuban and Herjavec got lucky early in life cashing in with some pretty fluky techie ventures.  I suspect they both know they got damn lucky, and that is the root of their insecurity.  Neither has recaptured that early success, and with good reason: neither has any training or education in technology.  They just got lucky, and they know it.  

But money gives one an ego, and insecurity makes one aggressive.  So whenever a tech related topic comes up, they both turn into the monsters we saw today.
  
 Thank you for limiting that agreement to the thereotical maximum of 100%, I didn't think anyone did that anymore :-)
Yes well I'm sorry about all that.
The we need to move forward from yesterday is a little bit related to what Obama and Colbert both said.  Are we moving forward to next week's school murder spree (Rosedale was the 41st of this year) or are we doing something to disrupt the Congress that took aim and killed the last attempt at a tiptoe towards sensible gun regulation?
Interesting!
OMG, I love the mocking appearance jokes - always have - but tonight they levelled up!  Even Colbert broke and laughed at "Seductive Beaver Mascot"
Wow, tonight's **DESKALOGUE** (Desk-monologue, TM Donnadre 2015) was perhaps the best of the 19 episodes so far.
He was already, the band is what keeps him that way.
Salami, but regardless, that joke had extra layers. The first is that it was an homage to Seinfeld and the angry sea in The Marine Biologist episode.  Other feel free to expose more layers.
It was indeed, although the one in what I'm calling the "skit block" (in this case, Cyborgasm) wasnt as strong as some others that have run in that slot.If No Man's Sky has unlimited autogenerated solar systems that you go around "discovering" but never meeting anyone, isn't it basically more like an interactive science project galaxy simulator, and thus the game play will suffer once you've gone around and collected a million green columns of fuel?  FarmVille in space?
First off, don't think of this from a hyper literal sense, they're not field pieces from Hilary Clinton's campaign bus.  They're remotes like his trip to an unsuspecting stoner's house or the many and frequent car pool ones. Even the episode I'm watching right now he goes to the Angels game, he's improv'ing heavily and showing decent command of distinctly US cultural trivia that's light years beyond Trevor Noah... and Noah's been in the country far longer.
Well that's not True. To avoid spoilers I'm not going to reveal what it is you're missing. But she only said that in response to certain questions where the impulsive response would have been a spoiler.  Kerry Washington is a pro, and she's done this more times than a baby has wet a nappie.  She has never and was not just blind pimping. You're just misinterpreting what happened.
Prize pool size is meaningless to me.  Watching two unpaid college teams go at it for $0 is legitimate, while watching a guy flip a card in blackjack to randomly win two million isn't necessarily a legit sport.
It's a long way to admit you arent actually aware of even a simgle funny tweet, after you stuck your neck out.  I already knew there werent any good because people have scoured his entire output snd came up empty.  You were probaby thinking of some other comedian, as you seem fairly foggy on most of today's hosts and their career psths.

But where you're right is that we can't say he'll continue to suck perpetually just because he's sucked all the way up until now.  And you're also right that not everyone shares your devotion to Dane Cook, who just needs more time.He's very bright for a 5 year old.But it was not, as the original idiotic accusation suggested, a naked attempt to hard sell the film.  And pretty dishonest for a 14 year old.  
In many cases, it's both.  This story has stunk from day one when his family was coaching the responses.  I doubt it was engineered, but when things escalated to the point of handcuffs. I think opportunism met shallow internet activism, and there you go.
Except others in similar situations didn't suck so much at the beginning, and didnt need all the extra time and excuses being afforded to Trevor Noah.
This forum is unabashedly packed with Trevor Noah fanboys, so prepare yourself for inbox hate.  

I find he is unfunny and seems woefully out of touch with the culture he's supposed to be covering. Fanboys will say it's unfair to even assess him honestly because he's only had 7 months to prepare, and that all of his unfunny crap is in the past, while being blind to what's airing currently.
I find him to be terrible. I'm watching in spite of him.

 Reddit is fanboy central for Trevor Noah though so enjoy the downvotes.  Also his presence his attracted some militant SA shills, so you'll have them on your case too.

Where youmgetting that? Colbert's nailed it from the show, introducing "The Word" segment that was an instant hit.  He coined the word "truthy" which immediately and astutely captured the plague of dishonest political discourse that was infecting the culture.  

To say his first shows were uneven is pure nonsense.  
How long are we supposed to wait until Trevor Noah magically transforms from stilted and unfunny into smething else?  

I mean we have years of his mediocre output already, so do we include that time, or would you rather pretend this was his first week on earth and start the clock now?
Do you mean the mediocre Bumble interview?Curiously, this Late Show moment of zen was played on a night when the Daily Show forgot to have a moment of zen.  Their Ryan Adams tribute show ran long.
Plus plenty of reports suggesting his interviews were being coaches by his sister and parents, and the sister was apparently already suspended from the school previously for a bomb hoax and the father is embroiled in local race and religion controversy.Are you talking about the Bumble CEO ?
No, both have stayed education-free since they became millionaires.  Both have stayed closer to the sales/business end of the spectrum after their lottery tickets paid out.  And both never really created any technology either, they were more like salesmen.  
No.I remember them well, and it certainly wasnt like that.  You might as well say the problem was the early episodes weren't colorized very well.Your breath still smells like rectum. Learn to brush.
Indeed you picked up on my subtle dislike of Jimmy Fallon's show.   

Luckily we have pretty much the best of the Colbert Report simply transplanted over to the Late Show.  The in-character interviews aren't a big loss as they were satirical so they couldn't be taken that seriously anyway.
Sometimes people like to open their minds so much that the brain slides right out.
He can still do that, but now without the fake character the tough questions can be taken seriously and neither host nor guest needs to hide behind the parody situation.  

Unless it was a joke, he never said this.  

Also note that this article is from 2011 and we now know significant parts of the OBL reportage were False narratives leaked by the Administration.That's a great story and I'm not saying it's wrong. But on first blush it would seem to be the opposite, a more contained air column would have better support than a leaky one.
From the Marine's creed: **"My rifle is human, even as I, because it is my life. Thus, I will learn it as a brother. I will learn its weaknesses, its strength, its parts, its accessories, its sights and its barrel."**
No thanks, if you don't know the courier story has been discredited and retracted a million ways from Sunday, then you are woefully out of the loop of this subject. It's a bit like saying you heard OJ was riding with Al Cowlings but you hadn't heard anything since.

Suggest you review some up to date material from sources you trust, not me, and not Zero Dark Thirty.We don't know if the guests cancelled or the show canceled them. 

But yes, last minute cancelations are rare.  Now of course some pedantic type will say it has happened before, and then we'll have to endure teaching a troll what the word 'rare' means.

But when you pre-announce guests and run them in your synopsis and publicity all the way up to show day, and then they aren't there, that is exceedingly uncommon.  It happens when a guest is sick, or has a sudden urgency, or there's some kind of weather or security emergency.  But last minute changes with no obvious explanation?  That's rare.

it's extremely rare for The sources are plentiful, but I don't do free homework assignments for lazy antagonists who aren't up to speed.  Try your favorite search engine.Right as soon as you post that selection of hilarious tweets.  Oh wait, you didn't. Until then, you've lost, hard.
Having trouble finding the funny tweets?  

If it's taking you awhile to find 10 or 15 just post the first 5 and then keep going from there.
The constant reposting of this tells me someone's social media department is desperate.
Your ability to discern gender is about as good as your ability to put your money where your mouth is.  

If finding some funny Trevor Noah material is proving to be impossible for you, maybe just admit you were full of shit?
No, but nice troll try.  It's fine to disagree intelligently, but the militant ones have been instigating all manner of derogatory personal attacks rather than back up their position with sense or supporting facts.  That's the difference.  

About your description of how you "move on with your life" when you see something you don't like... seems unTrue since you obviously did the opposite in this case.

Let's see, you instigated here, so hypocrite check one.  

You come up empty supporting your position, and revert to weasel attack on me, check two.

And you confirm that even your mild claim of moving on with your life was False, check three.  

Yep, you've certainly made a great case for Trevor Noah.  Oh wait, all you did want launch an impotent attack.  Oh well, better luck with your next troll attempt.

It doesn't work for me.  Whoever programs the streaming for Much has somehow made the ads work but the content blows up or doesn't play on any of my devices or browsers.  When I respond to a Daily Show thread, I'm within the rules and on topic.

When you try shitposting me, you're not.  Maybe ask yourself and your alt accounts why you're doing that.  And move on yourself.
Lucky75 could greatly improve the transparency by simply posting when/why each censoring takes place.  

I suspect the vast majority of his/her moderating is legitimate, but skipping the crucial step of reporting what's going on, it can lead to threads like these that might be blowing things out of proportion.

It also leaves the sub tone unknown and makes for more work as various redditors don't know what the lines and standards are.  Making mod decisions public can help by proactively reducing incidents.
Well call me skeptical since I've seen Robert on all of his TV shows and never saw much evidence that he knows the details of the technology.  He may be a good executive or salesperson and I think he gets the big picture. But not the hard core technology.Liked the mini-slap down on "Seductive Beaver Mascot"^1 Jason Chaffetz.  

For those interested, the much maligned Larry Wilmore (The Nightly Show) did a more detailed dissection of that absurd chart and the rest of the kangaroo court procedings.   I think it was the [Sep 30 episode of The Nightly Show, should still be viewable on Comedy Central.](http://www.thecomedynetwork.ca/Shows/NightlyShow?vid=714910)  
  
-----
^1. As coined by Stephen Colbert
The shows you see on LWT are already in production, this one probably wasnt coughed up after this week's regular weekly school gun murder.  It may be they had a mental health climate episode on the table that they rushed to completion this week.  

I'm not worried about John Oliver chickening out on topics. We've never seen any evidence of that before.This is just posturing.  If these companies truly gave a shit, they wouldn't be sponsoring this corrupt organization at all.  Liked the mini-slap down on "Seductive Beaver Mascot"^1 Jason Chaffetz.  

For those interested, the much maligned Larry Wilmore (The Nightly Show) did a more detailed dissection of that absurd chart and the rest of the Planned Parenthood kangaroo court procedings.   I think it was the [Sep 30 episode of The Nightly Show, should still be viewable on Comedy Central.](http://www.thecomedynetwork.ca/Shows/NightlyShow?vid=714910)  
  
-----
^1. As coined by Stephen Colbert
No that won't happen.  How do we know?  Simple.  Other countries that have already done it.
I can tell you that "Every middle school kid has built bombs" is a False statement.

Oh ok let's give up then no not try to do anything whatsoever because any solution that even slightly less than 100% effective should be discarded.Cool lets give up then.  41 school gun sprees so far this year, let's not try and do anything.
Makes no sense.  Subway and their cold, overpriced, bland, pedophile inspired sandwiches are everywhere, but the better-tasting Quiznos seems to be going extinct.
Cool then let's make good decisions and sensible law making instead.  

Or we could continue letting NRA control all politicians and by extension, the country.  While there's a silver of truth to her implication that Hollywood loves their repetitious franchises, you can make long lists of unique non-franchise films that still do well.  Who knows.  I won't be surprised if he continues the trend of attracting a mature but respectable audience, while Jimmy Fallon continues to lead by running skits that aren't quite good enough for SNL.  Or he could start to establish himself as the must watch late night talk show. I could see either.Well at no point have I ever seen them as extended as Subway, and it doesn't seem to have suffered nearly the same degree of collapse.
Excluding browser shutdowns and BSOD, when it "works" what I see in the player is commercials (which play fine(, then a quick blank where the content should play, then commercial, commercial, commercial, etc.

It feels like the ultimate ripoff where you've watched their annoying commercials but did get the corresponding content.  
Lol thanks for asking, I figured this would be a top question.  Wendy Mesley does it too. 
After he throws to you, just say "Thanks Pete".  
**Do you believe (as I do) that top journalists such as yourself should abide by a no moonlighting policy?**  I've been dismayed at how many have had alternate incomes that compromise their integrity and give the CBC bashers so much ammunition to discredit you.
Fact-checked him into the boardsThe oil industry likes Peter a lot too, and they express their love with money.
Perhaps as an employee, but as a interview subject or guest panelist?  I doubt there's any such restriction.  You telling me if/when Justin Trudeau appoints Evan Solomon Minister of Ethics or as a Senator, that CBC isn't going to try and get him on?
Why stoned?  Did you click www.winnipegpaypress.com instead?A few surprising things:  

-  that the Liberals have bounced back from things like supporting the much reviled C-51 and endorsing a huge swath of Harper policies and plans
-  that the normally gaffe-prone Trudeau has stayed on the rails
-  that the entrenched positions of the public could shift this much
Soveign debts aren't the same as leveraged equities.  Balanced budgets aren't stupid, they're generally quite prudent.  Everyone knows this, even politicians.

The only reason Trudeau's plan is getting some traction is there's at least a faint belief his form of deficit spending will create actual jobs and produce infrastructure that could result in future savings.  

With the NDP, people fear the deficit spending will be towards social causes that usually have no payback.  

With the COC, people ~~fear~~ know that it will just flow to foreign corporations, insiders, and military contractors.Wow.  Since they regenerate the opening credits every day, I wonder why they don't use more of these?
Has the director confirmed whether some of the people or objects are computer rendered?
I get that sentiment and normally it would be True.  

But so far Colbert has had a number of standout musical performances that we wouldn't otherwise have seen.  
  

As for having the new category of guests, I too like the premise, but so far most of them have those appearances have been dudsIt's obviously not.  

The only question I have is whether a lot of the added elements (like the boats, choppers, and mini-Colberts) are computer generated or live shots composited.He's certainly had a charmed campaign.  Problem is I'm guessing he'll revert to form if/when he's Prime Minister.
Odd that this was done with no specific arrangements about when/where it will be aired.
A lifetime of observing people. 
I described this exact scenario right when the campaign started and Mulcair suddenly started acting all casual and inevitable.  I said he shouldn't do that, or he'd lose momentum.  Note that I was slammed by people who said I should shut up because the NDP's pre-campaign surge was "proof" the party strategists shouldn't be questioned.

Polling has become quite accurate, but there's a correction coefficient that polling *can't* capture, and that's the actual conversion of intent into actual votes.  

Oversimplified, consider a hypothetical campaign in which 3 parties are deadlocked in the polls.  Come voting time, one party has highly organized volunteer squads, and they use a razor sharp to deliver voters to polling stations on their top of the line reliable bus fleet.  They show up at seniors homes where engaged people with time on their hands grab some free biscuits and tea and pack the bus for an outing.  Everyone on board has been reminded that in such a close race, their individual vote could be the one that decides it all.

The second party has busses, but a few of them break down.  They park at the malls and hope that anyone interested will come and hop on.  

The third party has no organization, no database, no bus, and hopes for the best.

When the votes are counted, pundits will say the polls were "wrong", even though that's not the real story.

**tl;dr:  having your based riled up and worried that any missed vote could cost the election is a great driver.  Mulcair's casual I'm-the-next-PM-by-default campaign style is failing.**

Oh good, I'd love to read some of your non-existent empirical data on the subject.  Rude pedantic nerds are my secret crush.
Have I personally and generally seen people become corrupted by political power?  Hell yes.  Anyone who says they haven't hasn't been paying attention in this life.
But milk prices will drop by 11 cents a jug, and nobody will care that the size shrank by 18% and it now contains 'milk-like chalk extracts'
Say it brother!  Who needs jobs?  Capitalists like you can just pay everybody EI to stay at home doing nothing. Awesome plan.
If 'stride' means clumsily reading from prompter, he's definitely mastering it.
I find Klepper to be much better but they're both worthwhile.
Well his laughter in today's episode felt like several hours.
Padding paddddddddiiiiiiiing paaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaadddddddddddddddiiiiiiiiiinnnnnggggggg.
Why not just euthanize them?  If you think observing life experiences is a feature that's unique to me, then you are even more ignorant, naive, immature and self-absorbed than you pretend to be on the Internet.
Ah yes, the old mythical carnard about the evil greedy union workers.  Those scumbags that pay most of the taxes, do most of the work, and drive the economy that billionaire assholes think they run.  

Tell us, without any employed Canadians to patronize it, how will your magical corporate business do?
Ideally they would have given all the correspondents who wanted it a crack at hosting during the long hiatus.  We could have seen who was more natural and interesting.  Oh well, let arbitrary affirmation rule.
So naive. Canadian jobs aren't being killed to be done by a machine, they're being offshored to places where human life, health care, safe retirement, laws, and the environment have even lower regard.

After you're done mass murdering all the jobs in your town, what exactly would you have those freshly unemployed people do?  Stay at your house?  Eat your food?  

How fun will your job as a car salesman be when nobody in your town can buy a car from you?  Or when your telemarketing shift calls everybody but nobody has a job to buy whatever shit product your employer is selling.  Or when your paycheck gets slashed even more with jacked up CPP and EI and income tax because now all the people who were sharing that burden are taking money out instead of putting money in. 

Honestly, the best thing neo-conservatives ever did was brainwash fools into thinking all jobs should be killed, so that you can be the CEO of a wasteland.
You can't be this dumb?  Seriously?  Seriously? Who is supposed to "consume" your imaginarily competitive product?  All the people you made jobless?   Who will teach your children and attempt to break the cycle of undereducation that you're the head cheerleader for?  Maybe kids can learn how to spell from your capitalist hero Pewdiepie, because fuck those teachers and their lucrative poverty line salaries, right?  Maybe Foxconn can offer your toddler some practical skills training, with free dormitory housing. Those supple baby fingers are perfect for assembling Apple Watch, and metal poisoning effects won't kick in until they're your age.

And when your calcified brain and heart need help, are you going to call someone in the Panama call center to come help you because you fucked over the ambulance drivers, nurses and hospital staff and made those monsters all jobless?

My first union job I worked alongside an alcoholic who drank on the job.  I was young and stupid so I naively thought that was the union's fault.  But after a lifetime I've erased much of that ignorance and I've seen addicts and all kinds of psychopaths... most of whom are out of scope.  

You may or may not learn as you grow. But whether or not you wake up, the reality will not change: whatever you do for a living is fucked beyond all recognition if your wet dream of killing all jobs comes True.
Look young lady, you can prove you're not just a bloviating liar by posting all that empirical data you brought up.  But don't post anything else until you do, if you do it will just confirm that you were chalk full of shit, and we wouldn't want anyone thinking that.

If it's been a few weeks and you still can't find it, then you may come back and offer a sincere apology for spouting nonsense.  Until then, buh bye girlfriend.
Except that's about 7-1/2 years out of every 8When was he on network TV before this?
Interesting that they broke that out of one episode for insertion into another.
Well he used to be.  Then something happened and he started being a republic talking point vending machine.  It's too bad, because he could have been remembered as a hero on both sides of the aisle, but now he's seen more as Sarah Palin's running mate.Yeah unlike actors, musicians, comedians, writers, directions and HEY WAIT A MINUTE!  You're doing a satirical example of what it means to be "truthy".  You got me.
That's was an awesome piece of laser quick wit by Colbert that most people will miss.
From the moment you said I was a union member you were completely wrong, and then you became even less accurate. 

And you telling me to crack an economics textbook is like Kylie Kardashian telling Stephen Hawking to learn some astronomy, only Kylie appears to be a lot brighter than you.
Oh, it's just that when you called me a man, I decided to assume you were playing some kind of weird gender inversion game and I didn't want you to look like you had deep sexual issues in addition to your glaring antisocial and personality defects.  So I played along to lessen your embarrassment.  Now you're telling me that was actually deliberate on your part?  My sympathies to you, and to whoever ends up having to try and unravel your ball of sexual confusion.
I'm not seeing him crushing anything but you're certainly entitled to the opinion.
You dread Jessica Wlliams, OK we get it
I can barely stand Trevor Noah, and hated his segments today.  But I will readily admit I didn't think the interview was a complete disaster. It was weird that he was feigning not knowing how theater seats work.  The big laughs seemed forced but I'll give him the benefit of the doubt that they were real.
Somewhere a social media consultant is sweating bullets because their attempt to go viral didnt work.  Or well, got 7 extra views, so that's something.
Checked it out because it's in my coverage universe.  Can't say it was bad, just that it wasnt gripping enough to keep me hooked.  

Yes it's a little different and slightly better than the average network sitcom.  But it was ultimately set up gags and sex jokes.  Could it succeed?  Maybe, but if Community and Arrested Development can't, why should this?  

Got more laughs from Grinder, even if Grinder doesn't appear to have any long term trajectory.
I never think about or crave this show, but as soon as I start watching, I get happily immersed in it.  Such good acting, and actual drama, not the usual contrivances.  I for one actually do like the murder mystery back story, otherwise it would just be a tragic romance.  I love the multiple narrators device and how it drags the viewer in and engages them by making us spot all the differences.  
The irony of you calling that comment "butthurt"
Prepare to receive personal attacks and irrational downvotes from losers who can't separate their own identities from that of a TV they've been brainwashed to cheerlead.
The Chris Christie interview was terrible.  A competent interviewer would have been able to call out so much of Chris Christie's actual performance and issues.  Being completely unaware of Christie's history, Trevor Noah did none of that.
Enjoy the pile of downvotes and hate that is coming your way from the Trevor Noah fanboy army.
Jon Stewart has instincts.  Sometimes those instincts are great, and sometimes they're terrible.  Doesn't give you the right to instigate a personal attack.  If you have any respect for the rules, comment on the show and refrain from initiating personal attacks. What you're doing is the textbook definition of trolling.
I guess that's your way of admitting you were bullshitting about the "empirical data".  You got busted (again).

Sadly he even continues.  In the interview he said some sensible things, but couldn't wait to take irrational digs at the current president and administration.  He even spouts the standard Frank Luntz doublespeak, crap like calling the economic recovery "the weakest recovery ever", as if a so-called "weak" recovery is somehow worse than the light speed economy suicide his predecessor was driving.You've concisely and clearly stated this accomplishment better than anyone so far.  Can you summarize the criticism from those who are saying it's not that special?
The problem is bystanders generally don't care, and many bystanders don't have the time or knowledge to inform themselves and care.  So you end up with a situation where a few voices of those conspirators who didnt like their secret leaked drown out the rest of the active voices.
Actually he revealed a lot that top administrators were actively swearing was not taking place.  

Prior to his leak, the dominant narrative was that anyone who suspected such things was a tinfoil hat wearing lunatic

In fact, it was such top level categoric (and yet False) statements that eventually forced Snowden to act.
Uh, you sure [about that](http://medium.com/matter/how-radioactive-poison-became-the-assassins-weapon-of-choice-6cfeae2f4b53)As I was reading the beginning of this, I said to myself "this sounds like a corny movie", then chuckled when you recognized the same thing.

I too wonder if there isn't a path to Obama doing the right thing.  The scenario as you describe would just create an army of foaming-mouthed attack republicans whining about how the Kenyan President is a traitor, etc.  

In my ideal dream scenario, national leaders of all stripes would have recognized long ago that torture and illegal extreme espionage are the kinds of things the Union was created to oppose, not foster, and that the Snowden revelations could have been the ideal catalyst to accept fault, take some shame, and reset things in a new direction.  
A confidentiality cause for a IT clerk job should not supersede the human rights and foundational basis of a nation.
As we've seen from parody like LWT, most Americans think he's the "wiki leaks guy"Hey cool, another off-topic wall-of-text personal attack.  Just the kind of thing an obsessive jilted lover would do. 

Olivia Munn passed, so then Jon Stewart had to look elsewhere.
The entire post - and all of his/her attack posts - are 100% about me, not the topic.  That's obsessive, rule-violating, and off-topic.  Surprised you can't or refuse see that, but oh well. 

I could maybe buy the premise that the average uninformed foreigner who has never been off the farm might not know that.  But Trevor Noah is (ostensibly) fully in the entertainment business.  He's played a variety of theaters, and his mediocre stand up includes relevant references.  

It's a bit like a football player saying he's never heard of artificial turf or goal posts.  It's about .1% possible, but 99.9% implausible.
Hunting isn't required.  Informed people already know what Christie's misconducts are.  The interview is where we get to hear what he has to say about them.  Unless we get a puff piece, or an interviewer (Trevor Noah) who is utterly clueless about the subject of his interview.
You can disagree agreeably, but when you fanatically and obsessively break the rules to attack anyone who critiques your beloved idol, yeah that makes you a fanboy.  The ALLCAPS ranting is a different dysfunction.
In this context, I think you mean "effect".  But as for ignoring the harm, has it even been factually established he caused any actual harm?  Skeptics and enemies of the government have long believed there was illegal surveillance and widespread violation of human rights.  He didn't so much as leak information as he did vindicate them and expose some criminals in government.
What's with you instigating offensive remarks to me and about me. I would never have said or done anything to you, but as you've chosen to take the first shot, let me respond in self defense and point out that you're the crotch in this situation.  

Using boldface to repeat your entirely personal comment doesn't make it on-topic or change it to be within the rules.  And your alt nick smear post with the allcaps? Same thing.  

If you ever think of something on topic, go ahead and post it.  But if all you want to do is shit talk another user, I recommend you visit [SITV](http://www.screamintothevoid.com), it's perfect for people with your issues.
Under normal circumstances I wouldn't take you down to ground, punch you in the face, and spray you with mace.  But when you try grabbing me from behind and trying to rip my pants down, that gives me license to do just that.

It's the same here.  If you sneak up behind me with an off-topic personal attack, and then keep assaulting me with unprovoked attacks, don't be surprised when I react in self defense.

I'm not sure what burns you most, the realization that you unnecessarily brought this on yourself by instigating, or being dominated by a female.  Either way, learn from this and think twice before you attack someone who might just fight back.
Here's what I said.  You'll note it was entirely benign and on topic:

*Donnadre: "Stars are prepped with talking points about what they can and can't say. He caught her off guard with the unexpected question.  No conspiracy."*

As you may or may not known, LadyEdithCrawley4 has been stalking me with personal attacks and smear attempts.  When he-she came along with another one, I rightfully responded in self-defense.  You for some reason took that as an invitation to instigate yourself.  only you know why.  Mob mentality maybe?  
"Most" guilty?  Please.
Seemed forced.
Cymbal, but yeah
Chr\u00e9tien and his cronies were similar to Harper and his cronies.  We had to vote them out when their corruption got too out of hand, and now it's time to oust Harper.  

One painful lesson we'll suffer is that Harper's more heinous and devious policies will live on long after we've tossed him to the curb.  You can't kill the environment, journalism, our international reputation, medicine, science, ethics, the economy, retirement, data collection, and cultural tolerance... and then expect it all to heal quickly.  We'll still be suffering Harper's damage for years to come.
  Recently he exploited election loopholes to create a massively long campaign, costing taxpayers an extra $100-150 million.  He brazenly lied that this wouldn't cost tax payers,

For days, every question about this was shut down with lies and dishonest doublespeak.  His campaign organizer openly disparaged and obstructed journalists who raised this topic.

And now even more recently, he's instigating racist dissent to rally the most actively bigoted members of his base.

Other than that and few hundred other digusting and reprehensible actions, he's OK.
I can't stand this corrupt Harper regime. But I can say definitively that lower sales tax does make large ticket purchases more palatable, and in that way it does have a stimulative effect.We could debate how great or not great it was, but to call it "useless" is just False.  You even admit as much when you say "cops look at it as an extra piece of information" (before again contradicting yourself to say "it did nothing".  It did something.  How much or how little can be discussed, but to say it did nothing is just False.
The middle class doesn't benefit from income splitting, only a slice does.  Unless you're implying that Harper's policies have reduced and redefined the "middle class" as a thin slice of affluent families doing much better than most Canadians.
Except when said person doesn't change over 24 years....
Those videos also feature Saskatchewan's highly popular Premier and media darling Brad Wall and some of his inner circle.

Unfortunately, in Sask, being racist or homophobic isn't necessarily considered a negative for a politician. You're right I should have quoted "meaningless".
His riding is a perfect example of why Conservatives love vote splitting.  2/3 people in that riding can't stand him or the CPC, but they split their votes and he wins.
Syrupy montage aside, my recollection of Steve Irwin was that of a guy who was needlessly and constantly tackling and terrorizing animals, and a TV show with a lot of faked shots.
If you consider it objectively, how is it *not* a news show?  The fact checking alone is superior to many news shows.
The much aligned Larry Wilmore did a better take on this during the Sep 30 episode.  But his argument could be summarized in one bite... "Is abortion legal in this country?"In this context, both.  The Daily Show has been found to have an incredibly low error rate.  And by the nature of their delayed aggregate broadcast, they tend to be satirizing news and events somewhat delayed versus other news shows, they benefit from the universal fact checking that flushes out which sources and statements were True and which were not.

I didnt say "no one", I just highlighted the myth that the benefits apply to anyone but the affluent.  As the famous satircal saying goes "the rich man and the poor man, both have equal freedom to sleep under a bridge, and both are equally free to buy a million dollar house"It's less funny when you consider the senseless death and destruction that resulted.
Management may have been weary of students wasting expensive fire extinguishers on pranks and burnt toast incidents.  But management clearly hasn't experienced the devastation of a serious fire.  Once you've had one, the cost/cleanup of a fire extinguisher feels more like a blessing.
Video is a bit misleading.  If you left the lid on longer than the 2 seconds used by Captain Fire, it would still get extinguished.  

Most training is to have the lid at hand to quickly and easily cover it.  Having and appropriately over-sized cookie sheet or griddle isn't as realistic for real world kitchens.
Error *rate* makes the length irrelevant. Back in the Jon Stewart era there were lots of objectively verifiable claims made.  So far this season the tendency is towards skits and commentary which doesn't lend itself well to such analysis.
I mostly love Larry Wilmore, so I can say that on the live broadcast, I too thought he said "Norm".  Playing it back it's hard to tell but sounds more like Noam.  My best guess is he knows the difference and this was at worst a flub of the tongue, not the brain.
Me too.  The episode before and after had significant problems, but this one was very good.  Makes it hard for me to promote the show when I pump the tires on how good it was Sep 30 only to have people tune in on Oct 1 and think that I'm on crack for recommending it.
Yes, this point is lost on many people.  I would say he's a science enthusiast.  Or, speaking as someone who actually booked him for an event, I would say he's also a paycheck enthusiast.
I'm not much for graphic or shock humor, but I did get a chuckle from how ridiculous that was.
Me too, I think Larry's own science affinity allowed him to be duped by the contrived narrative of this kid and his family's PR mission.
My speculation is that this happened because whoever does booking for the Nightly Show is no all-star.  Throughout 2015 we've seen the guest panel dwindle from 4 to 3, and then the 3 is really just 1 guest plus 2 staffers who may or may not take the time to shave or dress before taping.  The booking just seems lazy frankly.  

So when Ahmed Mohammed's controversial family pulled this witless kid out of school and started pumping his media availability, my guess is the Nightly Show booker grabbed it with two hands.  Superficially, it's perfect.  Popular story, racial undertones that suit the theme of ~~The Minority Report~~ The Nightly Show, cute looking kid, Larry loves science... the booker must have thought they just pulled a rabbit out of a hat.  

Of course we all know the kid and the story are mostly a fraud. But even if they figured out that by tape time, what are you supposed to do, slam a young teenager who has what appear to be social issues and a dysfunctional family?

Perhaps you're right, when it went viral, the initial reports were an old lady succumbed and a lot of people lost their apartments.  But I didn't really follow it afterward to know if any of that got verified.
I'm speaking people not voters, as we know the CPC is a vote collecting machine. It's hard to correlate past with the new election boundaries.  Another strategic voting site has conservative at a slim low 50's % as I recall.
I consider a niqab and wonder to myself if it's a freedom of expression or a symbol of religious patriarchal control.  

But then I quickly remind myself that we have duly qualified court to decide that, and they have, so I'm content to follow what they've figured out on the matter.  And thus anyone bringing it up now is doing so for political traction, either way.
Most redditors are of an age where they might not recall similar big controversies over the wearing of turbans.  At the time, you would have thought the issue would bring Canada as a nation to the risk of closure.  Many years later, we see it turned out to be a non-issue.  I wonder if there's a lesson to be had from that.You're probably right.  If this ended up being confirmed, major media would be glomming all over it by now.  So at best it's unconfirmed.Everyone's different, but during the era when sales taxes kept getting jacked up I reached a point where I was fed up, and decided to curtail discretionary purchases, we're talking big ticket stuff like vehicles, electronics, home renovations.  I was sick of taxes adding so much to the total.  As it came down I used the lower tax as one of the rationalizations for spending.  Of course not everyone does, but I suspect that's a somewhat common sentiment.They will, but egotistical alternative parties refuse to cooperate, and vote splitting is the outcome.
Of course, but the turban had its own histrionics at the time.  They wouldn't offer "protection", criminals would not respect them, the traditions of Canada were being degraded, blah blah blah.  

Seeing now the turban went from Canada's biggest topic to a "nobody cares" issue later, makes me wonder who will give a damn about niqab next month or next yer.

And nobody said you have to "endorse" it, but is getting your way on a minor detail of a ceremony that most of those opposed to niqab dont even care about... Is that worth re-electing a destructive, divisive, and corrupt government?

If having to "tolerate" 2 niqabs per decade is the cost of sweeping out a corrupt regime, isn't that a great bargain?
I have an innate dislike for anyone who actually uses acronyms and designations after their name.
Bennie and the Fed.  it's a reference to "Bennie and the Jets", Ben Bernanke, Federal Reserve
Wicked parody and Emma Roberts is ripping up the screen.  But this entire show is too edgy and weird to get a mainstream audience.  Too bad.
Great news, this is an enjoyable series with several compelling characters.Well one small point is that they actually they aren't turning real profit.  Netflix uses funny accounting where they don't book what you or I would calculate as True costs for content. 

Could they turn real profit in the future?  Sure, maybe.  Everyone loves them, and what's a few bucks.  But that's a double edged sword because the cable companies who are being killed by Netflix while providing Netflix's infrastructure will eventually be successful in grabbing a piece.  And the content providers will get sick of watching Netflix make (real or perceived) windfall profits off their content, and they'll try grabbing a piece.  And every competitor will keep bidding up content.  We've already seen lots of the foolishness that presages a reality check, like reckless development spending sprees, and the amount of money Amazon is paying for the Top Gear thug.  I see some distant headwinds for Netflix.  It will all come down to whether they settle on a truly sustainable profit model before the onslaught of these headwinds hits.



And even those meagre "profits" aren't really accepted as True net income by responsible accountants.  
People joke about it being a small increase. But there's still risk in price hikes for a relatively fledging product category.  

Right now people who arent even that engaged with their Netflix keep subscribing because it's seen as chump change.  But a couple small increases gets their mind on the fact they've already seen most of the old cheesy shows and movies, and maybe they consider dropping it.  

Then the family with 3 or 4 screens notices the increases add up.  

Sometimes just the notion of an increase can be death.  Netflix nearly tripped over their own dicks with the whole Qwikster/small price increase fiasco a few years ago. 

Plus there's certain psychological price points you don't want to exceed otherwise it causes consumers to slow down and think. $8 was a no brainer, people didnt care what it was or how limited/old the content was... It's just $8.

Look at HBO streaming.  We know that's a massive pile of incredible content.  But priced at $15, the uptake was, let's just say, nowhere Netflix level of enthusiasm.  Clearly $8 is a no brainer, and $15 is something that gives pause.  Walking that fine line is tricky.

Carson's doing something right? LOL
This was a great slap down on Ben Carson and his insensitive and insane comments about the victims of the Oregon murder.  If Jon Stewart did this identical piece, the internet would be swooning.  
Which was his best move, the insane advice about how he'd casually rally people being held at gunpoint, or the way he keeps giggling about how they contributed to their own slayings?
Call me skeptical, given what I know of this guy's history and the fact that he sells overpriced crap in a tiny bottle on a fake medical claim.
Say goodbye
Start - Groenig's Life In Hell comic strip which predated The Tracey Ullman show.

End - hasn't, when I do catch the show, it still contains funnier lines than pretty much any other network sitcom. 
I like that he's one of the few who doesn't really pull his punches.  When he's decided on an issue, it's obvious where he stands.
Spinal TapIn a way he can't really answer the question.  AirBNB isn't publicly traded, and it loses money, so his value hasn't been realized, and right now he only owns the right to share in the losses.
The Deskalogue^TM was great, AirBnB interview was good too. Cate Blanchett interview was mostly just Stephen fawning, and the script reading "game" wasn't that good.  Dartmouth tackling dummy was an interesting story, didn't really need the live demo.
I'm way surprised he's ran such a successful campaign. 

In fact, during the years you mentioned he did stumble a lot.  He made a lot of accidental dumb statements, and a bunch of dumb statements on purpose.  He applied some seemingly self-destructive policies and some backwards decisions. He became a non-entity in the House, being outshone by Mulcair for the past several years.

When he foolishly endorsed C-51 and propped up Harper, it seemed likely his political acumen was zilch. Then when he explained his reasoning for supporting it was so he could reverse large chunks of it later, many thought Trudeau had lost his grip.  

Then the campaign started. Day one, while Harper was boldly lying about the costs and implications of a mega-long campaign and a Mulcair was taking a personal day, Trudeau was nowhere to be seen. It looked like he'd laid another egg, deciding to start his campaign on west coast time, missing the coverage cycle and looking like an irresponsible summer intern who'd slept in late for work.  

But then he came out sprinting, jogging through a summer shower and answering a gonzo blogger on the trot, deft but effectively brushing away his ridiculous C-51 stance.  

Then every day since he's campaigned hard and pretty much error free. He's arguably won some debates, and benefitted from a non-attack ad strategy.  

He's been assisted by friends and foes alike.  His team has launched platform planks and pieces of substance at the right pace.  And the CPC's unhanded attack campaign has only generated sympathy or empathy to any but the hardcore CPC base.  Mulcair's reversal has been another boost for Trudeau.

I've seen too many years of Justin Trudeau's missteps and gaffes to fully believe he's out of the woods.  But for anyone who has watched only this election campaign, their view of Trudeau would be that of a charmed and charming candidate.
Isn't Netflix charging extra for extra screens now?
When Harper announced this election, he claimed the reason he was super-sizing it was to save the taxpayers money.  Within minutes, this was confirmed to be a lie, and that the extension would cost somewhere around $150 million.  

Is it a surprise that an campaign launched on a lie is dishonest?
Pennies?  Even pirating it the way you describe, that's dollars each, $5 to be exact.
I'm not talking about highly engaged customers like you, and especially not ones who are illegitimately splitting the cost.

But just the fact you do that proves my point.  You are so price sensitive yourself that you're willing to engage in a kind of theft. You do this all for the sake of pushing your cost down by a few bucks. And my point is that a few bucks difference IS enough to motivate certain decisions... you confirm that.
 Let's set aside the issue of whether or not it's legitimate.  The fact you're doing it proves my point: people - such as yourself - will go to lengths over a the matter of a buck or two differential.
Don't confuse Netflix's current lax approach to this not being a violation of your T&amp;C.  But I'm prepared to concede the point if you let me legitimately use your password.
Great mock writing and great McCohanghey impression
Curious how people are interpreting it.  I think they may be confusing it as an autism dig, but it means to stop talking, stop using the radio channel
Maybe, but even if it's not, that stands alone as a wickedly funny line.  It implies that the Fox Newsbabe is the same byproduct as the other women who were wrecked by the experience.
Eyes without a face?
The Belinda Carlisle song "Mad About You" during the cafeteria beat down
The black sorority being "omicron omicron omicron" (OOO) as Denise calls them, the "ooh es". Every week still wishing deaf Taylor Swift fan was still around
Horror movie in the trailer, was it Leprechaun?
The main purpose is for Netflix to gradually find a way to increase revenue in their quest to someday be profitable. Ostensibly it's for a person or people in a single household.  You're pirating out your subscription, reselling portions to unrelated people. Netflix has been turning a blind eye to this, because - for now - they need you, and thus they don't currently enforce the violation.  


So many, but let's start with embracing the ever-toxic Eve Adams and her deserving boyfriend.
Except at the time he did it, his path to forming government was anything but clear.I would say this isn't what glaucoma would look like, but the dark optical illusion areas might simulate macular degeneration You've listed 4 bullet points of what should been done to ensure nuclear power is "safe".  If you knew this beforehand, why in heaven's name didn't you tell them before the disaster!   


And just to be clear, are there any other special bullet points the nuclear power experts need to be told today in order to prevent tomorrow's disaster?  

It's just that I'm tired of seeing Reddit's love for nuclear power, and the claim that it's safe, and that all the previous disasters were easily preventable, and we'll never make that mistake again... fully ignoring the fact we have no idea what glitch or circumstance will factor into tomorrow's disaster.  

I also wonder of the burning piece of paper remains a hazard for 250,000 years, and what specific cities you deem as impervious to risk.This would never happen in a first world country, so we shouldn't be worried.
This booking - like many - is mostly about availability/proximity and promotion.  Kimmel is going to do a week of shows in NYC.
Regular bars are already noisy, this would be acoustical torture.Yes, perhaps he magically changed from a buffoon into a useful strategist.There's no such thing as foam that will "cancel" noise, but if you did spray foam it to reduce reflections, that would substantially change the appearance.Whoever isn't living with you means you had to give out the password, violating the T&amp;C, therefore illegitimate.  And splitting the costs is the same as selling the use of your password.  

But prove me wrong and PM the account info.

Why wouldn't you?  Unless underneath your foul-mouthed and crooked attitude you know that it's prohibited and that it could cost you your account.  Lie to yourself all you want.
Oil moneySo ridiculous.  I know dozens of exceptions to your rule.
In one breath you admit all the previous disasters were preventable and told us how stupid everyone (except you and a handful of geniuses) is, and how nuclear energy can turn into mass death if a couple of stupids don't listen to you, and in the next you claim it's safe.

So unless the disclaimer of your endorsement includes a world without humans, then reactors that can turn into mass killers merely on an accountant's misguided choice., then they obviously aren't safe.

Test sites and waste from 70 years ago still aren't habitable and edible, and your 80 year estimate is not real world.  And that's best case scenario of contained waste, never mind sites like Chernobyl that's spending billions to create a joke of a shield that will need replacing every 50-100 years for thousands of years.  Nor did we address the increased potential for weapons.  

I defy you to give us a plausible scenario of a terrorist group using conservation as a weapon the same way they can a nuke.  

If my solar panel fucks up, it affects me.  I deal with it and can move on and improve on it harmlessly tomorrow. When your nuke idea fucks up, you're gone, your city is gone, your fellow citizens are in for centuries for ruin, disease, pain, catastrophic costs, and death.  Sounds awesome.

Wait, if Japan can fuck it up so royally, shouldn't sensible people have questions about the capability of ANY nation to properly control the extreme risks?  Obviously yes.  

I can still remember the day before the Tsunami, internet boards were full of nuclear power pumpers who said "yeah yeah, Chernobyl was a one time thing, and it only happened because Russia is a shambles (or whatever excuse de jour was).  

And before Chernobyl, there was a fable about how that could never happen either.  And before that.  These explosions, collapses, storms, implosions... all declared impossible by well meaning sci-fi fans around the world. Until the day they occur. 

Only the blind and stubborn can state today that Fukushima is the last nuclear disaster.  There will be another one.  

How soon it happens may depend on how effectively you campaign to understate the risks and minimize the consequences.  If you're really persuasive, we might have some overconfident and undereducated politicians and utilities push for the next screw up sooner rather than later.

Of course you'll be back the day after the next disaster with 4 more bullet points that could have saved everyone's life if only everyone else wasn't so stupid and human.

"Show me a system where human error is not a problem."

You show me a nuclear system where human error doesn't carry thousands of years of risk.  (And I mean a real one, not the futurology tea party.)

Then show me a nuclear model where error doesn't let terrorists exploit nuclear terror.

It's pretty telling that you'd need to completely lie and misrepresent me because you have no valid defense.  I've never said one thing to you about fossil energy, yet you've incessantly pretended I have, and even wrote a wall of text based on said lie.

I knew you would have to resort to that.  Every nuclear pumper who cites that guy who fell off a roof with a solar is similarly unarmed and in the absence of a truthful rebuttal, attacking a False position is all you've got.

Myself, I'm not posting about the guy who slipped on a banana peel paving the parking lot at the Acme Nuke Plant.  But that's because I don't need to rely on blatantly unrelated risks to win this issue.  The actual tragic consequences of overconfident nuclear projects gone wrong are horrible enough that I don't need to stoop to sad chicanery.  Why do you?  

That anecdote who got hurt with a solar panel?  He doesn't need to be buried in a lead, steel and concrete sarcophagus. The city where it happened is still habitable.  People can come and go without dosimeters.  They can still breath the air and drink the water.

Meanwhile you refuse to accept the risk of future failure and seem strangely ready to accept a Times Square Dirty Bomb as the minimum that might get you to soberly consider risk.  The overconfident never see failure as a possibility until it's too late.

And the day after the Dirty Bomb, you'll give us 4 bullet points about how you could have prevented it.  If only you'd put that genius to work actually creating a safe energy source instead of using your genius to creatively misrepresent me and the actual scale of nuclear risks.Who said anything about "fully viable solar"? Oh, more flaying a a straw man, got it.  

But while you're doing that, I'll point out renewable energy is on a sharp upward trajectory and has offset significant chunks of demand in various other countries.  

When will "fully viable solar" arrive? I can't give a date, but it's sure to be sooner than when Chernobyl is safe.  

And why the canard about needing a  national infrastructure grid for solar?  News flash, we have a grid already.  And besides with alternatives like solar you can generate on your own roof into your own storage and demand.  That can in many cases take pressure *off* the grid, not the other way around.

You think alternative energy sources should be denigrated until they are dominant.  That makes no sense.  Other countries have sensibly allowed them to scale up.  But to do that, it also meant not obstructing them with fairy tales of a safe, waste-free nuclear reactor that's been "just around the corner" for the last hundred corners.  The demand problems you speak of are solved withstorage.

I live better and use far less than half the electricity I did just 10 years ago.  That's because conservation and efficiency actually work.  Conservation and efficiency don't kill cities when they screw up, and no terrorist will hold an "energy efficiency" weapon over our heads.  We don't need to dream up batcave bunkers or interplanetary garbage trucks to store dangerous "efficiency" byproducts so they can go decay in someone else's back yard.They didnt reduce it from 1000. He said there was the potential of cramming 1000 into the space, but they went with 370
That was nice. The repeated theme is that above all, Stephen sees this as a performance space.
[Actually they aren't.](http://www.businessinsider.com/netflix-promises-profitability-in-2017-2015-1) Netflix uses fudgy accounting to declare cash flow, but if their True costs are considered, they actually aren't profitable. 
Voted on Monday.  20 workers/scrutineers, 2 voters
Is it wrong to worry that the rush of early voters are part of a Pierre Poutine squad rigging the election?
There's multiple people involved, so after a few tampered ballots, suspicions would be raised.  Falsely assuming someone is on quaaludes, reaming out all the workers, rudely dismissing what were probably innocent people... and you seem to not even understand the question was about scrutineers! I look forward to the day when someone texting behind the wheel is treated the same as someone pointing a ~~guy~~ gun at innocent people.
That's not True. And he did jump the curb.
Alcohol locks on all cars is fine if you're a trillionaire and you agree to pay for mine and everyone else's, plus compensate me for time and expenses when it fails.  

Offenders already have mandated blow boxes that they circumvent in various ways.  I say one forgivable instance of drunk driving which assumes you'll learn your lesson, but the second instance should be life in prison.
Get Santa Claus to resurrect the cat, because that's how True this story is.The first time?  No.  After that yes.  No different than waving around a loaded gun.
Pro tip, heat the milk to the point of boiling in a coffee mug, adding cold milk ruins the process.
Sounds like he has more experience being alive than you.  In fact a lot of us have lived through various CPC and Liberal governments, and we've seen corruption and ineptitude from both.  The old guy ranting isn't wrong.  If/when the Liberals are in power for too long, they will also commit ruinous acts, just Harper's band of thugs.  

You may not have been voting age when Harper came along and swept out a crew of crooks, and now it's time to do the same thing again. 

And hopefully vote them aside in 4 years or less.

Or perhaps more ideally, have some kind of balanced minority that keeps the obscenely undemocratic powers of FPTP at bay for awhile, and makes for a scenario where leaders have to compromise periodically.

I explicitly retract any consent you may have misinterpreted that I find texting while driving acceptable. Hopefully that will clear away your wacky impression of what I consent to.
The article fawns over SNL so much that it almost tempted me to watch that junk show.  I was wondering, could the reviewer be right?  Is SNL actually watchable?  But then I noticed the reviewer also saying the most successful comedienne of today should step backwards by a career and join SNL, and that's when I was reminded the reviewer is fruit loops.
Watch the actual broadcast and he does a news rundown at the beginning. You're probably only seeing clips where he does the main story only.
Oh.  What deep questions would you have asked?  


Keep in mind at the time the majority of Americans couldn't distinguish him from any other suspected creep, were buying the traitor narrative, and in many cases, were living the cliche that "I'm not doing anything wrong so who cares about illegal surveillance". 

Making the interview amusing and informative did more good than just turning out yet another repeat interview of the same asked and answered questions that would just get ignored by the masses.
Back in the day the correspondent segments used to be hilarious because they would capture the interview subjects saying something stupid or funny.  But now, lazy producers have switched it to having the correspondent-comedians do all the dumb gags while the subjects just sit and watch.  It's far less effective.
Makes me sad it's only going to be 4 short episodesIf the story as presented is True, asking for a raise is pointless and it's bizarre you would think that way. Doing 300% work for a slightly higher wage makes no sense and isn't physically possible, unless the lost work capacity isn't quite as it seems.  

Obviously you should be seeking another job but quietly and in the mean time just keep your head down and do as well as you reasonably can.
In a way I agree with this.  I've had some assignments that were mostly bad, but as soon as I made the internal decision that I would simply ride them out and move on at the next opportunity, suddenly my attitude changed, and things that would have bothered me became less significant.  

Let me refer to these states of attitude as the "old" me and the "new" me, for the sake of illustration.

For example:  Client makes ill-advised decision that will have major consequences in future years?  The "old" me might have argued and tried repeatedly to show the risks and a better option.  The client would have perceived this as insubordinate or not "being a team player".  Watching them knowingly do the wrong thing would grate on my nerves and I'd see all the predictable problems developing.

The "new" me would realize those future problems won't be mine, and the decision isn't mine to make.  I'd clearly and concisely suggest to the right person an alternative, and why, and then leave it to them.  Done properly, this is seen as principled and constructive.

Sometimes this would come back to pay off when people realized I was the one who knew ahead of time.  But the key to this is not bringing it up ever again after the first time.  

Once you make that decision that your life doesn't depend on that job, the sky opens .  You no longer feel bad about leaving on time.  You do the best you can in the time provided, but without energy-sapping fear and distraction.  You can (silently) laugh off your boss's dumb decisions.  Bullying colleagues just become temporary amusements, not the jail wardens of your career.  

In my experience, a funny thing tends to happen.  Your care-free attitude is perceived as positive, and you exclude the impression of a balanced employee who is secure in their person and not a threat to the authority or a malignancy.  I would find myself being treated much better once I realized a temporary bad placement was just that: temporary.  Raises or opportunities would look for me instead of the other way around.  In time, the bosses would clash with other frustrated workers, usually resulting in the departure of one or the other.  Sometimes the resulting changes would turn a terrible placement into a genuinely good one.  
Candice Bergen is a clear liar, which should have be predictable given her slavish devotion to the CPC.  

But CBC's Chris Glover really misinterpreted the cartoon.  He strangely confused the Stephen Harper character for an "imposing event organizer".  How can he have missed that?
That's not erring on the side of caution, that's just erring - badly.
That's sort of generally True, though not always.  It depends on the culture and the situation.  But often when someone is working crazy long hours they aren't well rested, they make mistakes, and they are unpleasant.  

Then they acquire an over-developed sense of responsibility, that they are the savior of the company, and that because of their sacrifices, they should be given a pass on other things, which they deem as secondary to their heroics.  

I've seen lots of these prima donnas.  Hey where's Joe today, it's almost noon?  Oh it's Ok, he was here til midnight  fixing the computer system.  Joe skips meetings and training because he's always doing something "more important".  

But when he screws up or misses something because he wasnt at the meeting, again that's because he's a hero.  

Joe doesnt have time for little housekeeping thinks like filling out his time card, documenting stuff, or updating the project log.  Or explaining what he did, or sharing his progress with others.  He's allowed to be rude and doesnt have the patience to share his special knowledge with the junior staff.  Pretty soon the whole place is stepping around him, because he's the special guru who saves the day during emergencies and you need him... Except he creates nearly as many fires as he extinguishes, and breeds a bad working atmosphere.  Moral of the story: don't turn into Joe.
Wow, that was a fairly candid report from the Harper campaign.  Clearly Robert Fife isn't looking for a conservative senate appointment (unlike certain corrupt former journalist-senators). 

And whoever is dressing Harper really blew it on this day.
I'll confess to feeling a twinge of satisfaction and justice to hear that jerks like Paul Calandra and Joe Oliver are forecast to lose their seats.  

Still, I'm not naive. The old boys club will find cushy spots for these cretins.  But for at least one day they'll feel the sting of joblessness and rejection that they've directly imposed on millions of innocent Canadians. This reminds me of when that school banned the Barenaked Ladies because the idiot principal thought it was nude women.
First past the post, it's what can give a party 100% of the power with only 35% of the votes.
Nothing as romantic as when your guy tries to prove you're wrong about something trivial
Loved the trailer, even the driving background music.  This will be 4 hours of quotable gold.
Except ["The Joke: The Musical"](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=PLDGoEh7jqA) is probably the best sketch of the series.
It's a myth that jobs building automation exceed those it replaces.  Think about it for 2 seconds, industry doesnt want to replace low wage workers with high wage workers in equal measure.    

As for your contention that if robots threatened jobs, there'd be a snap back reaction, well sorry but we've already seen millions of jobs killed with offshoring, and so far, there hasn't been any significant opposition take hold.  Sheep just praise corporations for being such great capitalists.
Technically it's a British remake of the Swedish series.  All that happened for the Amercian broadcasts is they removed huge chunks of scenes to pack in extra commercials.
It was sort of a neat, fun series.  I wish they hadn't gotten so metaphysical with it by the end.
It's more about what it takes to get access to a Julliard education.
It's the same way that for the most part, Americans eat garbage and read garbage and elect garbage and promote garbage.  Well [here's what I said](http://www.reddit.com/r/LateShow/comments/3nbikm/one_month_in/) after the first month of shows had aired.It was a wickedly funny Pink Floyd reference.
Seemed to be an increased amount of the absurdist humor today, the TED Talks and especially the on air meeting, which I'm inclined to believe was real.  

Now looking forward to the payoff of the Rituals piece with the live chicken (?!)
Downsides were he kind of brushed Carey Mulligan aside and I found he was fawning over Elvis Costello a bit much.What I heard was four 30 minute episodes plus some kind of behind the scenes/backgrounder episode.
According to Robert Fife anyway.  From my point of view any finance minister that calls a deficit budget a surplus just because his maniac boss said it has to be a surplus to activate a megaton of election spending promises deserves to get clobbered at the polls.  


Never mind the fact he was incompetently late tabling a budget, which screwed the provincial finance planning.  

Then the way he's gone into complete hiding?  Three strikes and you're out Joe Oliver.
The guy was a relentless talking head for Harper, he would say literally anything with no regard to the truth.  
Well actually probably not.  Fife already had his piece, the sudden cancel would have more effect on the host and the show producer.
What's the difference between paying an Asian child $1/hour to assemble Apple Watches versus running a robot that averages $1/hour in maintenance costs?  
Well Blacklist has been [ripping off Nathan For You](http://www.fastcocreate.com/3052081/image-of-the-day/if-the-billboard-for-nathan-for-you-looks-familiar-there-is-a-hilarious-rea). 

Season 3 staring this week!
For the 26th time in a row, that seemed forced
Darn, Stephen jumped on what would have been a hilarious and typical Sarah Silverman punch line ("I'll just flash the top of my pubes")
Stephen trying to tell the home kitchen story was kind of clumsy, and it just made me remember how incredible Letterman used to be with telling those unscripted 10 minute slice of his personal life stories.  Stephen's talents lie elsewhere :-(
Congrats, how did you get the photo?
Well that Zelda conductor has a lot of zazz.Not really. Dave is mostly reclusive and spent all his free time at his home or ranch.  But he could do a 10 minute story just about one small real life event and make it hilarious.I'm seeing lots of online ads from Elections Canada looking for workers.  Are they rapidly trying to staff up, or are these ads just running in the wrong schedule?
Finally, although she should have been canned for conflict of interest.  Here's hoping the next wave of CBC journalists have a shred of ethics.  

And here's a tip to CBC brass: quit trying to play "starmaker" with your hosts.  Let their work and merit do the job.  Constantly promoting them as celebrities does more harm than good, and it's unnecessary.
I've [praised the Late Show with Stephen Colbert](http://www.reddit.com/r/LateShow/comments/3nbikm/one_month_in/) on many occasions.  But it's undeniable that it was clumsy when he went unscripted last night.I don't know about that.  Yes I agree the overall appearance wasnt her best.  He stepped on her opening bit and he got a little carried away with praising her.  And reading the bad jokes was kind of a flop, even though she did add a bit of life to it.  I liked the story of how her careless joke tweet turned into a news "fact".
I found myself wondering promotional consideration changed hands, maybe does Nintendo fund the orchestra or something?  That's not exactly how money works.  A "billion dollar" industry doesn't just hand over 100% of every dollar of revenue.  And the dollar value of drug trade is wildly over-stated by law enforcement's bias to fluff the public relations value of their seizures.  

Think about it.  If you bought $950 worth of pot and sold it for $1000, you didn't "make" $1000, you made $50. 

Please note that I'm not necessarily against reforming drug laws, but just trying to inject some financial reality.These ads are sleazy campaigning at it's worst.  And it's cynical and revealing they are doing them with foreign language only.
I see many people commenting didnt read the story.  Also, some appear to considering this based on a naive assumption of a clean and sanitized life.  

In the real world, things get a lot more fuzzy.  People who swear abuse against each other one day and back in love the next.  Children, poverty, depression, survival... all can factor into cases like this.  

For those who didnt read, the crux of the issue is she applied for the protection order, the JP found that the last incident was 5-6 week prior, and decided that didn't fit the criteria for immediate danger.  I don't even know the typical standards being applied and whether or not that was a normal or typical decision.

In hindsight of course we can see it was wrong.  But what are the common law standards for such a denial?
$1000 worth of pot for $50?  Doubtful.
I'm disappointed to see this mostly bullshit story and misleading headline getting circle jerked for the umpteenth time this month.  

First off, this guy isn't an inventor.  He sells overpriced crap in a small bottle with unproven health claims.  He hasn't given "99%" of his fortune away, he's pledging to give a a certain amount to research, an amount that will eventually total most of his current value, but neglects the fact his current worth will grow.  And besides, he has so much that these sums become meaningless.  It's like you or me offering to give away hundreds of dollars we don't need.  
  
His track record is not good, so how about we wait til he actually does something good before we shower his with congratulations?
It's a fallacy, like wondering how Coke can sell 1 cent of sugar water for $2, by ignoring and discounting 50 intermediate steps.

In a Chinese paper.  I'd like to see them run this in the National Post.  Ok, I don't mean that I would actually *like* them to do that, but that there's a clear reason why they place ads like this where they do.
Whoever conceived of this ad deserves to be sentenced to live with Kory Tenecke for 20 years.
Did I see Rob Ford sitting back of home plate during the early innings?  Not joking, I thought it was him.
Maybe it was the so called "lizard of oz", but do we know that for sure?
Cannot wait.
This is how you know a Trevor Noah joke/tweet is his:  

-  if it's funny: not his
-  not funny: probably his
Maybe Trevor never heard of Dave Chappelle. Grow Op has a shit load of overhead too, people just dont realize it. 
Attack ads and fear mongering about boogeyman terrorists have been the CPC's hallmark since long before that guy showed up.
The fact you'd have to attribute bullshit like "you expect him to stay at the Super 8" reveals the emptiness of your argument.  

He can stay in a regular room at the Fairmont.  I do.  It's nice.  If he wants the luxury upgrade, he can pay for it out of his own pocket.  We already pay him multiple 6 figures, plus a multi-million dollar pension, plus we pay for many of his expenses that the rest of us working slobs have to waste our own after-tax money on.  

Last minute flight changes other than a natural disaster or health emergency are almost certainly caused by incompetent planning or personal entitlement.  Again, if he screwed up his schedule, requiring expensive changes, then admit to ineptitude and resign.  If it's for personal convenience, then peel a few buck off his fat personal stack and pay up.   

You saying that taking a dim view of abusing public money is "ignorant"...?  That's naive.

And the old "you have to pay for top talent" bullshit argument.  As if a politician has ever been "top talent".  

I'll agree with if and when the day comes that this so-called "top talent" comes with a full money back guarantee.  That way, after we've seen that Joe Oliver was anything but "top talent", we get to claw back his entire wage, expenses and benefits back to the taxpayers.  Deal?
How much does a 500 acre farm cost?  With free utilities?  And magic workers that don't consume wages or resources?  And the workers need to have wings and flying ability so as to avoid any transportation costs. 

Or it isn't be easier to admit that nobody, not even a druggie, is going to sell $1000 worth of pot to you, me, or anyone for $50
I applaud you for volunteering to pay for the cost of foundation and replacement water systems for anyone affected!  Since "they are so minor they shouldn't even be worried about", this probably won't even cost you anything.  Seems to several possibilities.  Some of them: 

a - the doctor is a loose cannon, seeing risk and harm where there's not legitimate science  

b - the doctor is valid, and poses a threat to government and business interests that don't want these threats publicized by an authority figure.  

c - the doctor has done some personal or professional behavior that's objectively unacceptable for the workplace (e.g. Harassment, theft, etc). 

d - the doctor has done some minor misconduct that's being overinflated to the level of unacceptable (e.g. Checking her Facebook at work). 


So we could be looking at various permutations of these, like a-d, or b-d, or just c or just a.  But if it's just b, or just d then we have a problem here.
Ok good to know you'll repair foundations and replace water sources damaged by fracking.  You rich?
Might want to learn what the word tantrum is, and while you're at it, learn what the numerals "10" mean.  Which episode did Jon Stewart do ten Jewish mother impersonations, or are you just spouting False nonsense?  

And the more relevant question is how many cringeworthy impersonations did Jon Stewart do, and then compare that with Trevor Noah's already voluminous collection of cringeworthy ones he inflicts on a ~~nightly~~ Daily basis. 
Oh it's definitely not about the look.  It's about the sheer dullness and complete void of comedy.  No.  If people are confrontational, *that* may lead to harsh measures and stricter powers. 



Having a plain table showing current and new rates is fine. Outside of /r/Canada, the "layman" isn't that stupid as to not understand.

Embedding partisan branding, leading headlines, lengthy commentary on the political motivations and the expected social outcomes, and misleading and irrelevant pseudo-statistics?  That's not fine.
No, I meant what I said.  If the only way you can attack me is to misquote and misrepresent me, then you've already lost any credibility.
You're the one claiming no consequences, so put your money where your mouth is.  You're on record saying you believe there's no damage, so unless you're lying, that means you believe your cost will be zero.  This challenge is a bit stacked against you because we happen to know otherwise, but if you're going to spread False information, it should be challenged and there should be a corrective action.

It would be nice for you to learn this in a free and easy way by doing some research, but if learning by having to pay to fix someone's foundation or water system is your choice, that works too.
Conservation, efficiency, renewable energy.  

We currently have more NG on hand than we can even deal with, so much so that we're going to wasteful measures to store it and we're even burning it off into the atmosphere.  

Why?  To try and prolong faulty and unsustainable government and corporate structures.  

Why are governments and corporations still extracting our finite fossil fuels at a record pace, even though they they're losing money on each unit, and even though we can't even come close to burning it as fast as we're pumping it? Simple: to feed today's immediate thirst for cash, even though the medium and long term consequences are dismal.

They're pumping like mad, creating a death spiral of excess supply and lower prices, leading to even lower prices and more excess supply.  And yet it does.  

Did you watch the Gavin "Know Your Rights" video I posted here?    It's fairly illustrative about the advantage of friendly, harmless cooperation.At least if you're going to chicken out, cluck.
That's one way to try and cover for your incompetence.Maybe someone can do a puppet show for you to understand these difficult concepts.
Learn what tax fraud is.
From the headline, I thought this article would be from 2009.  Dollarama's claim that even 30-40% of products are $1 has be using some kind of creative criteria because it's not that way in store.  

And their products are often of such low quality they aren't worth the buck.
###Conservation, efficiency, and renewables
* By **conserving** a therm, that's one less therm to frack.  

* An **efficiency** change that saves a therm, that's one less therm to frack.  

* Satisfying a therm of energy need with **renewable** sources, that's one less therm to frack.  


Blatchford is known for the side shots.  But ignoring that, I'm questioning the defence's wisdom of having old Duff giving this long and drawn out self-interest story.  

They were doing quite well to draw out the prosecution's case into a maze that can set the stage for confusing and ambiguity.  But the defence should be short and sharp: that he was more of a pawn in the Harper government's complex and deceptive schemes and machinations. 
 "I did what the top people running Canada told me to do" could actually be a good defence.  Bloviating about how smart and savvy and experienced and integrated and all-knowing?  That undercuts such a defence as it sends the message that Duffy could have and in fact did know that much of what he was doing was wrong and illegal.
Whether or not you deliver on the quid pro quo of a bribe doesn't change the culpability for the bribery, it just makes it easier to prove.It was hard for me to see (or care) which side was getting the bias as see both Duffy and the Harper regime as ultra right wing demons, who just happen to be fighting each other in this scenario.  

Her standard low blows were present; Things like weirdly conflating sleep apnea with an ability to sit on the stand and talk for two hours.There's actually lots of respectable journalists.  The problem is many are unknown to you because they work at poverty level salaries and have no name recognition.You're not using the term "buzzword" correctly, and just insulting me for no good reason.
Cringeworthy is subjective, but not necessarily "individual".  The vast majority of qualified critics and engaged fans and casual viewers share the same view.  Perhaps the mass majority are all wrong, but the view on his ability is overwhelmingly consistent. All are excellent alternatives to fracking more natural gas.
This rumor has become as embedded as the old one about Tim Horton's using a trace amount of cocaine "just below legally reportable levels of course"

But has it ever actually been substantiated?
That's why this is a story. McDonalds Canada hasn't followed the US in doing all day breakfast items.  They've been saying it's physically impossible, the same was the US as saying the same up until it wasn't.
The party system is garbage. But senators are not necessarily so whipped as the Commons.  Or is that why you had meant to say?  

Ideally, a senate would be unelected and composed of experienced and principled people whose mandate would be to make sure temporary sentiment didnt cause long term ruinous effects.
Someone has to watch it.  But if you don't like anyone reviewing the show, it's not mandatory to read or reach out about it.That's what I mean.  They're probably counting each color of construction paper or beads as 1 item each, so 300 low value pieces of paper or plastic at $1 offsets 300 high turnover $2 and $3 SKU's.I remember this one well.  It was actually very funny.  I do wish they would have just done it straight, without all the nonsense about how nervous and unprepared they were.  For viewers, we aren't thinking about about the presenter's nerves or stage fright, so it breaks a wall that perhaps is unnecessary.  

Consider that they had a couple hours to prepare, and they did a show that surpasses anything that Trevor Noah has done so far... and he's had nearly a year of prep time and experience.  

Anyway, the reason Wyatt Cenac was the guest was because he was on staff at the time and they didnt go with the pre-booked guest in Jon's absence.  

Because Jason and Sam played up their nerves and quality, the lasting impression many have is that this episodes wasnt very good. But industry people saw it for what it was, and both were offered promotions soon afterward, which says it all.Yeah maybe you're right!
Comp'ing sodas for a DD is common.  Meal?  Never seen it, never heard it.
Would you say the Members in the HOC are free to vote however they like.
Every few days someone posts a negative review here, and the same tiny cabal who auto-downvotes me also votes it down with all of their alt-nicks. Doesn't change the overwhelming consensus of bad reviews, mass public apathy, or dismal viewership.Never said I was, but if you have to lie, perhaps it's because you have nothing else?

I merely listed his excellent impersonations which I think highlight the peak of his ability.  

You had a choice to post something of value, or maybe a list of 10 or 20 glowing reviews.  But instead you went on a deranged personal attack against someone who's never done a thing to you.  Might want to ask yourself why you'd do that.

Being vile to someone that never did anything to you is what you find funny?  Er, that's "interesting".

Please post proof of my identical posts. If you can't, just post your apology for lying instead.  

In the meantime, notice the irony of your identical double spam attack posts:  

[Attack post one](https://www.reddit.com/r/DailyShow/comments/3w0x3d/december_8_2015_sec_thomas_perez_the_daily_show/cxtp1eh)

[Identical attack post two](https://www.reddit.com/r/DailyShow/comments/3w0x3d/december_8_2015_sec_thomas_perez_the_daily_show/cxtk8af)More awesome impersonations today!  Can't stop laughing.

Donald Trump, Michael Lee and Kelly Lee, more Trump, toddlers cheering for smog, Maldives President Mohamed Nasheed, 60's stoner, thespian enthusiast.Have to be honest... found the Ronnie Cheng piece really flat.
For some reason I think I'd enjoy Ronnie Chieng just going off on various subjects. But this seemed too scripted and not in a good way.More unprovoked and off topic personal attacks?   Why are you trying to drag this subreddit off topic and sucker punch people in an attempt to start fights?  

I'm not going to fight you, I'm worried about your well being.
versusgorilla: "I'm not normally one to say, "then leave!"

Except you did.  
You may want to review the rules for this subreddit.  Of note is the fact I have never violated a single rule, but you've violated the number one rule several times just today:  

##1 - Don't be rude, disrespectful, or a troll to other users 

##2 - Don't post memes or image macros. 

##3 - Check that your submission hasn't been posted already

##4 - Don't spam. 

##5 - Don't post pirated links to full episodes or ask/talk about them. 


You're welcome to create a new subreddit with a different rule set.  For example you could make a rule that only posts with effusive praise for Trevor Noah will be permitted.   This sub will remain open to fair discussion that complies with the stated rules, and that includes both praise and criticism.
TBS over to the Tiffany network?
They form the bulk of what is now The Daily Show and they are very representative of the quality. 

But I don't own the reporting of these, anyone is welcome to do it and post what they like. If you wanted to pitch and help me that would be great!
Do you you mean Tim Harper and Larry Obama, or are you talking about the more famous guys with those surnames?
Not a dude LOL but Ronnie seems to have potential saying shocking things, it's just that in this one the writing seem really off.

The "Jewish" correspondent seemed capable, but doing the Jewish schtick is on the nose, so I'd like to see what else he can do.  

It's fine when it's relevant (like the GOP candidates all pandering and pretending Yentyl is their favorite movie) but not if it's being forced.That's quite inaccurate, and please don't try to pretend that Trevor Noah's problem is the writers fault.  

I don't hate the things you say but I rightfully condemn cybertrolling behavior, lynch mobs, and those who attack the messenger and try to enforce some artificial fanboy standard while they are the ones violating the sub rules.  You could make your own fan sub with a "glowing praise only" rule if that's what you want, and leave the free speech for this sub.

No, more impersonations was an abbreviation of "Here are more impersonations" not "we want more impersonations".  

All across the internet, in post after post, lots of people are just saying "Trevor Noah sucks".  I'm taking the more enlightened  approach of being objective and citing what's good and what's bad, providing a potential roadmap to how he could, if willing, become better, and what lazy tics and habits might be better to learn and grow out of.  

Attacking me and calling me offensive names seems to be an interesting way for you to spend your life.
What I'm doing is respectful and on topic. Why are you obsessively attacking someone who never did anything to you?
This piece was particularly not funny.  Ronnie Chieng has been on a couple times previously, and this may be his actual voice. Yeah there's a concerted effort especially around here to create a False narrative that Jon Stewart sucked really badly, presumably as apologist tactics for those trying to deny the broad consensus about how poorly Trevor Noah is performing.   

They took a gamble with Trevor Noah and it's clearly been a mistake.  Sadly, it was so avoidable.  They could have just watched his old sitcom and stand up work and seen what he's like.  Or they could have reviewed his writing and tweets.  Or they could have looked to his decidedly sub-par appearances as a correspondent.  Or they could even have test-auditioned him.  

But nope, they, or allegedly, Jon Stewart, decided to take a flyer on him without any of the prudent vetting steps.  Sometimes gambles work, and sometimes they fail.


I've said this before, actually using several of these exact statements.  You might not have read it here though, since I get auto-voted by a few vocals.  

Anyone who tries claiming Jon Stewart and Stephen Colbert sucked when they debuted is lying in order to justify what's happening with Trevor Noah.
Trevor Noah is struggling (and failing) to even substitute host the existing Daily Show, even with the benefit of its halo status and decades of good will.  In that context, any notion that he's going to transform and transcend the entire genre is kind of laughable.  He should try and achieve one decent episode of TV before anyone says he's going to revolutionize the entire medium.

Your contention that he's the mastermind of changing The Daily Show away from its roots is belied every episode when it does the same things (mocking conservative blowhards and right wing media) as it has always done. 

He can't do a segment without awkwardly stumbling from prompter, he giggles inappropriately and incessantly, and the interviewers have been cloying messes.  

You saying he's poised to do all these amazing things would be more credible if he wasn't struggling to even do the basics.  A good parallel is Donald Trump claiming he will transform the economy when he can't even run casinos and hotels without regular and recurring bankruptcy problems.
And repeatedly violating the sub rules.
I believe you didnt. Under Trevor Noah, this sub only gets a couple dozen posts per episode (compared to many TV shows which garner thousands). 

With such a small sample, there's a handful of haters who instant downvote anything I post under all their accounts so it's quickly removed from view.  

The common excuse given for Trevor is that he's "new".  As if his many years of touring standup and hosting and sitcom work doesn't exist.  Or they claim he just arrived in America, apparently falling for the fake characterization that Trevor Noah ~~abuses~~ uses in standup.  This is belied by the fact he's been in the USA for several years, even working in NYC on The Daily Show for the last couple.  

They also like to pretend Colbert wasnt amazing and news-making from his very first episode, and that Jon Stewart needed 17 years to become good.  Nope.  Jon Stewart was already a successful comic when he landed the job, and was an icon by 2001.  That's the reason people were keen to see his reaction after 9-11.  It's like these apologists don't know some of us were around who can refute their revisionist history.
Personal attacks just reveal the emptiness of your position.  Until Trevor Noah does something good for you to talk about, all you can do is attack people and shoot the messenger.  
Not super fluent with Jeopardy, but wasn't this a bit foolhardy, not necessarily smart?  

Wouldn't a better move be to bet the largest amount necessary to trump the other players and leave them mathematically incapable of catching up - but not necessarily leaving yourself exposed to the possibility of being completely wiped out?
 Ambulance driver: "I was blocked by cab number 12345 at 10:42 am on Dec 8"

That's all the info needed to identify the culprit.
Great to see SBC again.  The movie looked intriguing, with some funny parts and some meh.  As usual, I fear the best lines have already been shown in the trailer.
These ratings are more about location than quality.  Being on TBS by it's very nature limits the numbers.  And NBC could literally run one of SNL's weakest performers and still get #1.
Timing for this announcement is because the season 3 finale airs tonight.
versusgorilla: "call you a dumb nerd"  

You = Liar
Just pointing out a blatant lie.  Hopefully you follow the subreddit rules after your suspension.
baribigbird06: "Honestly, do you really have nothing better to do than watch a show you don't like every night and then complain about it". 

Isn't 500 times more creepy that you're going off topic and harassing someone who's never done anything to you?  
Your entire post is off topic and is yet another violation of the first rule of this subreddit.

Please note the subreddit rules and stop chronically violating them.
Please review the subreddit rules and stop committing constant violations.
We see Nathan in a secret location with the makeup crew removing the facial disguise.  They're peeling it off slowly, millimeter by millimeter, using lubricant and swabs to help release the mask that's fused to his real skin.

Cut to the real Corey doing an interview with local ABC news.  The anchors praise Corey: "Bravo to him!"

Corey introduces Jasmine to his grandparents.  Grandfather says, "He's incredible. You did something I never thought would be possible... from you."

Grandmother says "So what happens now.....?" and while her voice fades out and the music swells, the camera focus shifts down the block. In the distance we see a forlorn Nathan Fielder, now changed into a non-descript outfit. He turns and walks away slowly, head down.

ABSO LUTELYSuch a brilliant piece of absurdist television.  

He created a unique experience for several people.  Even we the television audience got to enjoy be fooled a little bit, when a real tightrope walker took over for the actual stunt.They were chosen to headline one (or two) shows of their own.
Impersonation tracker: Gun range enthusiast, delirious audience member.
What was the misinformation?
Liar.  With no provocation, you instigated a smear campaign of insults and obsessive attacks.  

You've incessantly broken the rules of this subreddit which prohibit that kind of abuse and harassment.  

I've made sure not to respond in kind.
The height and the hands and the stunting were giveaways.  And you don't just pick up 6-story tightrope walking ability by doing it casually for a few months.
Finally, a mostly decent episode.  It started off badly, but mercifully and quickly switched to a two part field piece.  

Then the guest mostly took over the interview, reducing the influence of the host.  They should study this format and why this particular episode was better than the rest.

You had a chance to substantiate your claim of "misinformation" and came up with... nothing.
He's pulling a Ronda Rousey.Taking a full paycheque while half-assing it?  Thanks, Harper.  And all the other MP's who already have the cushiest job in Canada who do this.

Your father-in-law is obviously assuming there's still some sense of fairness and common sense in the provincial labour laws, but there isn't.  Waves of politicians purchased by business interests have thoroughly gutted worker protections to the point that anyone can be fired for no reason. 

Your father in law's flaw is in assuming he has to come up with a reason.  Slick companies don't do that.  They simply terminate someone and say it wasnt the employee's fault and they offer that them a very small amount of pay in lieu.  The labour stipulates how much, it varies by jurisdiction but usually a matter of a couple weeks of pay.  Then there's common law, which sometimes calls for a little bit more on top of that.  

By not blaming the employee, it makes it very hard for the fired employee to do anything except take the tiny payment and leave.  They can hire a lawyer and push for an extra couple weeks of pay, but then the issue becomes whether the delays and legal costs will offset the small extra pay.  

If the employee wants to claim they were fired illegitimately, the bar is incredibly high, and all the evidence is held (or more realistically lost) by the employer.  

It sounds like your father in law wants to fire employees on the spot and pay them nothing if they committed misconduct.  That's still possible, through tracking the proof and building a strong case.  A strong enough case will often discourage a terminated employee because they'd rather not be in a long process of explaining why company video shows them stealing or whatever.   But realistically, for minor infractions like taking a long lunch or gossiping, it's infinitely easier to just say Bob is fired for no reason, pay the small "go-away" fee, and that's it.

Sure, but paying severance to a bunch of uppity employees is meaningless to the billionaire owners of Walmart.  So they just click a button, pay some paltry amount that they deduct from the dividend pension payments of their investors, and go to sleep happy knows they've terrorized all their other workers never to try and work together collectively.  


Ideally, we'd re-write our labor laws and make this kind of action punishable with long prison sentences for company executives involved.  Then, and only then, would these rules have any effect.Canada and Australia (both commonwealth countries) use the same philosophies and practically identical border rules.
I've done a lot of business travel and gifting, and guess what: the love for maple syrup isn't quite as universal as one might think.  

It makes sense.  Just because we love something doesn't mean everyone else in the world does.  Some people find it too hackneyed, some don't like sweets, and some are just accustomed to their corn-syrup flavored simu-syrup, and think the real stuff is over-powering.  Lots will accept it politely but not really care.  And also, it's a bit of a myth that maple trees taste difference in say Vermont than they do across the border.  

A good parallel is Vegemite.  It's fun to give and receive, but few people outside of Australia actually crave the stuff.
Lol, for economic emergencies is more like it. It's just a market stabilizer.
If that flute was from the dollar store, I'm surprised it didn't snap in half just from the child's breath pressure.
Rule #1: **Don't be rude, disrespectful, or a troll to other users**
See that's a little more like it.There's a huge spectrum of this, ranging from zero to one hundred.  Undercover Boss is around 125.
Directors get older but starlets stay the same age forever
4 weeks per year of service is at the high range.  And even for those who would get that, corporations play this game of lowballing first and dragging it out.  Worst case, they actually have to pay it, but at an advantageously later date.  In many cases the subject either doesn't pursue it or settles for some lesser amount anyway. 
Story is super snopes-y.  Why 5 kg instead of 2 g?  Why months later?  Why would thieves hire Seal Team 6 to blow the door instead of just popping it with a coat hanger?  

Except legally they can tell you're no longer welcome on the property and you have to drive across town every time you need milk.Prepare for eons of utter boredom punctuated by seconds of fear and danger.  

PI's have to sit for hours on end doing nothing to get one fragment of info.  Or doing mundane interviews and calls.  Or they have to attend situations where someone dangerous is unhappy being monitored and is more than willing to lash out.About 2.5 each, yet they have quite different avg tuition, disproving your point.  Further disproving your point, Nova Scotia's tuition should be several multiples, but it's not.

Yes.  That other explanation sounded "truthy" but isn't fact-based.
Ah yes, Starbucks and Tim Horton's aren't to blame for fraudulent programs, it's the public that's to blame for being defrauded. I think you used the same argument that women who dress up deserve to be raped, they're so naive.
Perhaps, but on the other hand, suppose they chose him, and he did some diligence and decided they were basically a glorified tutoring center and that he wasnt going to throw his weight behind it just to impress his daughters.  Then they would have blown their chance.  

With Lori, you know she's going to be pumping their tires incessantly.  

I get Sacca's mass, but are the STEM girls better with a sure bird in hand, or one in the bush?
That's not how rankings work, it's not 880 out 316 million
I'm good with one per week, it promotes discussion and suspense.
There's varying levels of fines and seizures release amounts.  Personally I enjoy seeing liars like these get punished.  It rarely happens in regular life.Threads based on each pitch are more user friendly.  Humans want to discuss the various inventions, it's not important if it was block C in S05 and E12.
Yes, but reason he has no sales is that he hasn't launched yet.  If he had launched and had zero sales, that's different.Like I said, this kind of accessory already exists in the camping market.  You: trolling into a vacuum.  
I notice he has Woods (a common low-end camping brand) using his design and featuring it by name on their air bed.  He also seems have been selling his air mats on Kickstarter awhile back.You may correct me, but I think those Starbucks cans are cold/room temp, not served and held piping hot.
I experienced this same thing, but before the technology immersion.  Students were rampantly and blatantly cheating in assignments and exams.  The profs would point to the fact that certain study groups aced them as proof the assignments/exams must be appropriate.  The profs who were the most complicit with the cheating had higher class averages, which the administration decided means those are the best profs... And so the cycle repeated.
Actually the Sharks didnt say that. Your expression of it is far more reasoned than their's would have been anyway.  Their main thing is piggybacking on things that are already making money.  

Everything you say about Starbucks was True years ago, and could have been said to shoot down various ideas.  Except one of those ideas was Teavana, which went against all odds and made out like bandits.  Same with Blue Bottle.  Same with Blackberry cell phones. They owned the entire market, why go against them?

He already identified there are a variety of places where coffee is in demand but there's no desire to set up dedicated coffee infrastructure.  And with corporations doing everything they can to kill jobs, selling coffee without a barista could be an evil capitalist's dream come True.
The Globe and Mail article ineptly fails to give even a single detail of the death threats and "hate campaign".  They mention, without attribution, that one blogger disagreed with the original blogger.  That's some terrible reporting, and makes me question the legitimacy of this story.
Biermarkt is a douche magnet founded on pseudo-authenticity.  This is hardly surprising, and now the mass media is giving them free publicity and helping broadcast the message that many of their staff will be wearing the (optional) swimsuit dress.
How can anyone question the sincerity and motives of a family who takes money to have a reality TV crew film them?
I was sad that a guy with Hollywood money would use his influence to sell toxic products like "Reverse Mortgages"You aren't following me.  Example: we found a nice bed and breakfast several years ago.  We didnt use or pay a brokerage, but for educational purposes let's imagine we did.  

We like it so much we've used it 10 times since then.  After the initial visit, we knew them and they knew us. Neither of us has had any reason to use a broker for the subsequent 10 visits.
The mini-fridge just reverse its cycle so the prop used on the show is just a rudimentary cheap device.  But for a business considering adding this revenue stream, a mini-fridge/heater costs $50/year whereas adding a Barista costs $100/day.  Equity means ownership of the company, not the revenue.

Your example item selling for $1 probably costs to least 50 cents to make and anther 40 cents in overhead costs to run the company.  

So the $1 of revenue might only generate 10 cents in "profit".  But even so, the owners don't automatically receive that profit.  The company decides what to do with that 10 cents of net income.  They might use it to expand, or to develop new products, or save it for a rainy day.  They might give some or all of it to the owners, but that's rare not guaranteed.  

So given the choice of a 30 percent royalty or 30% equity, in most cases the royalty would be desirable.  

Of course it can backfire, as the royalty can make the product and price undesirable, and the company would fail and the royalties would stop.  ??? I never said anything about the prop fridge being a top of the line Subzero.  Why you throwing up strawmen that have nothing to do with what I said?  

If and when this goes to market, the maker will probably supply shams to hold the drinks, that's the prevailing model. The cost of the shams will be optimized for value/reliability and is immaterial to the overall business opportunity.  You're arguing miniscule issues, like claiming that coca cola will never succeed because it has to be kept cold, or because the red ink in their branding costs more than black ink.

If you can figure out a way to sell 20 cents worth of liquid for $5, that's massive massive massive massive profit.  Don't believe me?  Ask Starbucks. Ask Pepsi.  Ask Gatorade. Ask Redbull.  Ask the 5 Hour Enery billionaire.  

Obviously selling sugar water for a premium price requires some ancillary value/gimmick.  Coke uses advertising and sentiment, Red Bull does it by creating an adventure mindset, Gatorade promotes fake athletic prowess, etc.  

This guy's gimmick is hot and ready in a can with zero employee cost.  Will it work?  Maybe, maybe not.  It has worked elsewhere.  But for you to say no with a religious fanatic level of certainty, yet using False reasons?  Whatever.
If you put the same energy into schooling as you do trolling, you probably wouldn't be the way you are.
The people who think getting drunk and objectifying women will be *attracted* not repelled by this kind of publicity.  Your mentality of blaming the consumers is so delusional but it's consistent with your delusional views on women and other issues.
 The article is supposed to be about "death threats" and a "hate campaign" but then provide zero detail about either.  Who issued the threat?   What is the hate campaign and how is it manifested?  

Maybe this is a serious issue, but there's no actual facts or information in the article to substantiate it.  
Yeah this is my point.  With a multitude of free or cheap alternatives, why would buyer and seller give away hundreds of dollars to "rent like a champion"?
Keep on trolling troll
Your history of beverages summary shows you don't actually know anything about the category.  But I guess that could have been surmised by how you keep talking about a fridge keeping the drink cool. If you'd actually watched and understood the pitch, you'd know it's a canned HOT drink.  Funny that missed the one key point, but not surprising.  It's also telling that you project your own desire as if it rules the world.  I don't buy men's suits. But I wouldn't be stupid enough to say that's why Hugo Boss will fail. I don't watch NFL football, but I wouldn't be stupid enough to say that means the NFL won't work as a business.  Hot and cold beverages will exist with or without you.
Troll
In a litigious society, you go after the deep pockets. A lawyer wouldn't hesitate to speculate this guy was coming from a work function and suggesting the employer has some liability.I assume you meant AP's (Access Points) since "API's" are "Application Programming Interfaces". :-)The real headline here is that Chinese goods are nearly up to 60% quality.  That's a big improvement for them."And I got a pair of cycling shorts that were supposed to be adult large that were so tight I couldn't possibly wear them in public without getting arrested"  

Pic or it didnt happen :-)
What about even generalities, like who sent it or or what format?
Your standard mode is to blame the victim: "Woman gets raped because she wasnt careful, consumers to blame for believing corporate campaigns, etc"  

And your virulent response does nothing to help your toxic reputation.
There was not literally nothing to indicate that was even considered or intended.  And even the most mediocre of journalists could have reported the story in general terms without "giving it or it's (sic) perpetrators further time".
There's "experts in the show"?  Since when?  

And if you'd watched the episode, the Sharks all complimented the product. Sorry for letting facts get in your way.I'm all for free speech. Even by the dumb and xenophobic.We've had "gradual transition" of many kinds over the last few decades, and our grids and infrastructures have decided NOT kept up.
Go right ahead, but since insects seek warmth and seclusion, earmuffs and light would attract insects more than it would discourage them.
I would want to see you in real life without my partner or the police present. About 2.5 each, yet they have quite different avg tuition, disproving your point.  Further disproving your point, Nova Scotia's tuition should be several multiples, but it's not.

Yes.  That other explanation sounded "truthy" but isn't fact-based.
Ah yes, Starbucks and Tim Horton's aren't to blame for fraudulent programs, it's the public that's to blame for being defrauded. I think you used the same argument that women who dress up deserve to be raped, they're so naive.
Perhaps, but on the other hand, suppose they chose him, and he did some diligence and decided they were basically a glorified tutoring center and that he wasnt going to throw his weight behind it just to impress his daughters.  Then they would have blown their chance.  

With Lori, you know she's going to be pumping their tires incessantly.  

I get Sacca's mass, but are the STEM girls better with a sure bird in hand, or one in the bush?
That's not how rankings work, it's not 880 out 316 million
I'm good with one per week, it promotes discussion and suspense.
There's varying levels of fines and seizures release amounts.  Personally I enjoy seeing liars like these get punished.  It rarely happens in regular life.Threads based on each pitch are more user friendly.  Humans want to discuss the various inventions, it's not important if it was block C in S05 and E12.
Yes, but reason he has no sales is that he hasn't launched yet.  If he had launched and had zero sales, that's different.Like I said, this kind of accessory already exists in the camping market.  You: trolling into a vacuum.  
I notice he has Woods (a common low-end camping brand) using his design and featuring it by name on their air bed.  He also seems have been selling his air mats on Kickstarter awhile back.You may correct me, but I think those Starbucks cans are cold/room temp, not served and held piping hot.
I experienced this same thing, but before the technology immersion.  Students were rampantly and blatantly cheating in assignments and exams.  The profs would point to the fact that certain study groups aced them as proof the assignments/exams must be appropriate.  The profs who were the most complicit with the cheating had higher class averages, which the administration decided means those are the best profs... And so the cycle repeated.
Actually the Sharks didnt say that. Your expression of it is far more reasoned than their's would have been anyway.  Their main thing is piggybacking on things that are already making money.  

Everything you say about Starbucks was True years ago, and could have been said to shoot down various ideas.  Except one of those ideas was Teavana, which went against all odds and made out like bandits.  Same with Blue Bottle.  Same with Blackberry cell phones. They owned the entire market, why go against them?

He already identified there are a variety of places where coffee is in demand but there's no desire to set up dedicated coffee infrastructure.  And with corporations doing everything they can to kill jobs, selling coffee without a barista could be an evil capitalist's dream come True.
The Globe and Mail article ineptly fails to give even a single detail of the death threats and "hate campaign".  They mention, without attribution, that one blogger disagreed with the original blogger.  That's some terrible reporting, and makes me question the legitimacy of this story.
Biermarkt is a douche magnet founded on pseudo-authenticity.  This is hardly surprising, and now the mass media is giving them free publicity and helping broadcast the message that many of their staff will be wearing the (optional) swimsuit dress.
How can anyone question the sincerity and motives of a family who takes money to have a reality TV crew film them?
I was sad that a guy with Hollywood money would use his influence to sell toxic products like "Reverse Mortgages"You aren't following me.  Example: we found a nice bed and breakfast several years ago.  We didnt use or pay a brokerage, but for educational purposes let's imagine we did.  

We like it so much we've used it 10 times since then.  After the initial visit, we knew them and they knew us. Neither of us has had any reason to use a broker for the subsequent 10 visits.
The mini-fridge just reverse its cycle so the prop used on the show is just a rudimentary cheap device.  But for a business considering adding this revenue stream, a mini-fridge/heater costs $50/year whereas adding a Barista costs $100/day.  Equity means ownership of the company, not the revenue.

Your example item selling for $1 probably costs to least 50 cents to make and anther 40 cents in overhead costs to run the company.  

So the $1 of revenue might only generate 10 cents in "profit".  But even so, the owners don't automatically receive that profit.  The company decides what to do with that 10 cents of net income.  They might use it to expand, or to develop new products, or save it for a rainy day.  They might give some or all of it to the owners, but that's rare not guaranteed.  

So given the choice of a 30 percent royalty or 30% equity, in most cases the royalty would be desirable.  

Of course it can backfire, as the royalty can make the product and price undesirable, and the company would fail and the royalties would stop.  ??? I never said anything about the prop fridge being a top of the line Subzero.  Why you throwing up strawmen that have nothing to do with what I said?  

If and when this goes to market, the maker will probably supply shams to hold the drinks, that's the prevailing model. The cost of the shams will be optimized for value/reliability and is immaterial to the overall business opportunity.  You're arguing miniscule issues, like claiming that coca cola will never succeed because it has to be kept cold, or because the red ink in their branding costs more than black ink.

If you can figure out a way to sell 20 cents worth of liquid for $5, that's massive massive massive massive profit.  Don't believe me?  Ask Starbucks. Ask Pepsi.  Ask Gatorade. Ask Redbull.  Ask the 5 Hour Enery billionaire.  

Obviously selling sugar water for a premium price requires some ancillary value/gimmick.  Coke uses advertising and sentiment, Red Bull does it by creating an adventure mindset, Gatorade promotes fake athletic prowess, etc.  

This guy's gimmick is hot and ready in a can with zero employee cost.  Will it work?  Maybe, maybe not.  It has worked elsewhere.  But for you to say no with a religious fanatic level of certainty, yet using False reasons?  Whatever.
If you put the same energy into schooling as you do trolling, you probably wouldn't be the way you are.
The people who think getting drunk and objectifying women will be *attracted* not repelled by this kind of publicity.  Your mentality of blaming the consumers is so delusional but it's consistent with your delusional views on women and other issues.
 The article is supposed to be about "death threats" and a "hate campaign" but then provide zero detail about either.  Who issued the threat?   What is the hate campaign and how is it manifested?  

Maybe this is a serious issue, but there's no actual facts or information in the article to substantiate it.  
Yeah this is my point.  With a multitude of free or cheap alternatives, why would buyer and seller give away hundreds of dollars to "rent like a champion"?
Keep on trolling troll
Your history of beverages summary shows you don't actually know anything about the category.  But I guess that could have been surmised by how you keep talking about a fridge keeping the drink cool. If you'd actually watched and understood the pitch, you'd know it's a canned HOT drink.  Funny that missed the one key point, but not surprising.  It's also telling that you project your own desire as if it rules the world.  I don't buy men's suits. But I wouldn't be stupid enough to say that's why Hugo Boss will fail. I don't watch NFL football, but I wouldn't be stupid enough to say that means the NFL won't work as a business.  Hot and cold beverages will exist with or without you.
Troll
In a litigious society, you go after the deep pockets. A lawyer wouldn't hesitate to speculate this guy was coming from a work function and suggesting the employer has some liability.I assume you meant AP's (Access Points) since "API's" are "Application Programming Interfaces". :-)The real headline here is that Chinese goods are nearly up to 60% quality.  That's a big improvement for them."And I got a pair of cycling shorts that were supposed to be adult large that were so tight I couldn't possibly wear them in public without getting arrested"  

Pic or it didnt happen :-)
What about even generalities, like who sent it or or what format?
Your standard mode is to blame the victim: "Woman gets raped because she wasnt careful, consumers to blame for believing corporate campaigns, etc"  

And your virulent response does nothing to help your toxic reputation.
There was not literally nothing to indicate that was even considered or intended.  And even the most mediocre of journalists could have reported the story in general terms without "giving it or it's (sic) perpetrators further time".
There's "experts in the show"?  Since when?  

And if you'd watched the episode, the Sharks all complimented the product. Sorry for letting facts get in your way.I'm all for free speech. Even by the dumb and xenophobic.We've had "gradual transition" of many kinds over the last few decades, and our grids and infrastructures have decided NOT kept up.
Go right ahead, but since insects seek warmth and seclusion, earmuffs and light would attract insects more than it would discourage them.
I would want to see you in real life without my partner or the police present. If we have some arbiter that decides what speech is good versus bad, then it's not really free is it?
Please stop creeping and threatening me. We already know you'll be removing the text of your posts as you always do.
I try to stay at brands I know like Hilton so I have an educated guess as to the quality. The wacky premise that everyone in the group will be split up (as claimed in the pitch) has never happened to me, and seems a far-fetched concern anyway.

Or you could search airbnb, Craigslist, etc and find various web sites that don't charge hundreds of dollars of overhead for a brief stay. 
Well if the other person's best argument is that non-expert TV attention hounds probably said something bad except we didn't see it because of editing, then what's the point?   I could claim they said all kinds of things that weren't shown. I quite disagree. A blow-hard is someone who goes on and on, or overstates a dubious premise. This guy was efficient with his words, and stuck straight to the facts. He was the embodiment of non-blowhard.

Getting more Sharks isn't necessarily good. Each Shark you add is one more set of delays, diligence, and risk. Plus you've seen how they disagree when the cameras are on? Now imagine their behavior when the cameras are off, and when the money actually has to be committed, instead of the non-binding TV "offers".  

Better to get a strategic and focused single Shark for certain ventures.  

As for competing with Patagonia, that's never been the intent.  He'll sell his method to Patagonia for inclusion on their products. I've already seen his concept added to Woods branded gear, and they promote it as a main feature and they have his brand prominently displayed on the box and in the description.Whenn was your last eye check?  :-)Unfortunately, it often does.As someone who changed their view on this years ago, I can say that there's some foundational basis behind it.  Many cultures and religions promote having children, something that homosexuality can't do.  There's also the obvious compatibility of female and male couplings that seems undeniable, and the extreme rarity of actual homosexuality in the animal kingdom, and bible passages that fairly clearly denounce homosexuality.  These things could easily influence an otherwise reasonable person to become biased.Much is made of Harper's "ten year" mandate. That's shading the truth.  For much of it, he was Prime Minister via a tenuous situation of interim/minority government.  Even then he rankled some with his tricky methods of prolonging power. 

To me, his real legacy is defined by his majority mandate in which his unrestricted and True self was revealed.  It lasted 4 years, but within two years he'd offended and harmed Canada in enough ways to earn widespread disdain.  The last two years have just been his slow and inevitable undoing.

So when I hear people speak of his "10 year mandate" I know that his real mandate was short, and he screwed it up so badly that he was soundly rejected at the first real opportunity.At least the Harper government didnt feel the need to call it the "Ministry of Finance And Pandering To Rich Corporations"
Something like this is a relevant reminder for things like school zones.  I heard lots of complaining that the "30 km/hr limit feels like standing still", but the difference in consequences if you strike a child running across the street should make those people reconsider.  

Update: my guess is this is the [source](http://humantransport.org/sidewalks/SpeedKills.htm)That's a niche opinion recently popularized through social media, but not well supported by facts or evidence.
People with your kind of selfishness and ignorance kill pedestrians. 

School zones **do** apply to high schools in most jurisdictions.  And to parks and playgrounds and ice rinks.  Why?  Because all students are made from the same organic matter that obeys the laws of physics when struck by a heavy metal object, making them susceptible to death from being hit by speeders.  

And the person you were irrationally angry with was being safe, while your rage and misinterpretation of the law was making you a double threat.  

The worst thing they did was add zero to 5 seconds to your trip.  Big deal.

... which makes sense, because kids playing at the school yard after school hours can still be struck and killed.Well the diagram has been simplified for TV purposes, but the following source references the 5% to 85% increase at speeds of 20 mph versus 40 mph:

*Source 1: Killing Speed and Saving Lives, UK Dept. of Transportation, London, England. See also Limpert, Rudolph. Motor Vehicle Accident Reconstruction and Cause Analysis. Fourth Edition. Charlottesville, VA. The Michie Company, 1994, p. 663.*

Someone blew past me in a double school zone this morning.  I had a nice long look at him at the next traffic light that we were waiting for alongside each other.  I reflected that he had no realization that speeding gained him nothing.  He jumped out of his seat when I honked as he was playing with his smart phone.  Probably posting to /r/Canada.What speed do you prefer when being hit by thousands of pounds of metal?
 

Says the guy who hid all his previous misogynist and threatening posts.  I said to please leave me alone and you are continuing to harass me.  Go away creep.
Nobody's taking about going 30 km/hr on a major highway.  Well, let me clarify: nobody credible.  There are, however, a large portion of Internet anti-science yahoos (especially in /r/Canada) who cling to the fictional anecdote of that one in million person going far too slow on the highway as if it somehow disproves the laws of physics which govern things like reaction time and braking distance.  

I provided the likely source.  And I'll add to your bit about 110 km/hr versus 100 km/hr comment by sharing the fact that **you are 400% more likely to die in a 120 km/hr collision as you are in a 100 km/hr collision**.  But keep spreading that internet "speed variance" misdirection I guess.
I can confirm that kids *do* play after 5 pm, but I'm based in reality so that may not apply to whatever your scenario is.  

I'd challenge you to obey the law for a month.  I did this experiment a long time ago, and I quickly realized that well over 90% of the time I would see speeders who had blown past me were arriving at the same milestones as me.  I also realized that I was a more calm and aware driver when I wasn't white knuckling to try and gain some fictional "advantage".  Yes, the cops did pull over that Amish buggy protest that one time.   The other 99.9999999% of the time, excessive speed is the danger.  

Let's put this to a bet.  Say $5,000 or whatever amount you can afford.  

If I can't find evidence of children playing after 5 pm, I pay you the $5,000.  And I'll post here that I was wrong and you were right.  

But if I do find evidence, you pay me and admit here that you were wrong.  

Money where your mouth is?
While your story may be True and not just a distorted exaggeration, if it's, it's an incredibly rare aberration to the point of being so infrequent as to not matter anyway.  

I drive through numerous school zones daily, and I can confirm almost all drivers hesitate to lower their speed (if they even do) until they are right at the school ground itself, and they are quick to get on the speed as soon as they seen thr high speed limit sign well off in the distance.  If you saw someone doing the opposite, you should have just marvelled at the one in a million situation, realized it has no meaningful effect on your trip or your life, and moved on.
So in other words, you are admitting you were full of it?   Or are you just saying you don't have the integrity to back your words with something real?

Well not sure what incremental gain that would offer.  The shows are widely pirated on Youtube and probably on various streaming services.  Plus "Canada's Worst Driver" is already Discovery Channel's top show (and that's including their American shows)  

Instead our government linked broadcaster is airing tripe like "Canada's Smartest Person" and the rather watered-down Marketplace, which recently reported internet folklore as some kind of misguided consumer tip.

Nope.  The physics used by the consensus of credible scientists on earth hasn't changed recently, unless you have some major news.

But maybe someone can explain the advantages of speeding on public roadways?  I mean besides more consequences like increased risk of death and injury and greater damage, or the sharply increased fuel consumption?
Well I updated the to post to show the likely sources, although the pro-speeding nuts may come here to downvote it.  But if you google and filter out the recent rise in "truthy" anti-law enforcement yahoos who think public safety is an Orwellian plot, there are countless physical and statistical studies that prove beyond all reasonable doubt that higher speeds cause worse consequences."One in a million? I drive regularly on highways and find someone going too slow on the highway about twice a year. I must have horrible luck."  

Lol, point made, but in a much funnier way that I was capable of.  

Indeed the "farmer on the freeway" scenario is so rare compared to the scores of people we see speeding every day that it's no surprise such a niche example is the core religious belief of the pro-speeding crowd.
I hate FPTP, so the lesser of the evils has been the restriction imposed by a Minority.  Of course it's impossible for electors to vote directly for a Minority.  In the current circumstances, it will be interesting to see the effects of sweeping and unchecked reform that are (supposedly) heading our way.Actually the show's producer references that exact situation, stating that at 120 km/hr versus 100 km/hr, death is **4 times likely,** much more significant than just 80%.
The graph isn't the source, it's a visual representation of what the source study proved.  

And I curious what secret "mandate" you say is Bell Canada/Discovery pushing by sharing overwhelmingly confirmed scientific data?  Do you have some proof they are secretly running a casket business, or that they are trying to deplete fossil fuels more quickly without any practical benefits?
Curious that eons-old physics could be considered "out of date" because a study happened to be written 11 years ago.  Mass is still mass, velocity is still velocity, humans are still made of tissue and bone.  What landmark change in kinetic physics or human physiology happened in the last 11 years to invalidate our understanding of human consequences in car crashes?
"Far fewer"?  Uh, no.  Collisions (the truthful term, since "accident" is misleading) are *harder* to avoid when reaction time and avoidance/braking are reduced.
Your credibility and couth are revealed when you call others "douchnozzles" just because they're smarter than you.  

Never mind the fact you don't seem to understand that deceleration is a function of having to scrub off speed. Then again any child who calls someone a douchnozzle probably stuggled with elementary math and physics.
So worse road quality, insignificant feature change, and dramatically increased distracted risk renders physics, science, math, and actuarial data all wrong?  No.
The desire to keep more innocent people from being killed by reckless and naive drivers who read some out of context tripe on Facebook and think it's True.  It's the same mentality that justifies smoking and Q-Ray bracelets and selling asbestos to the Third World.  

Some people desperately want to believe whatever makes them feel good about their own failings.  We can sit quietly and let folklore be elevated to False common belief through mass repetition, or can we can remind people that facts and science and physics and medicine still matter.  And we can even ignore it when the only one they're harming is themselves.  But when they take a motorized weapon on the roads, the innocent public can be harmed.
Except it's the opposite: Roads and infrastructure are in *worse* condition and *more* congested.  

Your claim that we "get somewhere sooner" is not borne out in the real world.  I'd challenge to try a month of driving legally, but your prejorative comments show you probably would accept the True outcome.  

For those who can be objective, you'd find that in most modern locations, speeding doesn't save any appreciable time.  I find I always arrive at the same time or within seconds of speeders.  We roll up to the same lights, stop at the same equalizing bottlenecks, and park in the same parking lots. And since they waste more time at the gas station, I actually spend *less* time than they do.

Of course in a pure racing situation, a speeder will put in more laps than I.  Unless it's a race that involves fuel refill, in which case optimization must apply.  Unfortunately too many /r/Canada Andretti's think the streets of Canada are their personal race track.

I'm a bit sad to see that you can't tell education from a joke, but even more sad at your stubborn resistance to learning.  Maybe after some collisions, damages, insurance hikes, fuel blls, injuries or deaths you'll be more open to learning.  Or not.


Crushing is certainly *not* the only manner of vehicular death, and the speed/energy ratio isn't linearly applicable to death and injury severity.

Well if you failed, then I guess that clinches it.  I mean I could point out that you couldn't even find the source I posted in this thread, but that would imply that your ability to find sources is incredibly poor.
Why bother?  /u/DanSheps already declared that no possible sources exist, after his exhaustive one second search failed to turn up anything - not even the source provided in the post he obliviously responded to without even reading.
What university? Doing what? (I ask with sympathy and trepidation)Well not really.  There's natural levels above which harm is assured, and below which harm is unlikely.  % chance doesn't have the same scale as speed.

And the biggest discontinuity is when lower speed allows you to prevent or avoid a collision entirely.  Consider a deer jumping in front of you.  The drivers doing 110 and 120 and 130 will have varying damage and injury levels, but the driving doing 100 may be able to see it or stop in time.
Lol.  Your "belief" that they didnt consult credible sources is wrong, but hilariously ironic given that you exhibited the bad behavior you Falsely accused them of.
Nope, I was referring to you.  You're the one who foolishly declared he had searched to his limit of competency and found no sources... and yet if you'd actually read the post you ironically tried trashing, you would have found a source.  Read first, think second, talk last. You're such a speed demon you skipped the first two steps.

Asking someone if they are trolling *is* trolling.  
Did she literally throw herself on your accelerator pedal, or could you have simply obeyed the law to avoid a ticket?
Yep, from your description it sounds like it was everybody else's fault that you were speeding.  But if you were "actively thinking" you might have paid attention to how you were driving.
Intellectual property on hot coffee?  Who cares?  

And the scenario you describe is naturally counter-constrained.  Nobody would be interested in "crushing him like a bug" until he's substantially bigger and vastly more successful; but if he's vastly successful, he's more able to defend or be a take out target.  
Um how do you not understand the widespread disdain was within Canada, by the millions of people who were sick of his shitty leadership?  Your reading ability is "the shock".  

But since you brought it up, the more aware and informed people around the world have certainly taken note of Canada's environmental irresponsibility and our wanna-be warmongerer stance under the Harper regime.  

Maybe we can issue you gloves and flashlight so you can find these elusive sources that anyone who actually read the thread could find, but which somehow eluded you.

Unlike your naively and stereotypical assumptions ("all TV is about ratings so there's no research") I happen to know both the business and the producers, and can say with confidence and actual knowledge (absent of illogical stereotyping) that they do some careful research before airing statistics.  This was great, even for those of us who do care that Mansbridge burned his legitimacy as a journalist when he went on the take from big oil.   Not sure what was more deserving of the burn, Mansbridge's offensive stereotyping that anyone who has progressive beliefs is a kumbaya-singing hippie, or that Mansbridge doesn't even know how to pronounce Kumbaya properly.  It was nice to see him knocked off his ivory tower if only for a moment.Not sure I fully agree or disagree with his precisely 50% split policy, but it's something anyway.  He's talked a good game, but so far it's only talk. We'll see how he performs given the high expectations that have been set.
Interesting point in the near-death bed conservation with PET, the discussion about the pitfalls of one day being the PM, that the issue could someday be how to deal with big banks and industry trying to control the office.
Mansbridge doesn't have conversations unless someone's paying him, like the CBC, or the oil industry. My first reaction was that Butts gave him the response to use.  But on review and reflection, it seems more like Butts was alluding to some other earlier discussion of how to address this topic.  So it could just as well be that Butts was merely reminding Justin of his own earlier response to that topic, and not necessarily creating the response.Sigh.  Your assumptions are, predictably, completely False.  

But then again you have such an over-simplified knowledge of road safety and realities that I suppose holding weird pseudo-psychological assumptions shouldn't come as a surprise.  On your trip to Chilliwack is it easier to avoid a piece of lumber on the road if you are going 140 km/hr or 100 km/hr?  Is it easier to handle a tire failure at 140 km/hr or at 100 km/hr?  When some redditor is texting on the highway to Chilliwack, is it easier to notice and avoid him at 140 km/hr or at 100 km/hr?  Knowing you, you believe with fanatical delusion that 140 is safer, and it will take a great deal of education, life experience and humility before you can understand that you're wrong - and even that can only happen if and when you completely change your attitude and accept the very possibility of being educated.  

Meanwhile, I'll see you blast by me on the highway to Chilliwack.  I'll see your brake lights as you come up behind a truck whose speed is governed.  I'll catch up as notice what you think is a cop car and you panic brake.  You'll pull away briefu but then I'll catch up in a few kilometers when we get to construction zone.  Then when you choose the wrong lane as you try to play video game highway jockey, I'll be ahead of you for a bit.  But you'll ram your foot to floor and "beat" me, getting into Chilliwack a minute earlier.  I'll know it because I'll see you at the gas station fuming and biting your nails as I roll by, happily and calmly, with extra fuel in my tank.

I know there's a popular myth that redditors enter some kind of transcendental super-driving zone that only seems to activate once they exceed the legal speed limit.  But it's just that: a myth.
I'm speaking about the two weeks prior.  And while his token cabinet appointment is superficially interesting, any government could make the same subjective claim that its ministers have "much experience and background"; even Harper and his clown crew had "much experience and background". Also you may be having a bit of rose vision because there are some of the ministers announced who don't have much experience at all.  I'm not saying that's good or bad, just that your overly effusive statement isn't necessarily an objective view.Agree.  Multiple Sharks is OK if you want widespread promotion as the camera-loving Sharks go around talking up their book.  But from a practical perspective, satisfying one egomaniac investor is hard enough; satisfying several is much worse.  As the Harper and other regimes have proven, saying these Oaths is the only way to be absolutely sure politicians will behave ethically.
In Canada, "appropriate measures" means that a tiny group of banks, insurance, media, energy, and communication companies can maintain overly powerful oligopolies and control almost all public policy.  

Just look at our banks.  There's several of them, to provide the illusion of "competition", but all of them collectively gouge Canadians and all have the same anti-consumer rules, policies and fees.  

Or look at insurance companies.  Several to choose from right?  Except all of them collectively have loopholes to prevent having to honor customers when something like the Calgary flash flooding happens.  And when annual 10-20% premium hikes occur, they all do it together, so there's no truthful competition.He's not a "real" Defense Minister until he abuses Canadian Forces helicopter and staff to shuttle him home from a fishing trip back to a photo opportunity.  
You've suitably proven that all your problems are caused by everyone else.
I love the way that the first third of the show has essentially become a Colbert Report clone.  Stephen is so comfortable in that part.  

The interviews I'm less enthusiastic about.  Daniel Craig seemed like he didnt want to be there, and Stephen's jump questions didn't help.   The Elizabeth Gilbert talk was quite rushed, and I didn't feel much love for the daffy math chef.  Although I see several here liked her, I just thought she was too awkward and wasn't clicking.Kimmel has an entire block that is a product promotion, usually multiple times per week.  It's always some kind of low quality sketch, performed by the perennially unfunny sidekick "Guillermo".  It happens around at around 45 of the format clock, and there's usually a lengthy batch of commercials before and after it, so it's easy - and recommended - to skip it.  

The Colbert placements have (so far) been done at full quality, so it's worthwhile to view them.  

Because I don't have an iron stomach, I haven't watched enough Fallon to know how often he does product placements.  I can only assume they are as bad or worse than his regular schtick.  

A lot of what people think are product placements on Colbert are not.  He's done relatively few so far.  Watch the end credits where the promotional mentions are listed.  

And if you back a generation, hosts doing talking ads was a core part of the program.  Entire shows were named after their sponsors.How you and I "feel" about his nice gravely voice and his charming grandfatherly persona doesn't matter and isn't the point.  He does have a good (but undeserved) reputation, and he is trusted but not trustworthy: there's a huge difference.

Any truly professional journalist would never accept *any* graft, let alone seek it out the way he did.  

He broke the biggest ethical commandment in the profession, and the CBC (along with the sentimental support of people like you) covered it up.  This isn't unusual, as they have a clear habit of covering up for the marquee stars they create (cough, Rex Murphy, cough, Amanda Lang, cough, Kevin O' Leary, cough Evan Solomon, cough Jian Ghomeshi, cough, whoever's next)
 
I know journalists who earn well below the average living standard.  They work hard to tell important stories.  But even in their own personal hardship, they know that taking so much as a free meal from a story subject is a clear violation of basic ethics.  

For a guy making millions doing one of the easiest and most secure journalist jobs in the world, it's particularly disgusting that he felt the need to quietly accept graft.  

It doesn't matter if the cash they gave him was the reason he usually did glowingly positive stories about the oil patch.  And it doesn't matter if the money he took had nothing to do with how he painted environmentalists as kooks.  Maybe he would have done the same stories without being bribed.  

But the point is he did take the money, which taints him.  Even if he's a sweet guy in general, he broke the code of ethics, hard.  It makes him unworthy as a journalist, period.  And it's worth noting, he's not sorry, and he doesn't even agree that taking money from subjects is wrong.  The fact that young and impressionable journalists adore him without knowing what he did and why it's heinous is kind of sick and ironic.  
I'm tired of his increasing whining about being given one of the most coveted roles of all time.  I wish he would have considered how awful it would be before signing the life changing contract.The CPC has seen how the country has turned against officious neo-conservatism and embraced marijuana reform.  

Their tone deaf response?  Promote an Ayn Rand-loving anti-cannabis crusader as their new leader.  LOL.  
There's also the Manson family Chanel.She's fun to see in this role, but let's be honest, she can't even read lines very well.
Another deeply dark and funny absurdist episode, this time packed tight with a huge amount of cultural references, especially surrounding the Mia Farrow parody character.Although most of the "correspondents" could easily slide in and substitute, Comedy Central's going to make damn sure there's no easy way to compare their performance directly against Trevor Noah.  They do not want their failing gamble to be outshone.
Exactly, too many people think money equates to ability, skill, intelligence, or virtue.  It rarely correlates.
That's actually not thermodynamically True, but the perception is real.
Most good experiments refrain from reporting results and deciding conclusions mid-experiment, the way you are doing.  Just saying.

I have no doubt such scamming is common. But it does irk me to think of how many times I've done simple physical tasks through excrutiating pain, simply out of necessity or independence.  

A casual observer (investigator) would have the wrong impression.  If I ever do have a physical claim, I'll probably go overboard hiring people to do even the lightest unrelated tasks, merely to prevent dirty insurance companies from trying to weasel out of their contracts.
The difference being that you have all these problems like people forcing you to be late, people forcing you to speed, people forcing you to blame everything on other people.  Myself, I have none. So it's technically True, I'm responsible for not having a multitude of easily avoidable problems, and you're responsible for your broad collection.


Legal question: did that guy basically admit to incest?
You can rest assured nobody on these shows has to pay for anything. And they get to cash their appearance checks.I'd love to know the specifics of how they set up some of these situations.  Obviously no camera crew goes to a public kids game and takes measurements without being shot at or arrested.  My guess, a casting call for young soccer players, with releases etc already pre-signed.
So many great details added for comedy.  Like the animations of the drunk entering the store with soaked pants, and the automatic drunk draining jacket, etc.
My main beefs are that as find him profoundly unfunny and that he pilfered material from other comics.  Obviously part of that is subjective.
If you want to pay me to not find Trevor Noah funny, I'm confident we can arrive at a compensation structure.  

At the moment I'm doing that for free, but since you're convinced that viewpoint could only be paid for, I'm willing to entertain your proposals.
Not sure I completely agree or disagree.  

What I have observed though is Trevor Noah - both on and off the show - reverts to these jokes that are all based on him having almost zero understanding of American culture.  Besides being unfunny, I find the premise unrealistic.  He's been here working for a considerable time, and he's been consuming US media for decades.  He hasn't been in a media-proof bubble since birth, so not knowing common things isn't believable, and making jokes about it seems like a lame schtick. That's just my opinion, as I know there are some audiences that eat that routine up like it's free ice cream. Just putting in a plug here for The Nightly Show.  I know it's reviled, and it can be hit or miss.  But more often than not Larry Wilmore opens it with one or two news blocks that are great and worthy of the old Daily Show on which they are inspired.  
Olivia Munn.  Michael Che. Bassem Youssef
Not really.  If you watch his show, as I do, you'd see he covers a lot more range than the stereotype you've probably heard.  And he's damn funny.That would be "possible" if it just happened once.  But there's other examples and other comedians pointing out stolen bits.  

And FYI, it's considered a big no-no to call out someone who stole your material, it's kind of dirty laundry etiquette.  That's why you'll hear Joe Rogan saying it on Dave Chappelle's behalf, and why Russell Peters was quick to sanitize his comments on Trevor Noah stealing material.Yes those moments such as the one you describe I find to be *extremely* unfunny, and when they happen I find myself stopping and consciously thinking: does someone, anywhere, actually find this funny?!?
Isn't siblings being involved in a sex act together meeting the definition?
Uh, OP merely posted a Salon article.  And if you would have read it, that article was incredibly mild, coming far short of actually saying Trevor Noah stole jokes, but just posting a couple of factual statements from others.  It then goes on to provide an interesting historical context of comedians using each other's material.  

I think your reaction is inappropriate to what was posted, and to the article.
Or from one (or perhaps the top) earning touring comedian, Russell Peters, who said as much.A professional crew in California without a filming permit is asking for a group ride to the police station.
I'm under no illusion that he actually used it, as it would be unwieldy, noisy, and unnecessary.  But just another hilarious added detail.
Are you just speculating?  Because I vaguely recall that females can be charged with incest.Personally I was disappointed.  The "old" Daily Show wouldn't have rolled over for this.  Back when the "old" Daily Show was barred from the Convention, John Oliver (who was a TDS correspondent at the time) snuck a crew and equipment in by hiding in the bottom of catering carts.  He created an amazing field piece, even while knowing that he had barely tenable rights to be working in the USA, let alone the potential complications for his US-military fiance should he have been caught or deported.

Faced with the same challenge, this "new" Daily Show just kind of whined about it.  

People wonder why so many of us are saying the Jon Stewart Daily Show was better.  This is part of it.

I've seen every show, and you're wrong.  Maybe you haven't watched it much, or maybe you can't tell what topics are "race" and which ones aren't.  Or maybe you know and you're trying to spread False info.  But whatever your reason or motives, you're wrong.
I'm just wanting someone that actually knows the law to tell us.
I don't find Trevor Noah funny in the least, but you have to give to give the man props for being back to work one day after his surgery.   

Spoiler (not really): Desi Lydic kills it with a field piece on the death penalty.
Awhile back there were rumors HBO wanted to develop some kind of daily news show.  Wonder if that's what this is supposed to be?
Was this the first time we see Grace without a hat?
Whenever I think that, I go back and and watch an episode from Season 1 or 2 and remember how great they were too.
Just enjoying the wait until the season finale. What will be the denouement for all the awkward talk about sex and loneliness in each episode?  Will Nathan's craftily planted "divorce" story play into this season's payoff?
I'm not your bro and I'd rather discuss it here in the discussion sub than google incest, thanks.
What's your source?  If it's anything other than the ongoing AV-Club-reviewers-mother-PR-campaign, then that would be news.
That kid was pure class, even how he delicately worded the racism question.
It could be just a rude edit. When you're shooting it can take hours, and they may have decided to just use out of context clips since they were funnier than anything Niky had to say.Exactly.
They tell them the production company name, which is usually some benign thing like ABC Films LLC, and they say it will probably get picked up by Viacom and air on one of their channels like MTV.
Nathan is well versed in manipulating the press and using those deceptions as part of his show over long periods of time.  Plus romance and failed relationships is a recurring theme of his story arcs, so it would actually fit his character *perfectly*.  An ideal source would be state records.  

It's probably True, but given his history, I'll just have temporarily believing it's yet another prank.  I mean he lost a ton of weight just by moving boxes.
I know someone with a legit injury who got jammed up for that exact scenario.  In her mind she was being a hero by taking care of herself and her pets, and helping her recovery by staying active.  Video of her carrying groceries 25 feet gave the insurer justification to withhold payment for over two years.Trying to use dry humor and see if anyone reads comments, congrats!
There's probably a way to conduct the interviews that makes it easier or harder to cut them for time.  Trevor Noah is maybe not as experienced in laying that down yet.LOL, the writer is nothing if not consistent.  I wonder what his real name is?  

I'm also glad that some of the younger generation are now realizing how complete dolts like Donald Trump and Sarah Palin can claim to be "authors".It's kind of sad that even if he got one of these huge jobs every week for the rest of his life, the pay wouldn't even cover rent.
No matter what we thought of the musician (I found him fresh and catchy), it was a good reminder of how well the various musical acts are staged and depicted on LSSC.  There's clearly choreographed scenes and effects and big supporting crews and everything. Some shows just aim two cameras and cut between them random, but not Stephen Colbert's Late Show.  Somebody is putting in some serious work.
Although there's some good lines, it's my *least* favorite.  A lot of that is personal taste. I don't care for throwaway sketch comedy, and I find "Big Questions With Even Bigger Stars" to be kind of Fallon-esque.  

The one good thing is that it shows that even when LSSC is aping Fallon, it does a better job of it that Fallon itself.
No.  In "good" operations, there's sufficient turnover of goods that there's little need to tamper with expiration dates.  And their training of you amounts to nothing more than "but everybody else probably does it".
There's a post in this same branch where someone explains how the company trained him to believe this was ok, and safe, and that "every butcher everywhere" does it.  

It's easy to enlist good people into doing bad things if you give them some noble-sounding belief to follow.
Ideally you should have reported them to the Ministry when you were there, but I don't understand why you didn't at least make that call the day you left.
Call in a tip about that thawing fish cart, could help some innocent shoppers.Some of this is True, and some is just overconfident bravado.
The dates *aren't* arbitrary.  In fact, bacteria and microbes have highly predictable time scales.  And manufacturers have to tread a very careful line between shelf life of a product and freshness.  Too short and it can hurt profit, too long and product is gross or unsafe.  

Because I know science and food, it bothers me because the genesis of some molds is not always visible to casual view.  

For people who think they have "tough constitution" or can sniff test or use their eyes to defeat all microscopic organisms, I have pity.Meanwhile spores that are invisible to the naked eye are transferred to thousands of otherwise fresh produce, causing a lot of them to spoil prematurely.
Cut food regulation and sell it under the banner of "cutting out all that government fat".  Then let people believe a lot of non-scientific ideas about how amateur visual inspections can detect microscopic hazards, and combine that with truthy belief systems that say the only way to break even is by cheating.
Why didnt you speak up years ago?
Yes, exactly.  Starbucks and their ilk are insanely profitable.  It wouldn't hurt them a bit to contract someone to do this service.  But being honest is so foreign to their executives that they probably never even thought of it.
Starbucks and Tim Horton's are insanely profitable.  They could easily hire a company to pre-sort the recycle bin and you wouldn't even notice it in their financials.  But lying comes naturally to their executives, so we end up with these fraudulent environment campaigns.I'm not, that was someone else's speculation.
I'm not your guy or your mate.  I know your type, everything is someone else's fault.  No go troll someone else and blame them "being bored" or whatever excuse lets you claim it's not your fault.
Nope, food corporations have serious financial stakes here.  And microorganisms don't change their behavior to follow marketing plans about "freshness".   

Well you wouldn't have a class action for "price-fixing", since that falls under other specific jurisdiction.  But there is a class action [against the cell phone companies for charging fake fees.](http://www.merchantlaw.com/class-actions/current-class-actions/cellular-class-action)There is a grey market of people buying MB and SK cell phone plans.  It's a stark example of why having government involved in certain businesses can be a huge benefit to the public, and isn't the evil communism that corporate apologists like to claim.  

Meanwhile, Ontario is trying to privatize Hydro.
Except the traditional butcher shops tend to bring what they can use and sell, whereas a corporate pipeline is being pushed regardless of reality, and there's always massive pressure to push a little bit more each quarter.  

Some executive's bonus is geared to pumping more product into stores, and he/she then structures everyone below to that same goal.  At the 90 year old corner butcher shop, they don't need to show constant unsustainable growth or demonstrate "synergistic opportunity fulfillment".
Oh yeah, I remember you previously speaking over your skis about how you were a chef but it turned out you were a helper in a franchise kitchen.  

But tell you what, I'll set out some meat and dairy at room temperature, and tomorrow at this time you can consume them and tell us all about how food safety is just some illusion about "freshness". 
Consumers being offended and hurt by seeing Christmas goods strikes me as one of the most imaginary harms of our already way too privileged society.

I can see how this causes you significant personal harm and suffering.  But for those readers who don't understand this tragic issue, can you explain in detail why it deserves your hate?Yeah, that's folklore.  

In professional operations food comes in daily and follows a JIT process.  It makes no economic sense to buy an egg today and then house it for 3 weeks when you can get the same fresh egg every day for the same price, and not have to warehouse it.

And specials are turned over so much you couldn't exist trying to make them from leftovers.  You actually bring in extra and fresh ingredients for specials since they get ordered so much.  

Like a lot of folklore, these myths always have a figment of truth, or some past isolated incident which helps make them believable and so deeply ingrained.  .... in the fraudulent corporate "recycling" scam receptacle.
I know a victim of XL foods, and more than you.  Plus calling someone smarter than you an idiot confirms you're the idiot.  Go wash more dishes at Swiss Chalet "chef".
Fake injury over having to see merchandise is silly. If people actually wanted to tangibly support troops they'd call for better pay and treatment and leadership and safety and mandate for our defense members.  But they won't, because that would add a penny to their tax bill.
In Los Angeles without roomates and roaches?  No.  After taxes? Not even close.



The difference is I'm not upset.  But what about the personal harm you suffer?
There is a frightening tendency for people to vote and say and do things that go directly against their own best interests.  Dogma and ideology are the usual culprits.

Personally, I would have done this as solid line, but with the fish shapes in negative space.  Would look way better and be more functional.
Every time there's a wall, there's a ladder nearby.  Every time there's a gap, there's planks.  If there's water, there's some kind of floating object to use.Your violent and vulgar outburst says it all about your character.  

You don't even understand basic biology and you're talking about food?  You were busted previously claiming to be a chef but then I found your other posts whining about your low level job.  

Any restaurant that can't use up a dozen eggs in a day is not a real restaurant.  It's probably the imaginary one you fantasize about running. Go wash some dishes, but I pray someone teaches you how to sanitize them properly, even if you never learn the invisible reasons why.
You don't even understand time scale and you're calling me the idiot?   You're a fouled mouth liar, but it's your lack of education that is likely sickening patrons.My point is that it's a lot of work to crank out a book, even a poor one.  And at this guy's highest rate, he can't afford a decent lifestyle."Economic activity" is the public relations spin doctor's best friend.  

It can be calculated in any fictitious way you like, to sell any premise you want.  The only thing "economic activity" can't do is pay a real bill.
Your language only shows that you have a violent temper and a foul mouth, and your history of posts previously exposed you for lying about your status and experience.  If you work in a sloppy operation - and let's assume your other posts complaining about your employer and your low status represent the real truth - then it's no wonder you have such a terrible attitude and huge ignorance about food safety.  

But what's not as easy to understand is how you got through elementary school without understanding what microbes are.  Maybe your threats and violent outbursts encouraged the teachers to push you along for their own safety.  But they have really handicapped you to deal with the real world.

Hey cool, you didn't read before posting.I wish he would had explained why the small square opening which doesn't match many of the documents I get, and which means almost every item gets folded, curled, bent and jammed.  Plus it's hard to retrieve.  You need to go back to grade three and learn elementary science.  But even education won't help unless your change your attitude completely.The sad thing is:  

- consumers believe that because there's no real competition, we are being gouged at $110/month  

- cell phone executives believe that because of competition, they are being restricted to charge "only" $110/monthI tend to make Rememberance Day some form of celebrating freedom, which is what I appreciate most from the women and men who serve in our voluntary forces.
That's something I questioned initially.  Why could he locate and find a source in Japan for everything, already developed?
They count things like television viewing, as if people wouldn't have been watching whatever else was on television.  Same with entertainment dollars, hospitality,and travel.  Apparently people wouldn't have done anything else if not for these events.
Someone's lights a block away affects you how?  And for bonus points, how do these lights detract from Veterans?  

Is there some Veteran's lights tradition I'm not aware of?  Are "Veterans products" being pushed off the shelves to make room for candy canes?  
I never said anything about eggs coming in a dozen, you've been lured in by a repeat bullshitter.  He previously claimed to be a chef, but then I found some posts in another sub where he complained about his work which was mostly dishwashing in a chain and how the real kitchen staff weren't treating him well.  

I know Sysco will service cafeteria style operations multiple times per week, but high end restaurants can get market ingredients any day of the week. And they don't waste space hoarding perishable goods for no reason.  Order what you can use, and use what you order.  Of course the chefs I know are high end award collectors, not dishwashers with violent tendencies. So it may be a whole different universe at the lowest of low end which I'm (thankfully) not familiar with.

And besides, as you would know, "aging" eggs because your staff can't prepare or peel them properly is a competency issue.
Having roomates that cover your low end rent is hardly living. And really, with roomates, you can have as little as no income.Lol, thanks autocorrect. I think I'll leave it.
I'm not the one bitching about imaginary harm to myself or Veterans.
Well it already prompted an increase in tin foil sales.
I'm not your love and please stay away forever.
How is this news? Wasn't Rona Ambrose always the most outspoken of the Conservative government and the high priority they placed on this issue?  

Oh right, up until the election this issue didn't matter to her in the slightest, nor to any of the duds she's now leading.
No, but the face certainly doesn't resemble Superman either.  Maybe it's an homage to our super-obese society?
I actually like them.  Funny, absurdist.
I had the impression Stephen was impatient with Whoopi's bullshit answers, and he seemed to play her off quickly.  But what was it like in person?
I wish one of their church leaders would show up disheveled one day and claim that he found some gold foil writings in a language only he could understand, and that these writings told him they should dispose their current belief system and follow a completely different one that's based around taking care of others and not judging them.  And also some stuff about how it's wrong to create a patriarchal sex slavery ring under the guise of plural marriage.  And that these writings are the new rules of the church, and everyone goes along with it because it's such a plausible story.
That's how I took it, since that's such a common Shark offer.  So instead of $200k for 50%, they sold 40% for $100k.  Barbara lends them $100k to fund their orders.  Personally I prefer to just have a couple spoons of something tasty than a whole bowl of 'meh'.  I've seen a lot of real TED talks, so that could be why I enjoy the parody.The point is, even using best payday and pretending he landed the same book deal every week for the rest of his life, a guy who can crank out full books can't afford a decent lifestyle.
Is he a terrible writer though?  On a near daily basis I receive insults from redditors who don't know the difference between the words "of" and "have", or who think there's something called an "escape goat".  By comparison, this guy is masterful.
He went on "google ~~handouts~~ hangouts", whatever that is.  But frankly, why do we need him on reddit AMA. He's already getting wall-to-wall media coverage. They're trying to make up for a decade of the past administration's stonewalling.  

He can do an AMA later, when there's something significant to sell, like why he did or didn't completely change C-51 or whatever.
No totally opposed to what you are saying, but wanted to point out those studies which sell immigration as economic noon are kind of selective, and are countered by other studies.  Plus there's a difference between regular immigration and taking in emergency refugees.
The "worked hard and paid taxes" piece of that plan was possible because there were jobs to do.  Not sure it's even remotely the same now.
Did you check out the big oil industry's fake "grassroots" energy citizens campaign, and their terrifying ideas?
"Bev Oda ring a bell anyone?"  

Bev Oda doesn't ring any bells.  She has a team of butlers and bell ringers do that for her, like any normal Canadian.True but not True.  It's a bit like saying if you can afford a private jet, we have free jet parking available for you.  

Simply getting to point where a subsidized university education is a viable option requires overcoming a lot of obstacles.
A lot of this is superficially True but in reality False.  

Getting a free lunch isn't a bonus if you live a life of poverty.  Paying $6 for lunch wasnt an issue for you because your rich parents paid it anyway, and you had a safe home stocked with food anyway.  

Same with the choice to have children and live off welfare.  It's not quite the paid vacation you seem to think.  Can you imagine how poor one's life has to be for that to be considered a big upgrade?I take it you haven't gotten hate PM's from illiterate redditors.Sigh.  You clearly think it's just a piece of cake to "show up for school".  It makes sense, because for you, it was.  
Even your tale puts you in a privileged position compared to many of those you dismiss.  
Inability to use simple words is a defining characteristic of illiteracy.
Falsely calling someone a troll makes you the troll.  But is that a surprise, considering you're already moaning about the hardship you're suffering from someone's decorations miles away from your view?
Well on pure numbers, yes.  These people had zero ability to assess a business proposal.  They even believe the common misconception that 50% share ownership guarantees "control".  

However when comparing the deals, I actually believed that Barbara would work on imposing some business structure and discipline to their venture, whereas with Robert, I can barely see him closing the deal, let alone being of any practical assistance.  So though his numbers were better, I feel like Barbara was the more realistic partner.
Sigh.  "WHEN you are given every chance" - it's tone deaf ideas like this that probably formed your prejudice.  I never nice said I have moral superiority to natives: that appears to be your entire mindset though.

If you think it's easy to live that way that's because for you, life was much easier.  I never did anything like that, but if creating dishonest situations is how you get pumped up, then carry on with your contrived outrage.  And no I'm not Austin Bowers, but it's revealing that you would be that paranoid/delusional.
Well this is some racist bullshit if ever there was.  Tell us more about all these mansions and the limousine rides that all indigenous people get.  

But first, tell us what it was like for you living without stable family support.  How it felt having suicide be a frequent part of your community, and having everyone in your peer group huffing gasoline or worse.  Tell us about knowing from birth that you were unwanted and disrespected by everyone else.  Tell us about the pervasive and rampant sexual abuse you suffered.  Tell us how a tax break helps someone with zero income, or how a bus pass subsidy cures sexual abuse.

You can't, at least until you update your sob story.  And next time you cook up a story, maybe don't go with the "starvation" angle, because that's a dead giveaway you're way overinflating your "uphill both ways" existence.

Well credit card disputes actually do have a "trial" of sorts.  They are conducted between the competing banks and they have a strict process and narrow terms of what can and cannot be presented.  But they are just like mini-specialized trials.You can't dispute a portion of a credit card transaction.  It's either dispute the transaction as a whole or not.  You can dispute that the amount was wrong, which is what would be the case here.  The entire amount is held in suspense while the dispute mechanism plays out.
For me, even a drop of puke would cost me a new car because I'd probably not be satisfied with a cleaning.
Yes, but the only downside is that sometimes in fact the remote terminal is actually not functioning, in which case a cabbie gets screwed by virtue of being at the bottom of the business food chain.Just curious how they block Uber's, which I'm guessing would just appear to be like any random person picking up a "friend".
Forcibly?
Logistics could sticky, costs money to collect that $1, and virtually all business operating on airport grounds are in stranglehold contracts that would probably add an equator-sized ball of red tape.From reading this thread, I see one counter-measure is that the authorities set up sting operations with heavy penalties, which deters the ride sharers from even accepting that order."if someone is telling me point blank that I am not allowed to leave their cab, the gun is coming out."  

"Hear me out, I'm not a crazy gun-toting American."  

LOL (but with sadness)

Guns should only come out when there's *actual* danger, not maybe-potentially-some-slight-risk-of-danger-under-much-different-circumstances-kind-of-danger.  

And FYI, there's an ocean of danger spectrum between a broken door lock and being raped by a Hollywood-style serial-killer-cabbie.
Not all of this strictly True.  In many jurisdictions, cabs require pre-verified trips, and have mandatory driver protections and security and camera that Uber doesn't require in the least.  I hate the old taxi cartels too, but let's not be unrealistic about the fact that a key part of Uber's advantage is not having to comply with many of the expensive burdens that the traditional industry is forced to absorb.Although the taxi industry is sketchy, there's much more to it than what you realize.  City administrations are certainly not the only villains here.  

And besides, society being interconnected, the money "lost" by cities to Uber will be recouped by increased taxes and fees, so people who "saved" $1 using Uber will pay a extra $1 somewhere else to feed the city's lost revenue.  Of course it may not be the same person or the same dollar, but the point is there.By your logic, you should be whipping out your gun on every bus and airplane. Quit using over active imagination syndrome as an excuse to whip out the gun you're totin'.  And quit saying you're not a trigger happy gun toter if everythng else you say contradicts that label.  And you should probably get a lawyer to teach you what "imminent" means.  Cheaper and better to do that now, before you've murdered someone or shot yourself or a some random innocent person whipping out your gun every time a door closes.
If only there weren't some kind of correlated business connection.  
"You dense motherfucker".  Yep, you sound like a reasonable and well-adjusted person.  Your statements that indigenous people live in mansions, get free everything, and have no obstacles to overcome is amazingly sad and ironic.  Strange that you'd can't see that your own struggles - True or not - might be a basis for common ground and understanding, instead of fuel for your angry racism.

See, this is anecdotal but more reasonable.  Certainly some indigenous kids are lazy dropouts as are some non-indigenous ones. But you're not claiming they have mansions and luxury gratis lifestyles either, nor making blanket claims about entire races.I'll accept your protest and grant that you are angry *and* a racist, but perhaps not an angry racist.  

Something for you to think about in a more lucid moment is why the identical obstacles that were challenges when you speak of your own prowess and suddenly no big issue when applied to indigenous people.  

And of course we'd have to ignore the fact that when you or I walk into many rooms, we don't bear the same instant prejudices that an indigenous person does.Your kind of delusional paranoid imagination combined with gun-totin' attitude leads to thousands of avoidable deaths.  I'll take being Falsely accused of naivety over being whatever happened to you.  

For your own sake and whoever your victim is, I hope you do get a lawyer to teach you what imminent danger means.  Hint: imagining what someone might do isn't imminent danger.

The classic double-dick move.  You are a piece of work.  Unfortunately your dishonest tactic backfired, as the two people you tried to deceptively pit against one another don't have your issues.
You commenced by saying **"the carpet is rolled out for them. Incentivised highschool, university and promised jobs if they graduate"** and then you went downhill from there.  Not sure if you forgot you said this or if you're lying, but it doesn't matter.  

Anyone who says "Get your head out of your ass" and "I'm on your side" in the same sentence is so detached from reality they can't be reasoned with anyway.

Me too! And I'm also fighting Holly Holm next week.  

But if you think the closed door of a taxi or an airplane is an imminent danger of rape that justifies you to murder someone, there's some pretty obvious reasons why you aren't actually a lawyer.  I'd ask why a person who peacefully subdues a burglar thinks it's ok to menace a cab driver with a gun, but the response wouldn't make the world better so let's skip it.
I'm curious why that doesn't jive with my knowledge. Have they instituted some pricing new? Different system?  Maybe someone doing the process I'm familiar with but calling it something different? I'm going off the EMV dispute rules from several years ago.
In commercial finance, "funding" typically connotes a loan to be repaid.
My guess is it's for liability protection for the producers, not so much concern over the contestant's well bring.I think you said on the show your margin is 23%. What would be the plan if someone comes in to your market a lot lower, like 5-7%?  

Would Cuban and Sacca bankroll you to match price, or would you add features and benefits to convince customers your premium rate is for a premium service?

Here's a direct quote from you, subject to edit: **"taxi driver has me captive, he could, in theory, take me somewhere I don't want to go, steal my money, beat me, rape me, kill me, or any combination of these things."**Go perv someone else, or preferably, nobody.Oh that's your justification for murdering someone?  Well if that's any indication of your online degree's quality, you have a bright future as a cop/inmate with a J.D.  You'll be disbarred though.  And your wife Gisele Bundchen will move on to someone else.
Did they even claim it was ice cream?  Not that I recall. They just compared it to ice cream.  But it's not even ice milk. And the food majors are already getting good at injecting air into sweetened canola oil and selling it as simulated ice cream. I'm guessing it's something along the line of Hampton eggs.I like Jimmy Kimmel normally, but I don't know why he has to play a brain injury character on these cross-over promotions.  

My guess is that for sweeps every ABC executive has to say how they are pumping up promotions, and some guy/girl has now been able to say at a meeting they had a team of people building synergies between JKL and Shank Tank.Nobody tried to murder you. That was a product of your wild imagination.  The flight attendants need to keep the airplane doors closed so the cabin can maintain safe pressure.  They aren't planning to rape you.  Nobody is.  A closed door is not a trigger for you to murder anyone, even a cab driver.

So if your imagination causes you to murder someone in imaginary self-defense, you'll be locked permanently in some form.  You should request your $99 back on that degree you downloaded, officer.
The name is even weird.  Considering they're selling the locker to low-end landlords, there's a good chance that by week two it will no longer be "clean", as the food deliveries will have already turned it into a roach and rat hotel.  

If they were selling it as a service which they sanitized daily, the name might make more sense.  But I don't recall that as the pitch.
You lied to both of us, it backfired, and now you look like more of a ___________.  
In a way, it's good that ancient peoples didnt have video cameras.
A big part of it is all the previously unassailable stories that were eventually debunked.  It makes people question things.  


- We'd never tamper in foreign elections or assassinations. We did?  Well that's embarrassing.

- The church couldn't possibly be mass-molesting kids.  Oh, it was?   

- That crazy stealth plane design that's circulating is fake, any engineer can tell it could never fly.  Oh, we've been using it for 15 years of secret bombing missions?  Interesting.

- Black sites are the invention of tinfoil hat wearing kooks, we'd never torture.  Oh, the kooks were right all along?  That's some bitter juice.

- The human body cannot run a mile in four minutes, it's physically impossible.   Roger Bannister who?  He did what?

- Google is *not* giving out free email accounts.  That's impossible, it's April Fools Day dummy.  And besides, they say you get 1 GB of space, that's obviously a joke.  Wait, this account works?  And the storage space is rising?  Ok.

- Crop circles defy all manner of scientific explanation, magnets and meters don't work in their vicinity.  Oh, it was some guys with a piece of plywood and a rope.  

- Hey everybody, I just sailed around the world. Uh no buddy, you didn't. 

- There's weapons of mass destruction, we gotta go get them.  Wait, that was all fake. Ok.

- The Titanic will never be found, it's probably rusted dust.  Oh, the Terminator guy found it in his spare time.

- The Iraqi's threw babies out of their incubators on the concrete floor?  Oh, that was just a lie told by a Kuwati prince's niece to manipulate the UN.   
  
A hundred or so of these big debunkings start to make people doubt stuff.

 Which category am I in if I still have questions about whether we had the proper protection to radiation exposure for Apollo moon walkers to do what they did and then live long healthy lives.  Or how the televised broadcasts were super quality compared to most TV of the 70's, 80's and 90's :-)Correct. It's actually Finlandia, most people don't know that though.Even seeing any live long distance broadcast was super rare back then, never mind the most remote broadcast of all time.

And I've seen the suits and they were a lot lower tech than most people assume.  The radiation outside atmosphere is intense, and I still ponder if those home-ec project suits could actually provide the necessary protection. Oddly, I'd be more convinced if the astronauts developed predictable symptoms instead of living such long and robust lives.
It does taste pulpable, though.That the fake "economic action plan" was working, easier for environment-destroying corporations to spread propaganda. Even compared to SNL's standard mediocre fare, this was bad.  The sketches were devoid anything that could be called humor.  It's amazing this still airs on a major network.  But it's more sad that Trump's outrageous comments - which initially and rightfully caused him to lose several business partnerships - are now just being ignored.  

NBC dropped his pagent and ousted him as host of his show due to what was pretty much hate speech, and now a couple months later they are giving him feature coverage?   It's sick.
I'll never understand the hipster-mentality of wanting to kill something that's good, and trying to pre-date the time of a turn.  

Even a weak Simpsons episode is vastly better than most of the current sit-com landscape.  And the movie was well-received in its time, making this retroactive review somewhat tone deaf.
HBO is still the most prestigious by a long chalk.  Getting a show on HBO confirms you've "made it".  And they somehow maintain good relationships with almost all of their creators, against the odds.  

Netflix has a pot of money they're sloshing around in their frenzy to develop in-house content.  Money plus hands-off treatment has lots of allure, but it's not prestigious.  It's hard to be that proud of landing a deal with Netflix when you know they hand out cash for gag projects like Full House, Degrassi, and Richie Rich.

Plus Netflix's scatter-gun funding plus lack of development guidance can yield uneven results.  If Netflix ever has to ration their money, will it still be so desirable for top talent to scrap for a piece of it?
If it's better than most of its category, how has it "overstayed its welcome"?  Makes no sense, other than as a chance to cry shark jump.
Um, she's real.  I'd seen her before in things like Awkward and she was fine, but I had no idea she had so much more to offer.I thought I was being too jaded for disliking every product this week, but apparently everyone felt the same.  

I also don't see the appeal of ugly sweaters, but they might get a bump from the tie-in to the Seth Rogen movie.Lol. If only there was a way for these people to stop watching a TV voluntarily at whatever point they decide they don't like it anymore.  No. In the sentence you're considering, hipster is the adjective and mentality is the noun.  Mentality can transcend age.  And LOL at your definition of "golden period". So you think the early seasons were poor?
Yep, I was kind of disappointed The Verge writer didnt even know that.More like Bob Newhart *off* steroids.I think there's very little chance of that.  His show fills a niche on a niche network in world where lots of his targets don't even watch TV.  

I would bet 98% of the business people I know have zero clue who Pewdiepie or Jenna Marbles are, and they're 10 times more famous.  Plus he doesn't exactly exude any sign that he's famous.
The camera person who was shooting back to the entrance did.Nathan didnt show up in the mainstream news.  "Dumb Starbucks" did.  Most just ended up reporting it as an art piece/prank, but 99% of the general public wouldn't know him or put a face to him.   

And "people" didnt learn about Attell.  It was a very small subset of aligned people who knew about him. If you're into square dancing, you'd recognize the main square dancing celebrities, and if you're a late night bar crawler, you'd know about a famous late-night bar crawler.  

Am I right?  Well I can point to 50 examples that show I am.
I don't mind those, and I pray he doesn't revert to lazy airtime-filling interviews like many of his peers.  Last night's interview was long for what it was.There are such organization in many jurisdiction, but mentioning that fact doesn't serve the narrative.  

Personally I think prison conditions should be drastically improved and private corporations kicked out of the system.  But I also can maintain the separate idea that for some people victimized by crime, they have little sympathy for the prisoners being released.  

As contrary to the Hallmark card portrayal, a lot of people who managemto get locked up are extremely bad people through and through, they're not all reformed gentle tomato growers.
They can and do.  In my experience, not everyone steals. But the person who would steal $3 will steal $300 or $3000 without batting an eye.
This was kind of an incoherent rant.
Someone posted that they want it to "go on ad nauseum infinitum"?  Where is that? Or did you just lie and make that up?  That actually isn't what that means.
Sit through an episode of Big Bang Theory and remove all doubt.
I liked it, including all the seasons.  But I don't tend to be swayed by internet outrage; I rate things more objectively.
Three things:  

- despite the common slagging of libraries by the self-anointed digital generation, libraries are - and can be - highly relevant for today's population as a place for sharing resources of all kinds, not just old books as some believe.  

- unfortunately these e-book and MP3 deals like you describe are often rip-offs by the media companies who end up reaping huge profits and draining precious resource *out* of the library.  One example I'd heard is that when I take a "free" song out at the library, the library is charged $1.29 by their provider.  The librarians love it because they get to be one the front line of "giving" away the media, but it actually eats their budget.  

-  apparently the e-book deals at many libraries are often exploitive and non-sensical.  I've heard tales where an e-book digitally destroys itself and has to be rebought over and over.  Again, it's a scam by media owner corporations to maximize their profits.Nobody's saying he doesn't have a background in the field, there's some who believe he got some major things wrong and did more harm than good.
Yes, but that's only a matter of courtesy and is only as trustworthy as the average bank, in other words it can and does fail.  The other person is suggesting a superior method is not having to put blind faith in institutions known for their lack of trustworthiness.  Can't wait to see this mini-season.  Not sure I agree with their contention that you can't do an 8 minute sketch "anywhere except Netflix".  Many shows have funny long sketches, Amy Schumer did a 22 minute sketch on CC, SNL does long unfunny sketches all the time.
I didnt say superior in security, that's a separate debate. What I said was the other person was suggesting push can be a superior **method**.  I love cable TV. It's packed with real time content, highly reliable, better sound and picture than any stream, and DVR's work much better than the multitude of crappily programmed streaming options. 

The amount of entertainment value versus cost is great. I should qualify this to say that I hate piracy and I'm actually proud to pay for the things I support.  I also kind of resent the fact that old school cable customers are subsidizing all the cord cutters and pirates.  If everyone paid their share, the prices could be much lower.  

PS: you canceled Netflix a bit early, Bob and David (mr show) are releasing a mini season this week.Somewhere, a group of people thought this was a good idea.  Then another group of people wrote it and said it was good.  Then other people acted and directed it to their own satisfaction, and the first group said that's just what we were hoping for when we imagined it.  Heaven help us.
Sure, it's good an each season is really just like a long movie.I know it was a thing, just never saw it as a useful business.  Everyone already had or could get an ugly sweater, which was kind of the point. It's so bizarre the crackpot quack chronic liar Ben Carson is leading the Republicans.  The only way this is real is if the Democratic Party is deliberately and subversely salting every poll to make the GOP look incredibly stupid.
Can't remember the details but there's some threshold like 2 s-words per episode allowed.
Lol.
It's too bad they can't flip back to clips of the various past things Colbert makes reference to.
Food companies measure everything in cost per million tons.  Sugar is cheaper per ton than actual peanuts, so they find a way to cram it into peanut butter. 

Then they found out corn syrup could be given a disguise by calling it maltodextrin, and that's even cheaper. So they cram that instead.  It's in everything.  Without doing a speck of research. I'm going to guess it has no health benefits.  

You might be thinking "what about air? Isn't air even cheaper?"  Yep. That's why lots of food products are getting whipped and fluffed and aerated now... more profit.
Who said that?
That wasnt product placement.  Smh
Well he has killed the comedy aspect and the political satire aspect of The Daily Show.  They're completely dead and gone now.
Yeah this is like when that weird kid's mother tells everyone her son is really popular and the other mother's just roll their eyes.
By year 17 Trevor Noah may be funny.  Here's hoping.
While I find Trevor Noah has sucked the life out of the show, I think ratings are meaningless.  Some of the best material is unknown to the mass public, and the mass public seems to worship stuff like Big Bang Theory, that guy with the redneck jokes, and that other ventriloquist comedian.  So yeah, good ratings are sometimes a counter-indicator of quality.Totally unrelated to Comedy Central's "leak" here, what does the phrase 'Whistling past the graveyard" mean?
It's become tedious how many people here misunderstand what a product placement is.

Just because you see a product doesn't mean it's product placement.  I can easily tell.  But if you can't, watch the credits for an obligatory note as to whether or not it was a paid promotion.  While I find Ronnie the Asian correspondent kind of funny as a performer, so far he's not fitting the tone of the show.  

Being abusive to innocent subjects is more of a prank show/candid camera schtick.  It doesnt fit with something that up until a few months ago was doing important social and political commentary.  

It also makes me nostalgic about the old "The Daily Show" where field pieces were far more expertly crafted, done in such a way that the subjects were the focus and any comedy or embarrassment came from the subject, not from comedians doing performance art in front of the subjects.
A little of each.  There's certainly a big contingent of tea bagger types who love Trump, and many who believe Trump's bullshit about being an excellent businessman (who files bankruptcy semi-annually) with a number one hit TV show (that had terrible ratings and was unceremoniously abandoned by NBC) and how world leaders will just listen to him (several already use him as a punchline) and how minorities love him (any literate ones don't). 

The point is these primary polls are as legitimate as "vote for Sanjaya" was.  When someone calls and asks which Republican I support, I'll gladly VFTW and hope they run the biggest clown possible, and pray that clown dredges up Sarah Palin in some kind of significant capacity.
So much wrong here that you're coming off as extremely uninformed. 

  Immigration dictates where they go, it's not all to Vancouver, Toronto.

We do have serious challenges at home.  Should children in war zones wait a couple decades while we chip away at things though?  
Refugees will be checked upon entry and will be on a very short leash, for a variety of reasons. Don't believe the Donald Trump tales.  

Many will soon have better English that what I see on /r/Canada, because they'll be motivated and they'll actually embrace education.  

25,000 is almost absurdly hard to do this fast, and will probably fall short on numbers or timeline.  But you kow what?  I'm fine with that. If it takes a few extra weeks to save war victims, how is that bad?  Or if we "only" save 23,000 by year end, how is that bad?  Under the old regime these victims would have been labeled as terrorists and never gotten here, ever.

Substantiate your claim that refugees aren't refugees.  Let me guess, they're Saudi Princes trying to cash in on Canada's lucrative refugee and food bank systems?
 
It's been shown in countries with aging mass demographics, immigrants don't hurt the economy, are beneficial to to the economy.

Canadians did have a say, and you're seeing that play out.  Racism and xenophobia and fear mongering are how Harper lost the confidence of Canada.


I agree with what's happening, but some well informed people - many who also agree with aggressive acceptance of refugees - have pointed out the logistics and scale means that making the 25,000 by Dec 31 goal is nearly impossible unless some really extreme (and expensive) measures are taken. 

Of course, our parents' and grandparents' generation could have pulled it off, because small personal sacrifices and commitment came naturally to them.  The logistics of world wars were easy compared to this.  I'd personally be proud to see Canada mount a spirited effort to revolutionize how quickly we can rescue these people.So much myth here.  FYI, foreign doctors and engineers absolutely *can* work here, but they have to prove their ability. Yes, the test is rigorous, but it should be.  No, they can't just waltz in and declare their credentials.  And that's a good thing, as I've known more than a few 19-20 year old "doctors" and "engineers" from other countries whose credentials were merely purchased on the black market.
Would the "shit that can go wrong" be worse than being murdered in Syria?  

Where are your parents/grandparents from?  Or have your ancestors always resided in Canada for the last few centuries?  

PS - if you're counting on CPP to retire, then you're doing it wrong and you need to get some financial education, like yesterday.I waffled between calling it corn starch but syrup seemed more fitting for the example we're talking about.He's also executive producer of the Nightly Show (which I appreciate but many hate).  Not sure if many people knew that.

"Executive Producer" can mean almost anything. Can you elaborate?  Positive messages and inspiration for change is bad how?
Demographics say health care.  If I could go back to being a teenager I'd consider nursing, and I'd ignore my preconceptions that the individual matters more than the title and go for whatever nursing title has the most prestige.  Nurses are recession-proof, great mobility. work indoors, get paid to stay as physically active as you want to be, and in the right situation the pay and benefits can be excellent.Nathan For You doesn't seem scripted. It does seem highly edited, is that what you meant?
That kind of stereotyping doesn't really hold True across the animal kingdom.  In many creatures, the females are dominant.
Which ones specifically?
Corn starch / maltodextrin / solidified corn syrup are all the same: corn-based sugar.
Title is misleading. They are "phasing out" the Orca theater show in San Diego, but not their other locations.  And:  

- they claim this is to honor their customers' wishes.  If that were True, why are they continuing until 2017? Did customers say "We hate this practice, but can you just keep doing it for a year or two more?" 

- the same SeaWorld is running annoying commercials where their paid staff refute or minimize most of the things they claim to be "listening to".  

If it isn't obvious yet, Sea World management is full of ________.
Except they don't offer the same mass. They rely on illusion and deception to make the customer think they aren't getting ripped off. They charge the same, but give you 20% less and slap a non-specific "improved!" tag on it, then brag to their board about how they boosted profits.  

Ever wonder why many products have ever-increasing concave bubbles in the package?  Or why 6 muffins come in a plastic shell that could easily hold 12 if not for all the swoopy structures? You may want to do some research before making such proclamations.
LOL, you should probably have read the article not just the headline.  Not to discount your anecdotal feeling, but there's still hundreds of millions of TV viewers. CBC outsourced the moderation to a cheap bidder who is inept at the best of times. Recognizing more subtle violations is way outside their ability.
There's probably way more to this story than the way CBC is spinning it.  They've always been shady as hell regarding how they run/contract their comment moderation.  

My guess?  The volumes are up due to election and niqab and refugees, so their inept provider wants to charge them more because of the volumes.  The workaround is to clamp off public comment, but an excuse was needed, and management figured this one sounds truthy enough.Back up the Emmy trucks for that Bazinga sketch
LOL at Spike Lee doubling down on wearing the Mercedes Benz logo that he mistakenly thinks is a peace sign.  (He dissed Stephen Colbert's writers about this last week)
Trevor Noah is to hosting as Spike Lee is to directing.Well at least you're as consistently wrong with debunking theories as you are with keeping the systems crashing all the time.  
You read about the 4% decline and felt that supported your anecdote about knowing zero out of thirty-five people?  That doesn't make any sense.  For reference, people have said for a century that newspapers were dead when radio came along, then they said radio was dead when TV came along, then TV was dead when Internet came along.  


Guess what, newspapers, radio, TV and Internet... still here.  I mean sure, we're only down to a few billion TV watchers.

This was probably the [best photo of "Harper" in the Senate.](http://macblog.mcmaster.ca/fryeblog/wp-content/uploads/sites/4/2011/06/stopharper.jpg)At least while systematically ruining the country, he let his wife keep cats.  They really know how to vulcanize mac and cheese.Yep, any place that a selfish idiot can kill someone with foolish driving, they can enforce.  What an idea.
Keys in?  No.  Keys out?  Yes.

The law and interpretation in most places is centered around control of the vehicle.You mock, but apparently have never experienced the pointless, senseless, and completely avoidable death of loved ones.  Must be nice to live in a bubble of spiteful ignorance.
This is a valid ticket and I'm glad it happened.  Texting while driving is even **more** prevalent and dangerous than drunk driving. 

My opinion is second texting offence should be life in prison.  It would finally be a deterrent.  And for those it doesn't deter, I'll be happy to see them locked away not "accidentally" killing people with impaired driving.
No you're not. It's bee proven time and time again that the focus and time spent texting is vastly more dangerous than sipping water, speaking with a passenger, adjusting the heat, or touching your wallet.  

The offender's entire focus is on their smartphone and the vehicle can be in motion for several seconds and they would have no clue.
The stupidity of saying we shouldn't curb rampant deadly behavior because of rare exceptions.  Multiple tests have confirmed it is.  
Might want to learn the law."I have it on good authority (brother in the RCMP) who says two things they are explicitly allowed to do while on-the-clock and driving are eating, drinking (non alcohol), and smoking."  

Which are the two?
No.  The big issue isn't "ambiguousness".  Odd situations like this one are a molecule in a drop in a bucket in the ocean compared to the completely non-ambiguous flagrant and deadly violations happened en masses on every Canadian roadway.  

I welcome the day an automated solution or something like capital punishment comes along to reduce this scourge of selfish negligence.
If you can't formulate a response without taking your eyes for 5  seconds, you need to have someone drive you to emergency immediately and get your brain checked.
No offence, but that's SOP
"Say it with alcohol"Arguably texting in a drive through is worse because of customers, foot traffic, confined space and the fact you're "driving through", whereas a red light is motionless.  But both should be a lengthy license suspension with life in prison for 2nd offence.
Your inaccurate presumptions about my age just reinforce your sheer cluelessness.  Carelessly flailing a weapon around and risking the lives of innocents should make no distinction between whether the weapon is a gun, or it's the rusted out AMC Gremlin your mom lets you use to go pick up meth for the family. 

You're the mot ironic person to be calling someone a racist when you're basically a hate speech jukebox with a foul mouth.    You're so undereducated you don't even know what the word racist means.  
Well you just equated drunk driving to nazi germany, which makes you a real "winner".  Enjoy the Godwin's-dork-of-the-day award... you deserve it.
Well actually, no.  From following the CBC insider and other sources we know about CBC's trials and tribulations they've had outsourcing the moderation function to two different organizations.  They've had various miscues along the way, so this explanation would make sense given what we know.
You contend that 4% is huge.  I contend that 96% is huge.  I think I'm more right than you.  And your anecdote doesn't even match the article with the clicky headline.  

As those of us who have seen hype-on-steroids erroneously pronounce everything in life "dead" dozens of times before, we know that trends come and go but certain things live on.  

My buddy Sam even had a catch phrase: "reports of my death have been totally blown out of proportion by buzzfeed". Or something like that.  

Point is, people have been declaring TV dead since your great grandfather's era.  Collectively, they've been wrong hundreds of millions of times.  But maybe this time they won't be wrong.  I mean radio and newspapers are gone.  Oh wait, no they're not.  I'm willing to bet TV outlives radio a d newspapers.  And I'm also willing to bet your 50 year old eyes won't be jamming to season 90 of Survivor on your Apple Watch.  

Once you move out of the parents' home and get some work experience, you'll have some space and money, and a TV will just kind of materialize.  

When you have kids you'll discover the ~~babysitting~~ educational potential of a TV.  You'll get a bit older and run down, so you and the husband will find it's not the bad to veg out in front of a TV.  Your older eyes will start to appreciate a bigger picture.  

At some point you'll think back and say "I can't believe back in 2015 I claimed nobody owned a TV and that it was a dead fad.  I sure had some crazy ideas back then."
Sick.  And illiterate.

I should have known someone who posts an article that defeats her own position (just because the headline superficially looks superficially supportive) wouldn't take the time to read before snarking out.  And I do have stock in television, media, and content companies.  New record highs again last month.  
I'm impressed she got the numerals one through eleven correct.  

By I'm even more surprised to hear that Rachel Notley is controlling the Saudi Princes who are panic pumping their oil reserves dry.  I didnt think those guys even listened to women. 
Not True but don't let that stop ya.
Except for the fact his job doesn't specifically include free childcare.

Harper was a dishonest disgrace, but this was one cookie jar even he didnt finger.
**just to be pre-emptively clear, I hate Stephen Harper and his cronies** but Justin Trudeau has made a big mistake snorting out of this pork barrel.  

With his large salary he could easily afford to do what most other six-figure one percenters in Canada do: pay for your own effing babysitter.  

He makes decent money and has free living expenses.  Given his over-the-top orations on this subject, sucking public funds for two nannies is bad, then that double-speak justification just makes it worse.

No, not even Harper did this particular abuse.
 No it doesn't.Because every other family in Canada making hundreds of thousands of dollars can just pay their babysitter.  And those people have to pay for mortgages, heat, utilities, furniture, food, cars, car insurance, fuel, water, telephone, and all kinds of expenses that Justin Trudeau doesn't have to pay out of pocket. Because every other parent in Canada has to do the same thing, except we pay for our own nanny/daycare/babysitter.  He specifically campaigned against this kind of old school pork barrel money grubbing.  And besides, he has *zero*cost of living and a six figure salary.  He'll earn millions the first year he leaves office.  He can surely afford to pay his babysitter like the rest of us rubes.What would be the problem with Trudeau paying the nanny out of his own pocket, like any other (ethical) person in Canada does?
Reporting says he didnt dip his hand into this cookie jar.  Justin should have just paid the nanny himself, like every other honest hard-working Canadian does.
Apparently, no Harper didnt milk this one the way Justin is.
No, we were disgusted over systemic abuses like $5000 hotel charges so a minister could smoke her face off, and thousands on limousines when cars were provided, and paying for business trips that weren't business, and endangering armed forces for helicopter rides on fishing vacations, and senators claiming trips to Wadena that were actually drop-offs to Ottawa paid corporate board meetings, and political appointees handing out $90k bribes and trying to get audits findings changed, and supposed PEI and SK senators who maintain luxury homes in Ottawa.  And $18 orange juices when the conference fees already provided breakfast if the minister had actually shown up on time.
He promised to redirect his UCCB into charity.  That's a shell game though, because anyone can just say their charitable donations came "from" whatever funding source they like.
Every significant job has this requirement, but honest people just pay for their own nannies.  It's one of the costs and responsibilities of making the choice to have a bunch of kids.He's been a politician since they were born.  Show where he took nanny money, or quit being deceptive.
No not at all, om sorry you projected a meaning that was never there.  

In the context of that lesson, "you" doesn't mean NorthernNadia, it means everyone.  Try this simpler example: 

**"You're born, you live, you die."**

That's not a reference to any specific person, it's a reference to the shared experience of all people.  Same thing here. Please read it with that in mind.
Vulgar.  And illiterate.
Did you know you can't leave your infant alone when you go work at Walmart 2 km away either?  Funny how that works.
Way to try and distract from the issue.  *EVERY* parent has 24/7 responsibilities.  The issue is why can't he just pay for his nanny like the rest of us honest and ethical people do?  
I found it to be sheer cornball low grade shitcom material.  

Half the cast was acting brain dead, they made an active shooter situation into a sick joke, playing off the lame internet video flashmob trend of years ago.  The good news, whatever medicine you and your girlfriend use, it's potent.Seriously.  This show makes The Brink look funny, and that's saying a lot.
A few actors were playing it as a dry comedy, but the rest were doing garbage SNL-level scenery chewing performanes.  It's like they didnt all even know what kind of show it is.  

The Kids In The Hall guy has decided to do his character with a muppet voice?  Who thought that was a good ideas?He doesn't have pay for anything else.  Not a meal, not a mortgage, not a water bill.  Plus while you were sleeping, he made a bunch of speeches about how he wasn't going to do this.  Second month in office, not one nanny on the public purse, but two.  Plus why is it the least educated people all think CEO's are superheroes.  So uninformed.  

Ad FYI, the Walmart clerk has to pay her living expenses, fund her retirement, pay for housing and transportation.  **And** pay for child care.  If she can do it on poverty salary, the self- righteous PM can too.

Yeah that rubbed me the wrong way too.
For those missing the "old" Daily Show, check out the A block of The Nightly Show.  Larry Wilmore ripped up Fox News and clowns like Bill O'Reilly who whip up their illiterate viewers and are likely complicit in things like creating the Planned Parenthood murderer.  It was, you know, the way Jon Stewart used to.  

You can skip the dumb sketch in B block and yesterday's panel wasnt anything special.  

But after a particularly weak TDS episode, I found TNS opening was particularly cathartic. Except for the fact it doesn't, then sure.  

What's next, PM is a stressful job, so taxpayers should pay for his cigarettes?

FYI, google lunches aren't there to save the employees a few bucks, it's to keep employees on site.  

And also FYI, Canadian PM's aren't quite the continuous globe trotters most uninformed people think. There's a few brief windows of time in which they concentrate a number of trips.  They squeeze them in between sessions, like around this year's 6 month "Christmas break" or the traditional 3-4 month summer break.  Notice that most countries follow this pattern of lull, and that's why and how your have world leaders in turkey one week and France the next.  

But once government is back in session, the trips end and every PM can be home for dinner if he wishes.  That's a luxury tht millions of people whose jobs require travel for 49 weeks of the year can only dream of. Or for truckers.  Or anyone that has to do shift work.
He's less busy than the average single mom, but you keep fantasizing about his superpowers.  And he doesn't just have one pork barrel nanny, he has two.  Two nannies plus two parents.  Parliament sits for half days, a quarter of the year.  

You have no concept of what "busy" means.  Try working two overlapping jobs and raising kids.  Preparing your own meals.  With food that you have to buy, not placed before you by a chef.  Cleaning your own house.  Taking your kids to school and activities.  Helping them with school work.  Doing parent volunteer shifts, working fundraisers, cutting the grass, mending the clothes, scrubbing the tub, building the crafts, reading the stories, changing the sheets, finding the lost homework.  Justin (or any PM) would be hospitalized after a week of a single mom's schedule.

And besides, you've completely, utterly, and obtusely missed the whole point.  Who cares if he wants two nannies? Let him make the call.  Get four nannies, and a part time boot polisher for all I care.  The point is he can pay for them like every other honest working "busy" person.

Well if Rona Ambrose said that a government minister is too busy to have children, it must be True.  I guess all the ones who do must be ghosts.  And you're right, people like you comparing Trudeau's privileged life to that of a working person are both condescending and ignorant.I know what's not included.  That's why cabinet had to make a special exception and bastardized the "special assistants" job title, plus send out that piece of double-speak bullshitese.
Get a dictionary, that word has more than just the one meaning you know about.  It's a reference to when a politician abuses their position to take money or something of value.  Spoken like a True sicko, blame the working poor for not trying hard enough.  Everybody can be a CEO if they just listen to Oprah tapes, right?  Who needs nurses and janitors and bus drivers and police officers and teachers and bank clerks and public servants and all the people that creeps like you enjoy shitting on.
"good one bruh your so hard and educated". 

So much irony in one illiterate sentence-facsimile.

Tarantino's "Kill Bill" had a six month long intermission.
He was a robbed (sort of) with Inglorious Bastards.  If he would have toned down the comic element, might have helped his chances.For me, he peaked with Inglorious Bastards.  I'm not looking forward to another Western, though I'm plenty open to being pleased with whatever comes out.  I also don't really care about gimmicks like an intermission card.  I lives through that the first time, and you're not missing much.Lately, M\u00f6bius.  Everyone seemed to say it was boring or confusing, but I liked the layers or intrigue and the ever-rising tension and jeopardy of the characters.  Cabinet had to make the call on this, and they used misleading job titles.  

And besides, Trudeau could have and should have paid for this optional luxury.
I was one of Harper's most active critics, so if you're saying Trudeau should try and emulate Harper, I think that's foolish.
At least you learned something today, even if you tried really hard not to.
He missed a chance to do the right thing here, and for the sake of a tiny slice of his wealth, he made the wrong call.
The intermission is a gimmick, same as the goofy title cards that Quentin often does.  He's known for not being able to edit for time, so plunking an intermission into an already long film just seems like more bloviating.
Because I actually read the reporting on it it *before* commenting.  I know, i know, being informed isn't "cool" on this subreddit.  Are you prepared to issue a public apology and retraction if we find that "all PM's had publicly funded child care" is a lie?
... said the idiot.
You need to find you elementary school teachers and demand a refund because they apparently failed to teach you anything.
Using fake titles was an attempt to skate past the rhetoric and False promises he made about how millionaires like he and Harper don't need to suck up taxpayer money for their child care.  Meanwhile, that's the first thing he does.  It's a disgrace and it's pretty revealing how people decide when it's OK for him to lie.
Yes they do.  If Trudeau decided he wanted this luxury, he could have and should have just paid for it himself.  It's not like his $350k salary is going towards food or utilities or car payments or mortgage.  He's looking like a major liar and hypocrite on this one.
And now CBC is censoring you from expressing any positive message about First Nations.  The silly thing is CBC admitting they are incapable of managing their comments system, but then being very selective about which topic they choose to censor.  If they're telling the truth, then other topics are also uncontrolled and subject to the same problems.
That's False.  The taxpayer has paid for public assets like the home and car, not private things like nannies.  And what makes this different is Trudeau campaign on the lie and the False implication that millionaires should be sucking up taxpayer dollars for child care, yet that was the first pork barrel he opened for himself.  

He really screwed up here.  If he'd simply taken an ethical stance and kept his promise, paid for this luxury himself, he'd be a hero.  Now he's appearing as a liar and just like every other crooked politician.
So now that you know that your statement was False, do you retract it or just going to run with the lie that all previous PM's used taxpayers money for nannies?
His expenses have been published. Post where Harper used tax dollars to pay for nannies, or quit lying.
Well said.
Love how he's one that actually committed the betrayal, but somehow you're making it my fault.

But but but this would mean that Bill O'Reilly and Fox News and all the Republican Presidential candidates are full of BS
FYI, that's not structurally proper.  A floor surface - even hardwood - does not have the sufficient structure.  This should have been lagged to joists.  I pray nobody heavy leans against it and takes a tumble.
This method would not pass a proper inspection.
Anyone with kids would see this as a nightmare. It basically invites children to climb up and fall down."Most certainly"?  

I could easily see it being classified more as a pony wall, and as such, not meeting requirements.
Sorry, but why not put up a safe and legal railing, then build a free standing book case to go right up against it and block the bars (which you imply was your True design goal)?   

As it is, this setup is unsafe and in some jurisdictions, the home cannot be sold until re-mediated.


He betrayed his word and promises on the campaign.  Your obfuscation doesn't change the facts.Read the article. Post after, not before.
Nannies have not "traditionally" been a part of that.  And besides, why lie and call them "special assistants".  That's like calling you a "communications revision and deception distribution analyst".

You should stop commenting until you read the subject and learn what Trudeau said just a matter of weeks ago.  You're looking like you're either super-uninformed, or that you're desperately trying to revise history. 

You trying to whitewash and hide public records is what's pathetic.  Just stop.  
It's about a significant television event so it belongs here.  It's still legal for you not to participate in threads.  
Nightly Show news segment is actually funny and harkens back to the old Daily Show.  And TNS is not as "urban" skewed as non-watchers/redditors would have you believe.
I agree with you *if* that's what's happening. Not yet convinced of that though.
I was curious to see how this interview would be handled, now we won't know. C'mon, give Trevor a few years/decades to develop his humor.  You know, the same way Letterman and Dave Chappelle and Stephen Colbert and John Oliver all needed years to be competent, and how they all had to steal jokes to get their start.
Which of these three things **doesn't** belong in the category of quality humor:

-  Great climate segment with Desi Lydic

-  Wicked Jessica Williams piece on those stupid "hover boards"

-  Trevor Noah's impersonations of French police officer and citizen 
Maybe. But isn't there an equally possible situation that the staff rebellion mentioned yesterday forced the Daily Show to cancel him, instead of the other way around?
Neither would qualify as structural.Yep, everyone is a millionaire and nobody does the work, sounds feasible.
All your rage and profanity doesn't change the facts of what he said, and how he's ruining his own reputation with cynical old school pork barrel tactics like this.  

Of course he has a army of useful idiots trying to erase history, most of them not even realizing they're acting like the same brain dead zombies that supported Harper no matter what.
In general True, but every so often, like about one in ten, it's decent.
Im not the one bitching like a tribute to whiny irony.  

CNN's ups and downs are quite relevant and thee debates typically crush whatever on TV so you claiming that's not television-related makes about as much sense as saying the ocean isn't water-related.Unless it's someone pathetically complaining about me, and trying (with epic futility and impotent desperation) to erase history.
Your man crush Stephen Harper didn't, so can you stop lying now?
He hit hard on the issue of whether Nick Cannon is amazing, or just awesome.So far? The bullshit over how he and other millionaires should never take government child care assistance, followed immediately by trying to hide his Nannies under fake job titles, then a doublespeak bullshit statement, followed by armies of bullshit apologists trying to roll back his comments and defending him for something they'd gladly have killed Harper for had he done the same.
His impersonations have fallen flat a few dozen times, and every. Single. Time. They're show killers.
If your context is one of hero worship, then OK. 

But then you'd have to go back in time and erase his bold statements from a couple months ago saying he'd never do pull that stunt.
Except your the only one trying to distance herself and minimize it.  I'm not.  Actually by this point in their run they *had* gotten fairly sloppy, and they were severely admonished for what could easily have been multiple fatalities.That's not what "act of god" means, but you'd make a good corporate lawyer with that kind of blatant blame shifting.The article headline and the source (Bill Simmons) are full of it.  
The CEO recognized this coming and spoke to it two quarters ago.  The stock immediately took a dive as a direct result.  

Sure, average normies and people with axes to grind might not have known this, but every knowledgable person in the industry and on Wall Street has known about this for *months*.  Him saying otherwise is False.
You're getting downvoted, no doubt because people are just lashing out because of Reddit's near universal love for torrents and hate for the very concept of paying for content.  But as you and I both know, subscriber pressure was being well publicized and talked about in company conference calls all year. The narrative that management didnt know and was surprised is total bunk.
For me it is.  If I wanted to see professional obsequiousness gone to insane levels, I'd be watching Fallon.
Even if we were to accept your False premise that Jon Stewart sucked doing characterizations (he didnt, that's bullshit, but for now let's humor you) then let's consider your argument...

You're saying that just because someone else sucks hard, that we should be happy Trevor Noah is doing his best to suck even harder? 
Uh, we're not in a universe where his impersonations are great, but just need a bit of tuning to "perfect them".  They're nowhere in the same reality sphere as "perfect".  They're worse than what you'd get at a junior high improv class, or a particularly below average chuckle hut open mic night.
Why on earth would Tim Hortons issue a letter in support of a driver who is practicing one of the most dangerous and negligent acts you can do?  Tim Hortons products and marketing might suck, but I doubt they're big fans of the way texting drivers are killing innocent people.
Very surprised the police are commenting with details here. That never happens as it would compromise the case.  I suspect they've made an internal decision that even if this weakens one traffic case, the public relations and deterrence message outweigh the undermining of one ticket.  

The story sounds a little far fetched, but I have such low regard for people who text and drive that I'm not too broken up if they get a rough ride from law enforcement.  It's the least they deserve.
Read this sub.  Read the internet.  Read qualified reviewers.  Watch the show and hear the audience go quiet.  His performance thus far has been a demonstration of cringe, with an object lesson of what happens when the person you desperately want for a role doesn't audition, but you push ahead anyway because of stereotyping and blind optimism.
Not really. Just being objective. How on earth can a company organize mass liquor but can't organize taxis or car service?
Outside of law enforcement, most people wouldn't know that suspects and shoplifters and such will often go to the bathroom in their own pants as some kind of misguided attempt to escape custody.
It's not hatred any more than a weatherman reporting that it's raining is "spouting hatred" of sunshine.  Comvratulations, your vulgarity is matched only by your oblivious ignorance.... proving the point, thanksWhat show is this where Jon Stewart is trying to impersonate Trevor Noah?  I'll be sure to stop watching it.
When it rains, you apparently think the clouds are out to get you personally.  While that explains the irrationality of your attack, it's a decidedly serious symptom and an unhealthy condition.  
Yep, his universal popularity with uh, you, and uh, well, not too many others...  that's compelling.
There's lots of things you "never heard of" apparently, starting from comprehension and logic and ranging all the way through to common sense.
His Dave Chappelle jokes were funny.
"As a whole"?. You're right, it's probably only 90% or so that are opposed to paying fair amounts for content.  
Did you know that a drunk driver who pulls into a drive through doesnt magically sober up?  Never mind, of course you didn't know that.  That qualifer covers a couple of common scenarios.  The first is the misperception that $8 Netflix fee reflects a sustainable or realistic payment for content.  It doesn't.  Netflix hasn't been paying or accounting for real world content costs, so something has to break.

The other covers the basket of frequent objections we hear from people who pirate that "they're paying" in some alternate and self-derived way.  They say "they pay" by virtue of their high capacity internet fees, or that the concert ticket they bought entitles them to download an artist's discography, or that their early piracy turns them into a promotional vehicle who deserves compensation, or that because such and such a movie will eventually be televised or they may be in a bargain bin in two years, it's OK to torrent it early on release day.  All these cases where some indirect "payment" is seen as a justification, I lump under that same heading of not paying a fair/sustainable amount for content.As a side point, I've yet to meet the person who actually does restrict themselves to the "2 channels" or "1 show".  I know it's mentioned a lot but the people I know who claim that are watching much more, but they tend to minimize that reality, for effect.  

I do wonder what would happen if for example your $40 for 2 channels became $3 per channel, and tuning any channel would add the corresponding amount to the tab.  Would people cut out the channel surfing and the hours upon hours of watching stuff they don't like and don't want?
From those who don't understand basic science, sure.  Lack of reading does seem to be a common companion to content pilfering.
"When you buy an album the artist gets none of it". Yes, that myth is used constantly to justify piracy.  It's not True of course.

Please note I never said one word about how nice or convenient digital copies are.  But pirating for convenience or spite or ease of use or any other justification is still pirating.  We know there's lots of reasons *why* you pirated 300 movies, but it doesn't change the fact you pirated 300 movies.

There's no world where Netflix runs profitably at $8 unless the content is chopped dramatically.  There's no world where the current core t gets renewed unless the price is hiked considerably.  There's no world where Netflix maintains it's popularity on in-house content alone.  There's no world where Netflix can afford to keep indiscriminately dumping money into cult projects like Degrassi reboots and Richie Rich and Full House 2.0 and Marco Polo without there ever being consequences.
I'd liken it to hotel mini-bar controls.  I think that if strict controls were in place where usage is charged per channel, people's bills will show that they do flip to E! to just "sample" Keeping Up With The Kardashians, etc.  Everybody says it's garbage they would never watch or pay for, yet everybody has somehow seen most episodes.  
Makes me wonder what he saw 4 years ago that was better.
If you think being parked in a running car while drunk is safe then you need to correct your misunderstanding of the law.
You should also learn the difference between "distracted" and "impaired" and "under the influence".  Could save you from killing someone or ringing up some convictions due to ignorance of the law.
Neither Colbert nor Stewart showed up so thoroughly unmatched for their jobs. Colbert made history on night one, and most young redditors don't even know he was killing it on TDS and other shows right out of the gate.  

Trevor Noah has years of unfunny standup and plagiarism, years of unfunny tweeting and offensive remarks, a year of terrible correspondent appearances, and he's building a year of hideous TDS hosting, where even his supporters mainly talk not about what he's doing but what he might do someday.

How many years before he metamorphoses into something completely different than he's been all along?  3 more?  5 more? 
Why?  The misinterpretation of the second amendment means we shouldn't. The NRA should sponsor an amendment that makes amendments unconstitutional
In fairness, before instant communications were the norm, you wouldn't have heard the news as quickly either so you wouldn't be worrying for hours, you'd hear later after the conclusion was known.
The danger comes when you drive over customers because you're looking at your insipid social media site and posting non-factual nonsense.  Newsflash: vehicle much heavier than human victim
I'm not your bro, girlfriend.  On the rare occasion where you look up from your cell phone you may have noticed these objects moving in and out of the restaurant.  Those of us who are enlightened call them "people".  You call them speed bumps.Justin Trudeau missed a chance to score a point in the "real" versus "all talk" column.  

This is an optional choice which he could have and should have covered with his own healthy salary.  Not doing so makes his previous comments and commitments on this subject to as appear to be disingenuous lies.
Manufacturers by the fact he did it.  One way to not "manufacture" the controversy would have been for him to simply be fair and honest.  Then there's no controversy.  Plus it would have been the first chance for him to put something real behind his talk.  He blew it.
It's actually not a specific benefit.  That's why cabinet had to make it a discretionary perk, and that's also why they create the deliberately False and misleading job titles.  

You may think it should be, but it's not.  And given his commitments just weeks ago, it's especially disappointing how quickly he violated his stance, all to save a pittance of his own money.  When someone throws away their values for a few bucks, my opinion of them is lowered.

Again, missing the point that his actions this week completely contradict his recently stated values.  He sold out for the sake of a few bucks.  Apparently talk is cheap for Justin Trudeau, and especially for his blind fan club.
For starters, millions of other Canadians are "on call" 24-7.  The difference is they aren't millionaires, they don't make $350,000 a year, and they have to pay their rent, their fuel, their insurance, their property tax, their utilities, their car payment, their water bill, etc. 

And these average Canadians also didnt stand up and make a grand and dishonest spectacle about how they wouldn't do this. 
 First, the chef and housekeeping are needs that are specific to the job which includes frequent government-related hosting and entertaining.  

Nanny service is *not* the same as it is a personal luxury, not a government-related function.  

But ignore those fact and focus of the biggest issue: he claimed he wouldn't pull this kind of shit, and yet the first moral choice between keeping his word or lining his pocket, he's chosen to take the money.Unfortunately the blind army of supporters really really really doesn't want this fact brought up.  They'd rather:  

- say it's Ok because other PM's were corrupt. 
- make False claims that nanny service is a specific job benefit. 
- claim that he's underpaid compared to other irrelevant jobs
- slam Rona Ambrose. 
- continue the honeymoon phase and ignore the fact that broken promises mean broken trust

Your "belief" is mistaken.  Now that you know that, can we move on to objectively assessing the fact that he's gone completely against the values he claimed during the campaign?
What we're saying is that when you say that wealthy politicians don't need to milk the taxpayers for child care - and you also say that Canadians can't afford such luxuries - that a few weeks later you're actually going to live up to those statements, not betray them as False rhetoric at the first chance to line your own pockets.
Well,there's a few other things like hosting and travel and such.  But yes, nanny service is an optional luxury that he should have and could have paid for if that is a luxury he wants.Then why did you elect a guy who said the opposite on his campaign?
That incredible Liam Neeson impersonation... 11/10.  And the basement hacker screaming for his mom?  Incredible.  Shadow Fingers?  Amazing.  African Elmer Fudd?  Pure gold!  The mafia guy?  Magnifique!   

Jon who?  
It was a bit hit or miss, a few pretty good aspects but a couple momentum killers within.  I didnt mind it that much, although it did have some flaws.  Clearly the idea was to stitch together a few outrageous related news blurbs into one segment.  The irony of saying how much you want to watch cable content and "I don't have a need for cable" in the same breath.

People can blame "the stifling actions" of companies, but pirating is pirating.  

I'm dismayed that this generation seems to think as long as you can get away with stealing something, you might as well just do it.  

That lady looked at me funny.  That's a rapin'

Bank wants me to pay my mortgage?  That's an armed robbin'

Police officer stopped me when I was speeding?  That's a shootin'
If this fictional oil executive used company money for personal luxuries, she/he would be fired, disgraced and/or charged.  And unlike Trudeau, the oil executive didnt make empty speeches about how he would never do such a thing, then immediately break his word.
You won't see him changing on this.  His communications artists have already built a thick bullshit wall around this. And infatuated supporters are making up fresh excuses and justifications by the hour, so they've already got millions of pawns ready to defend it and ignore reality.

From a practical perspective, the sneaky way they did this, with council order and government payroll means it would be very hard to unravel due to the now governmentally-linked employment commitments that have been made.  So expect the bullshit rationalizations to ramp up, not down.
You've revealed the True repugnancy of your personality by trying to smear the messenger and in your overt degradation of people who work in convenience stores.  Considering who you are, there's probably a good dose of racism underlying those insults too.  

If you can't defend the corrupt behavior, best thing is to take cheap shots at me, at working people, and minorities.  Good thing Harper is gone so that a new wave of dishonest xenophobes like you can show is what real naivety and willful blindness can do.

Shall we pay for his back waxing, because his fan club says "he has the nation on his back" (gag).  

Which optional luxuries should he be able to sneak in under the guise of cabinet contracts? Should it matter that mere weeks ago he specifically made a point of not needing this and Canada not being able to afford it?  

If your infatuation makes you choose to brainwash his campaign promises out of your mind, then what's the point.  In your imaginary world it never happened.
When you say he didnt, you're covering your ears and screaming "lalalalalalalala". 

Unfortunately, that doesn't change recorded history. He's on the record.Except that's not True.  You're just making up a convenient narrative cover story to try and wash away bad behavior.  

What is the exact nature and amount of this budget that is directly tied to the actual job?  Doesn't exist.  

The issue you're trying to hide and obfuscate is that he campaigned against this specific form of goldbricking, and at the first opportunity to either be honorable or lie and line his pockets, he chose the money over honesty.  That's the real issue, not some bullshit smokescreen about a fictional budget.
That was the least they could do.  No, literally, the least.Except the job doesn't specially provide a "personal assistants benefit", as the volunteer bullshit army is spinning.  You're even going further, adding lies like "every PM" to the cover story.

Guess what?  We're not stupid or gullible.  We know you're lying.  Even Harper, one of the least reputable leaders of all time, didnt do this.  So your "every other PM did it" is pure dishonesty.

They knew this, that's why they tried hiding it under the guise of the capital commissions residence maintenance function, and it also why they tried covering it with the deceptive titles.  

Can't wait until you automatons try claiming the job comes with prostitutes as "stress alleviation ministers" and a cash gambling account for "retirement pension augmentation fund".  More lies and more trashing of working class people. I'd expect nothing else from someone with your reprehensible personality.  
After the first 10 times this was posted it wasn't "fun"There's much superior industry-spanning platforms that RBC avoids just to crank up profits.
I would love to see the ages old idea of a crown company/postal banking option to kick these corrupt oligopoly banks in the shins.

These big banks treat their employees and customers like dog crap.
Who decides what "needed" means?  To me, RBC "needs" thousands of employees to fix their shitty customer service and their primitive tools.  They "need" to replace slackers with people of principle and community commitment.  

We give a tiny number of massively advantaged banks a monopoly on billions in extortive profits.  I think it's fair to demand they give back in the form of better jobs and better services and fairer prices and less general abuse of their privilege.
Smith is a different employee who was fired for something else.If you have to lie about what I said, it's pretty much confirmed your standing on thin air.  You claimed "every other prime minister" hired nannies under False titles.  That's demonstrably False, which is probably why you're reacting with more bluster and trying to misquote me.  Lies and smoke screens won't undo facts and public record.
In some rare instances they do, as an explicit part of their compensation that's reviewed by their employer.  

Now find us where a CEO campaigned for the job promising they didnt want this perk, then immediately claimed it using False pretenses.  Don't post again until you find an example.  Bye.
Ah yes, the old "who cares if my guy is liar, other people lie.  Who cares if my guy stole, it was only such-and-such an amount, who cares if my guy did anything, because something something something else happened somewhere somewhere somewhere else.

Tell you what.  Give me access to your bank and credit card accounts.  After I drain them, we'll say you have no right to complain because of the earthquake in Haiti.  

And I'm not a sad little man, but by projecting, you've as much as admitted your "shortcoming" in public.  Way to go, pee wee.
You already revealed you have the educational aptitude of a potato.  If you're so easily brainwashed with leader infatuation, why would anyone expect you to suddenly develop instant critical thinking ability?  You create a fake and absurdly unlikely new story and have the irony to call someone else a troll?  Go troll elsewhere.
Full ears-covered screaming then hey?
And when caught, you pull out the standard deny deny deny playbook.  Naturally.
Actually no it doesn't. The residence is an asset property owned by the people of Canada and thus rightly operated by the capital commission.

Trudeau's children are not property owned by the people of Canada.  It seems weird having to explain such basics but when the spin doctors want to lie, they really need to ignore fundamental facts.
Give us documentation of PM Stephen Harper employing nannies under False job titles.  Or stop spreading Falsehoods.
Keep lying, it's all you've got
Your pants-covered inadequacy notwithstanding, nannies look after children.  And contrary to your fantasies, children aren't assets owned by the people of Canada.
Whatever species replaces us probably won't be quite as self-delusional.Guaranteed, Donald Trump would have prevented this.
Been re-watching this series. I'd forgotten how brilliant and hilarious it was.  Almost every scene is a gem.
Bryan Cranston sells it.  In the same episode Lois is drugged up and gives truthful answers to whatever the boys ask her.
It's called Krelboyne Picnic, but it's actually an "academic circus".

The "everybody gets a great storyline" is actually a feature of almost every episode.  Even when someone is left out of the main plot, they get their own plot that's still 100 times better than anything happening on current sitcoms.
I think this statement confirms the full extent of your understanding.And detonation.He needs to pick Palin for VP to achieve the full comedic effect.
Yes he did.  The CC in UCCB stands for Child Care.  What do you suppose the nannies' job is?  Here's a hint: Child Care.

We get it, you're brainwashed to his ideology, but at least own it and admit it.  His communications people are already doing their job and lying for him, so they don't need your amateur assistance.  Have some self-respect.

If True, this would be the third major campaign lie/whopper of the week.  We've seen Trudeau over-state his ability to bring refugees, then over-promise on his own ability to resist pork barreling with his child care expense lie, and now it's over-stating his tax revenue plan?  

C'mon Justin.  When you're making Rona Ambrose look honest, you know you're screwing up.
It's not a "garbage stat".  Everyone, including apparently you, knows what it means.  It's when there's multiple victims and/or killers.  That's not hard to understand.  

What you **should** be focused on is that from the 1800's up to 2011 these mass shootings would occur on a frequency averaging 200 days between incidents.  Since 2011, they've become crazily more common than that.  Not really sure what would motivate you to try and minimize a serious situation like this.
700% higher is "barely a difference"?   

With math/attitudes like this, is it any wonder mass shootings are escalating?
You'll be shouted down by people who only know one of the amendments, and are fixated on an inaccurate interpretation of it.
I'm skeptical of this, given how low the lottery odds are. Got a source?
7 times more likely.  Nobody with credibility would call that a small difference.
Keep telling yourself that theft is "noble".  Gun deaths in USA: 32,000 per year

As I suspected, it's not even close.
"They won't let me do it any other way."

Except for paying a monthly subscription fee that costs less than one night at the movies.I didnt say anything about what salary Trudeau could or couldn't command.  That's some misdirectional bullshit intended to try and distract from the fact he campaigned that he would never need or take taxpayers money for child care, and yet he's breaking his word at the first opportunity to fill his own pockets.  

So is bullshit about whether or not his job is stressful, or your bullshit about paying the PM $50k, or all the other misdirectional bullshit talk.  On the raw facts, he said one thing on the campaign and he's broken his word.  He tried concealing it with fake job titles, and now he's been caught.  The army of fawning apologist like you are trying to bury the truth in bullshit, but you're only smearing it on yourself and your own integrity.
That's as much bullshit as the fanboys no are desperately trying to cover this up.  He "was" a full teacher, not a "part-time snowboard instructor".  So in other words, still not even close?
Spoken with all the intelligence of a True gun totin' Sarah Palin workshippin' incest lovin' patriot.
You keep telling stealing and telling yourself it's not theft."He has the same staff Harper did."

If you show me proof that PM Stephen Harper employed two nannies under fake job titles, I'll retract.  If you can't then you retract and apologize for attempting to spread bullshit.  

And besides, for all his faults, Stephen Harper didnt directly promise not to take taxpayer's money for his personal child care.  Justin Trudeau did. He's lied, and he tried sneaking it past using deceptive means.  All the linguistic gymnastics in the world, all the False comparisons to Stephen Harper, all the red herrings meant to distract... none of it changes the actual facts in this situation which are stark and can't be denied.It's an issue because he directly promised never to do this, but now he has.  It's an issue because he tried deceptively hiding it using fake job titles.  It's an issue because his infatuated followers are going to great lengths to try and bury the public record and trying to justify the bad behavior by equating him with the lowest integrity PM's of recent history.  The uproar is because it's such a stark and obvious and blantant lie from his campaign, and because he deceptively tried sneaking it through under fake job titles.  And part of the story is how blindly his infatuated supporters are pretending this didnt happen.
If the CEO is on record promising never to do smething and then instantly reveals he's been lying his ass off, of course we'd call him out.  And if that same lying CEO tries using deceptive job titles to carry out his behavior, we'd call him out on that too.  It's weird that Trudeau's most infatuated fans are saying something is OK "because Harper did the same" (he didnt). Of course their follow up is "well he would have."
Perhaps, but you know who is on the record stating that you're wrong?  Justin Trudeau. He pointed out that as a millionaire he wouldn't need or take taxpayer's money to cover his personal luxury choices.  He promised not to, even adding some additional bravado about how he'd give his child care money to charity.  He said Canada can't afford it.

"The Trudeaus have done what all other working parents have to do."  

Actually the Trudeuas skipped one key thing that "all other working parents" do... paying for this service.

And of course "all other working parents" don't try hiding their expenses under fake job titles either.
Governments that allow these mega-mergers aren't serving the citizens, they're politicians working as corporate puppets.
Nope, not "unsubstantiated".  He's on the record.  Justin fans keep trying to erase facts and history, won't work.

If only there were some kind of engine that would satisfy your search request, and if only that would take less than one second for you to do yourself.
Let me not google that for you.
The Daily Show is becoming harder and harder to handle with Trevor Noah.
Send me some money and I'll return it to you next day with 50% return.  

I might be a few decades late, but don't say I over-stated my promise.  

The *cost*'of the child care thing is small, which is why a millionaire who lives for free and gets a $350,000 discretionary allowance could probably have just paid for it himself... Like he promised.  

What's not small is the lie this represents, and the deceptive attempt to hide it under fake job titles and secretive cabinet orders.

That's not a hoverboard. It's a bunch of omnicopters with a BBQ grill taped on top of them.
The point was that why did The Daily Show miss this when The Nightly Show didnt?  

They film around the same time.This is a discussion worthy of its own thread.  

The implication of course is that The Daily Show had previously been the gold standard of news parody, and The Nighty Show has (unfairly) been cast as a lesser being.  

This year we've seen a precipitous drop in the quality of The Daily Show, perhaps highlighted by yesterday's inability to address the biggest current event.   

On the the other hand, The Nightly Show took at major leap in quality after its initial weak beginning.  Most people don't know this because the initial feedback has become dogma and a lot of viewers haven't updated their assessment.  

Although The Nightly Show did address this off the top, the entire episode was rather weak.  It had only one prepared segment, a sarcastic puppet show parody that didn't seem to land.  Then an unscripted interview followed by a thrown together panel.  (You know it's thrown together when the producer Rory just sits down and pretends to be a panelist.)

My guess is the staff spent much of their day following the news events instead of preparing a full show, so we got this TV dinner of an episode instead.Trevor probably has giggles ready for every occasion.
The irony of someone who thinks "gunna" is a word trying to question someone else's mental capacity? 


What a wordy and distractingly inaccurate way to "make something simple". Then again, your intention was never to "make it simple", your intention is to throw up a large enough smokescreen of bullshit that people might not notice the breach of trust. You failed.  

More long-winded misdirection about whether or not a Prime Minister is busy.  That's never been the issue. The issue is he could have - and should have - paid for this optional luxury service himself.

It's made worse by the fact that doing this makes his campaign representations a lie.
Buy Cold-FX and put the unopened bottle under your pillow.  Try and get your hands on some H^2 O power water.  J-Law Laboratories.

Curious how you know it shortened the duration of something that hadn't happened yet.Using the tips here is guaranteed to reduce your cold from 7 days down to just 1 week.
In large doses, it absolutely can.  And of course, the recommendations always seem to call for large doses.Knowing the 'flu' isn't actually the flu would be a good place to start.
If you can prove beyond a shadow of doubt that you are physically incapable of using any of the countless search engines, then I'll do it for you.  Until then we'll operate under the reasonable assumption it's just laziness or your lack of ability.If you can show proof that PM Stephen Harper used two taxpayer funded nannies hired under False job titles, then sure. Until then, the only possible conclusion is you're full of shit.No it doesn't "come with the fucking job". That's just a truthy lie being created and spread by naive fans who don't actually know the facts.  Are you one of the creators, or just a naive spreader?

Hopefully they're migrating it to trudeau**meter**.ca, for those of us who aren't enthralled with pretentious alternate spellings.
Sounds like you're eventually understanding what was said in the original clear post.
Although your concerns are very likely unfounded, it is disconcerting when you open the smoke detector and notice the battery has been removed for who knows how long.
... from the future?
Did he make clear denouncements and promise never to do this?  "Just like Trudeau"?  

And I suppose you don't mind that he's stealing resources away from their intended purpose of maintaining a public asset in order to fund his personal luxury services?  

Anyway, if you're so pumped that Trudeau commits the same kind of lies and abuses as Stephen Harper, why didn't you just re-elect him?
You're his science and communications officer?  Where's your peer reviewed data?  And where's some literature on the validity of one person's anecdotal predictions as scientific proof?
That's not how all "Canadians" spell it, it's not even how most Canadians spell it.  It's a pretentious vestigial spelling.
You're claiming I'm wrong, so where's your proof.  Or is that concept "too difficult" for you?
What the uneducated and infatuated Trudeau apology army doesn't understand is that some things are public assets, owned by, and (rightly) cared for with public funds.  That's why care for the residence and furnishings makes sense.  Government hosted events it makes sense why a government cook be provided.  

What's different is that Trudeau's kids aren't public possessions.  

And what's especially different is how loudly and proudly Trudeau promised never to do this, and yet on day one he's not only lining his pockets, he's spreading bull surrounding it, hiding behind cabinet orders, and using deceptive job titles.  That's what makes it "different".  

If he'd made no such promises, that might be something to discuss.  Then we'd only have the issue of him taking public resources intended for protecting public assets, and using them for his personal non-public benefit.  That's still bad in itself, but the fact he made such clear and dishonest promises calls his trustworthiness into question.

I didnt need to "try to be right", the facts are what make me right.  No "trying" required or relevant.
Nice try Martin Shkreli
Sheep worship Trudeau's lie.
The *what* benefit? Child care?  What could child care possibly have to with nannies?  

Although considering you think the association of nannies with child care is "rocket science", it would make sense how more abstract concepts like ethics and honesty are too advanced for you.

Oh no, a smartass who didn't actually read the link he posted:

**"Measuring devices (such as ammeter, speedometer) are spelled "-meter" in all countries"**

Have someone teach you what "all countries" means.


The PM lying and deceptively violating his campaign promises is relevant to Canadians.  Obviously not *all* Canadians, as there's still some infatuated ones who will help peddle this lie, or pretend it did happen.  And then there's some, like you, who will admit he did it, but then try to distract by saying it's not a large amount of money, or "hey stop noticing that deception, what about these other issues?"

...there's plenty of risks beside lethal dose.  Mainly for people who have kidneys, so maybe that's what you meant?Wow,  you didnt read my comment *or* the link you posted.  
Tell us how a Trudeau-inspired thermometer spelled as "metre" could ever be "a little bit right"?  ... says someone who has disgraced himself repeatedly, and has all the perceptive ability of a carrot.
It was funny, but since it was ADR I was a bit taken out of the scene.
Uh it's beyond cheap.  They aren't shooting miles of film, and the cost of loggers is shamefully low. Animated shows and generic network sitcoms cost in the millions.
It doesn't need to be that low key. There's millions of people who wouldn't even recognize Jerry Seinfeld, so there's still millions of dry cleaners, nail salons, gas stations, etc that can easily be used as marks.
If he wants to continue doing it, then it will be renewed.  It's low cost and fits the mandate.  

If he gets a big gig, they won't get into a bidding war obviously. Whaaaat?  Which one?
I wasn't thrilled with this episode for various reasons, but I can see a lot of people did like it.  Claw of Shame was brilliance though.
I would rate the chance of a live episode at zero percent, maybe less.  

As for the tweet, my guess is he's just mocking the oft-abused term "with limited commercial interruptions", which is a meaningless phrase.Sort of, the conditions have to be right to where the person has discarded their sample.  Talking about a persons health with a doctor requires some strict protocols per HIPAA though.
The ultimate cornball friendship song, just edging out Tubthumping.  My guess is their licensing requests have dwindled a bit in recent years.
For me there were too many revealing conceits in this episode.  Still some gold but not my fave.I generally like musicals and didnt mind the previous two NBC holiday season musicals.  For some reason, this was just... boring.  

Can't really knock any specific performances or anything, and the sets and costumes were cool.  But it just had no pop.  

Could have been the broadcast, but songs seemed to be pre-recorded.  Seeing a lot of comments about live audience. Based on the previous renditions, this isnt really in an auditorium, it's a studio building packed tight with sets and crews and wiring etc.  In this format, an audience wouldn't fit, cameras and crew would be running into people.  

That's not to say a revised logistic couldn't work.  Shrink the sets and grandeur a bit, play it in an actual theater somewhere.  Maybe the costs could be offset by running it unfilmed for a few weeks and selling admissions (?).  

The opening San Bernardino words struck the right tone.  

And normally I'd be disinclined towards straight personal slams, but Cruz booking that shooting range party tomorrow is just sick enough to make me forget my normal feelings.  Guy is a major creep.
More Emmy calibre impersonations today: Ted Cruz, the Former Roomate, the Director, the SuperPAC representative, Cruz nephew, video shoot crew member with cough, the Commandant, Luther from The Wire.Beasts Of No Nation clip as more fodder for James Bond replacement?
How many years before we're allowed to expect more?  

He has years of bad stand up, years of bad tweeting, a year of bad correspondent/joke stealing, and now we're well into a year of bad hosting.  At what point does he magically change into something completely different than he's ever been?
Actually Larry is far and away the best part of the Nightly Show.  After the first few weeks in which redditors formed their permanent opinion, the show retooled and has been quite strong since then.  

Sure the panels are most filler and they lay a few eggs every week.  But the opening 10 minutes of news and rants from Larry is easily the closest thing we have left to "classic" Daily Show.  You can tell Larry is being Larry, the lines roll off his tongue like they're his voice, same as it was with Jon Stewart... and so *not* what we're getting with Trevor Noah.

That's not really True.  Jon Stewart was already established and funny when he came on board, and was strong from the beginning.  Trevor Noah is the opposite.  I second the lame delivery and the way every single word be says sounds detached and like he's reading a form.  The voice they need is missing, and Trevor Noah's own "voice" isn't really the one for this.  No, I'm not talking about the audible voice, but the inner voice.  

But I can't see how he can change.  We have years of Trevor Noah to draw upon, and he's never, ever, exhibited the voice or sensibility that's needed.  

It's not like watching Bo Jackson excel in football and being able to envision him as a baseball star.  

With Trevor Noah, there's no existing evidence to suggest that he's ever had - nor ever will have - the right aptitude for this role.  
Yeah, it's like how The Colbert Report sucked for its first 9 years, and how Steve Carell was no good for years and how John Oliver's show still has 7 more years before it will be decent, and how David Letterman and Dave Chappelle both sucked for a decade before they flipped.  
/sThe old classic Daily Show used the correspondents for field pieces.  But the trend lately is to mostly have them do sketch comedy in studio.  

To me, that's inherently weaker and lazier.  

I like most of the correspondents comedically, but I long for the days when correspondents were strong writers and producers in their own right, and not just used as performers.  

Desi Lydic strikes the right tone as a news model-anchor type, but given her pregnancy I'm fearful she's about to be replaced by another Jon Stewart random pick, like Pewdiepie.


Hasn't she been appearing as much (or little?) as Roy Wood, Ronnie Cheng, Assif, etc?
You sound like you have similar tastes to me. I want biting news satire from the desk, supported by compelling clips, strong writing and a delivery that makes it all indistinguishable from the voice of the host himself.  The comedy sketches that come later, I find less appealing.  

That said, you might like the A block of The Nightly Show, because 50-75% of the time that's exactly what you get with Larry Wilmore.  For me, it's 10 minutes that fills some of the void now that Jon Stewart is doing other things and The Daily Show is skidding into the ditch.
 
Lol, I think you mean balaclava.  Although at this stage, I know Desi probably does want to get her baklava on, they're so delicious.
 
And FYI, pregnant doesnt mean invalid.  Well, he'd have to weld it on otherwise it would be stolen every single time he parks.
Edit: forgot to mention, she drives a monster machine van with bob marley horn.
That got weird.
Two FYI's.  If you're trying to conserve fuel, SLOW DOWN.  Speeding up to pass a truck is gulping up fuel. 

And second, police officers are trained to ask oblique questions and look for inconsistencies.  How you react is more telling than the actual Q&amp;A's sometimes.  

And bonus, if you think your tag is the reason for all the traffic stops, (seems unlikely)  get rid of it.  Even placebo effect could manifest in driving style or calmness that might reduce your exposure.In a lot of places, driving uninsured is a huge violation.  The people who do it are usually chronic offenders and/or people who will leave others holding the bag financially.  Stiff penalties are meant as a deterrent.  

If you've ever been hit by an uninsured driver, you'll be royally pissed off and you'll want the fines and penalties to be even bigger because it really does screw the other party.
Down to fuck means "interested in having to sexual intercourse"There's a commonly held belief that Hitler's speaking voice was like his behavior: aggressive, sharp, clipped, violent, frenzied, loud or manic.  This has been reinforced through countless re-enactments and dramatizations of him.  

But his actual speaking voice in this recording is approximately normal.  It's not more gentle than an average voice, it's just regular.  He's speaking fluidly, at even speed and volume.  There's no harsh spikes or dynamic changes.  He's just evenly conversing with the other person.  

It's a bit surprising to most people who have only seen the wild characterizations and know him as the most monstrous human figure of all time.

I wondered what that could be, but there was no way I'd be googling it, thanks
One subtle piece of gold was the overhead cam shot of Nathan doing the overly elaborate recovery of the urine, bottling it up, hiding it under a hollowed out candle, signalling via the lighting to an intern.  

The whole recovery could have just been done by a producer (and given my experience with the industry this wouldn't even be in the lowest quartile of producer tasks). 

Of course it was a faked insert, as nobody, not even this guy, would take a leak underneath a broadcast quality camera rig.
And the award for PR-seeking empty corporate gesture goes to.....
Ooooh, I'd like to try this.  I like chocolate milk. But I don't need my drinks extra sweet.  I'm the one who uses a half pack of sugar while everyone's dumping in 3 packs.  With chocolate milk, I cut it with half regular milk but that dilutes the chocolate taste.  I'd really like to try milk with full strength chocolate but less sugar.
Patron: "what healthy option can you recommend?"
IHOP server: "leaving now and eating at home."Probation is a chance to prove you can temporarily behave.  Getting caught with 2 weeks left doesnt mean he just started violating after 3.9 years, that's just the time at which he was caught.  This killer dodged a bullet with one of the luckiest courtroom breaks of all time.  You'd think such a close call would teach a lesson in better judgement and self control.  
The CSI: Texas crew was on break at the time so we don't have 1080p video for you.  If you or a loved one suffered at the selfish hands of an uninsured driver, you'd be calling for a life sentence, or worse.
Perhaps this second time he learned his lesson?
Pumping your brakes (or "breaks", whatever those are) doesn't use fuel.  And your original story contained some bunk about gas stations.  But your denialism and attitude explain why the police officer decided you needed $2000 in tickets.
Read more carefully. "Well into a year of hosting"
Brakes make you accelerate?  Not on our planet.  The reason for your problems with the law (and physics) are self-evident.Well having lived through it, I know you're wrong.  Jon Stewart was a fairly popular comedian and although a few desultory wangs complained, most people liked him.Don't lose your paperwork?  If that paperwork meant the difference between freedom and prison, you'd maybe pay some attention to it?
No, that's retrospective folklore.  And it's not coincidental the only people really pushing that yarn are Trevor Noah apologists.  Jon Stewart had a nice career building when he took over from Kilbourne.  And he was immediately recognized as taking the job more seriously.  

Look, if you are getting this distorted and revisionist history from the vocal yokels on the internet, I know it's not your fault directly.  Some of us actually lived through it and we know what happened.
 An argument so weak you couldn't even express it.  Makes sense why you'd identify with Trevor Noah.
It was hot garbage in the early weeks.  Nothing scripted, goofy ad libs, and 90% dumb panels and "keep it 100".  Each episode ended with a "surprise" question from twitter that was usually some stupid yes or no, so Larry would say either yes, or no.  It was an embarrassment.  

At the first hiatus they dramatically revised the show, leaning on their Daily Show roots.  They dropped the panel to one short block, started writing a Daily Show cloned opening block, and putting news or sketches into B block.  They let Larry just be Larry.

The show improved 10-fold, but hivemind doesn't know about it.  

Now, you can just watch the A block and it's pretty much a pre-Trevor Noah Daily Show segment.  The B block and panel can be hit or miss.  Larry rips into deserving subjects, and you can tell it's real, not a script that he can barely enunciate.

This week Larry had 3 incredible A blocks, and 1 that was ambitious, but didn't quite seem to land.  That's more great content than Trevor Noah has laid down in 30 shows.
Yep, if you find Trevor Noah's stand up to be great, your organs are going to come out of your body when you finally experience a top comedian.  For now, stick with the Trevor Noah, Mencia, Dane Cook, Larry the cable guy type of stuff and gradually work your way up to the real stuff.
Being uninsured makes you a nightmare for anyone you happen to clip.  You're a hit and run risk, and you won't be able to pay for any damages, injuries, disruptions or deaths.  Uninsured drivers are a scourge on society. That's why the fines are so high.
Trevor had that too and he sucked.  Not just a little, but hard. Try watching his Daily Show appearances. They were grim death.  Try watching his cringe-a-thon standup, his painful sitcom and his brutal attempts at hosting.  

Those other people you mention were vastly more strong, even as rookies.  And they showed constant improvement, not regression as Noah has.  

You apparently don't know what the phrase is, and that could be a clue of why you're a die hard Trevor Noah fan or perhaps ESL?  

 Think of a hamburger that's fresh and new off the grill.  I walk up and take a big bite out of it.  It could be said I'm well into that hamburger.  Perhaps not most of it, or even half, but a very solidly bitten into that hamburger.  We say "She's well into that hamburger."  I have more than enough to know the quality and contents of hamburger, and I know that without having to achieve the nerdily pedantic level of 100% of the hamburger.  The large bite tells me everything.

Trevor Noah is into his 4th month.  The way it's going, they'll take lengthy christmas break and try to get him some coaching and mentoring.  They might stuff him into some improv classes or do something to try and get some skills development.  He'll run on and off from January to May.  If you think these last few months haven't revealed something, you haven't been paying attention.
The irony of you saying this...

For every source saying it's the "primary spelling I can point to 100 Canadian retailers, products, stores, people, websites, documents, and others that use "meter".  If you were to qualify that and say it's primary in the effete circles, then sure.
Given the choice between having probabation revoked and serving full prison sentence... or calling an Uber?  What's the smarter choice?
Someone with insurance kills a family breadwinner, insurance has reserves that pay to restore and salvage the surviving family.  The survivors grieve, but remain financially stable to resume their lives and live out their remaining goals.

Someone without insurance kills a breadwinner.  The survivors are also financially decimated, and their lives are all ruined.  

So your way many innocent lives get destroyed.  See the difference?  

And FYI, prison time or life sentence is more like it than jail which is by definiton, short term.
Jon Stewart has always been somewhat religious.  He just changed his name to one that less patently Jewish, which is common in the entertainment business.  In that case that could easily be straightened with some time and care.  And it's not the situation we're talking about here anyway.
 The word you're looking for is "voyeurism".
Proof?  Same source as the Popsicle fairy tale?
Looking forward to Larry Wilmore ripping into this situation on Monday night
Did the Redditors finally invent a safe reactor design that doesn't produce toxic waste?  Or are they still greenwashing over the risks?
...with a corresponding catastrophic risk and unbelievably selfish toxic waste issue.  Canada doesn't want Japan hogging all the ~~risks~~ benefits of nuclear ~~waste~~ reactors."Win-win" for this afternoon's power.  But Lose-lose for all the humans who have to babysit our self-centered mess for 100,000 years after our selfish asses are gone.


So that proves nuclear accidents are impossible right?  

And Japan proved that nuclear disasters can't happen in first world countries.
If you're an overconfident echo chamber loving reddit parrot, then absolutely, there will never be another mistake made by the hivemind, ever.
Yeah because Japan is so anti-engineering, anti-innovation, anti-research, anti-planning.  Koo koo, koo koo.
 Based on the overconfidence expressed here daily by self-proclaimed experts, the chance of a more mistakes is 100% or more.
It's too dangerous for Canada given our human activity.  Two things the nuclear fanboy club doesn't realize: humans make mistakes, and nuclear messes last for thousands of years.  Half of them don't even know these two key facts.  The other half know them, but plug their ears and yell "lalalalalalalala" to try and drown out reality.
With overconfident redditors at the controls, it should be able to run accident free for hours at a time.  

And the toxic waste isn't something they covered in home school because half-lives are longer than the 2000 year old earth, so it doesn't matter.
And yet with all these daily miracles, we still don't have a safe reactor design, or one that doesn't produce 100,000 years of toxic waste.
Your home school owes you a refund.  Brakes, or "breaks" as you call them, *decelerate* the vehicle.  That's a *decrease* in velocity.  You should retroactively fail grade 5 science.
If you can't understand the language, don't make foolish antagonistic posts.
As you failed to read, for every obscure and effete source, there's millions of citizens, thousand of products, and hundreds of retailers who all use the overwhelmingly dominant form: meter.
I didn't say that. Try to read more carefully.
Larry is great, but anyone with independent (or really *any*) thought is excommunicated from the hivemind.  The hive watched the first week or two and made a permanent judgement.
As always, backwards language and dishonesty is mandatory when greenwashing nuclear.  There won't be a problem because a miraculous invention will solve the problem.  And "virtually no waste" still means waste.  Think of it this way: suppose your fellow redditor takes a tiny dump in your breakfast.  It's small.  He says there's "virtually no" shit in your meal, because it was only a small squirt.  That's what "virtually no" means.  Bon appetite?


If only that were True.  If they put one billionth of the energy they expend trying to spin False stories into basic education and literacy, maybe there is a chance of this miraculous invention you're so sure is coming.  

And FYI, no technology will ever "solve the human problem". It's that kind of delusional overconfidence that has been a factor in thousand and thousands of catastrophes.  Any engineer that thinks human failure is impossible is dangerously naive.
Actually we don't "have to accept" the risks of a nuclear catastrophe.  You can make that choice, go live next to one.  

Know where we heard all these bullshit statements of "proper construction" and "extremely slim possibility"?  We heard that at every project in history that ended up having an "unexpected" catastrophe.  
Would you be willing to put your money where your mouth is on these bold predictions?  Do you think there's even a chance that will be True?
**"I'll ignore"** is also your risk management philosophy and your continuing education process.
Then I guess there's no more waste.  Out of curiosity, what planet do you and Xenu live on?
Call us the minute they invent this magic reactor.  Well actually no, call us the minute this wasteless reactor is also human safe, and doesn't generate any terror or weapon concerns.  Please don't post until you have those simple problems solved.
This tower will never collapse.  There's no way all four engines will quit.  The rocket booster won't blow up the crew.  This mountain stadium can't flood.  The water never comes up that far on the shore.  That building can't burn down.  We have a backup regimen.  That tank won't rupture.  We have a backup battery.  This drilling rig won't leak.  This train has safety brakes.  Terrorists will never be interested in weapon fuel.  Birds won't go near our airport.  Earthquakes hardly ever happen here. That just needs some de-icing.  That ship will never sink. We have a sea wall.  We use encryption.  A whole province can't freeze.  No maintenance shortcuts were taken.  Volcanic ash isn't a problem.  These tires are fine.  We check the runways daily.  We have a redundant power supply.  The network never goes down.  That slope is stable.
And they were sold and worshipped by "useful idiots" who said they would be perfectly safe.  There's nothing new under the sun.
Oh good, just good ole natural uranium that everyone keeps under their pillow for good luck.  So all the toxic waste is gone now right?  You're reading something that's not there.
Apparently so.
Well as long as humans continue their unbroken streak of never making *misteaks* and as long as the threat of terror remains at zero, and as long as the miracle inventions that redditors are calling for do come out in time for Christmas, maybe nuclear *is* an option.
Not sure you're understanding the distinction.  Mocking Ted's clammy embrace with his mother is a personal slam.  Mocking his absurd policies and government track record is not.
Which fossil fuel does the sun burn?By perfect humans, which have yet to be invented.
Then why lie and say "virtually no waste"?  Why not be ethically and scientifically honest and say "some waste"?  

If you could be honest, and you could admit to the reality of toxic waste, then we could have an intelligent discussion over the amount of the waste, the costs and challenges it imposes, and things like that.  

But when you kick off with a lie about "virtually no" waste, there's no room for debate of the actual issues.You erroneously think that Jon Stewart, a lifelong Jew since childhood, was not considering a God until 2005?  Doubtful.
According to Mattel, it was specifically his fault - for misrepresenting the numbers.  That's why he was fired and sued.

He didn't help develop it.  He bought or appropriated other people's developed work.  
Is that your caustic and vulgar way of admitting that nuclear actually does have drawbacks?   That's a start.Oh well them, as long as the catastrophic disasters aren't intentional, then what are we even worried about?
I could be as condescending as the biggest fanboys here, but it wouldn't make the facts I'm sharing any less True.  But if you can't attack the facts or the science or the history or the reality, then all you have left is taking pot shots at me.  How impotent.

I take issue with the morally selfish position that the electricity for my TV today should cause a 10,000 year deadly headache for my grandchildren's grandchildren's grandchildren's (...) grandchildren.

Do think that's fair to stick them with your toxic waste?  Even if it's "only" a few football stadiums in size, it's the idea that my moment of waste becomes an epoch of future obligation.  I believe in cleaning up after myself, picking up my own wrapper, leaving the forest in the condition I found it.  What's wrong with that?
You got the tone and copied the words without being "bothered to read one sentence".  Oh well, at least we know you aren't that concerned about being truthful.Did the came up with a new design today that doesn't produce waste?  That is immune from human failure?  That doesn't attract terrorist attention?  No?  Then why are you shilling for it?
Virtually = some
Your claim = nine
Ergo, you misrepresented: dissembled, deceived, lied.
When industry does it, they call it piecework. The Sharks generally don't have much formal business education so it's not that surprising when they miss fundamental things.
If you wish to claim that a thermometer should be spelled with -metre, far be it from me to stop you.  I already know you're literacy-impaired, but if you want to flaunt your flaws, go for it.Princess, try learning about reactors from actual experts, not homeschooling reddit trolls.
Every episode for 20 years, so yeah, your perceptiveness is as inaccurate as your criticism.


You replied to the wrong person.  But it's always funny when someone who can't even read a simple message board ironically tries cracking on someone else and just makes himself look worse.
Can you get someone older to rewrite this and make it legible?  Or just troll elsewhere.
Just like Chernobyl that won't hurt anyone or affect any future generations... Until the overconfident redditors running it fuck up and cause centuries of problems.  Anyone who thinks they are perfect is someone we should never be listening to.Sigh, no wonder we're backsliding.  Education has failed many. 
I'm not your mate, and based on your past behavior, nobody is.
 
"Regardless, We could always dig it up again and move it to a better spot in the future."

How are "we" going to do that for 100,000 years?  

Then again, if the Reddit bro-club thinks they can invent a magic human-proof, wasteless, non-radioactive-fuel-consuming reactor, I guess resurrection booths and time machines should be no problem.
I quite disagree.  Can't remember the numbers if any for the cost of these.  But let's be generous and say the COGS on their $2 MM 
is $1.6 MM.  Even if they don't eat and live in their cars, their just leaves $0.4 MM with which to pay back Mark and Lori.  

Their cash flow, as we know it, dictates they will be far short of repaying the $1.4 MM. 

Of course they won't care, because there's an easy out clause that the Sharks fell for: give away a small chunk of mostly meaningless equity.  And by then, the value per share may be different.  So who cares if you get more equity of a failing company?  

The best hope is to more than triple their existing sales.  Considering they've already shot their main gun, does tripling their results seem feasible?  

And what if these early Kickstarter buyers get the thing and say it's a heavy, ugly, plasticized mess?   Or someone else puts out a handle-scale bag for $99?   A few bad reviews and they could be dead in the water.  They have no way to pay back Mark and Lori, but that quickly becomes Mark and Lori's problem.

Except worse, because it's supposedly an equity investment not debt so they have lower rights in the capital structure (not that there would be anything of value to liquidate anyway)
Considering airline's reluctance to transport batteries without huge precautions,,packaging, and indemnities, this bag could easily be deemed unacceptable by a few airlines and then it's game over.
It's an interesting exit strategy. But one detail I can share is that in a buyout situation, the acquirer would never, ever, ever, take on inventory that's not their own, isn't tried and tested, not made according to their existing standards, etc.  What would happen is it could get sold to some liquidation process, logos snapped off and sells in some small chain nobody has ever heard of in small town Canada or Australia.  Or buried in a landfill.  They wouldnt want anyone making direct associations - good or bad - between their product and that of the defunct competitor.
Yeah, nobody should have any ability or potential for several years, what's wrong with everybody!
Popular with a certain type of fan: Check.  Steals jokes: check.  I mean ironic the way the dictionary defines it, not the way you misunderstand it.
Eventually, reluctantly, and perhaps accidentally, you finally came around to what I originally posted before the cluster of attack trolls came along.
Big Wheel was a popular toy in the 1970's and this design is one of a kajillion copies.Straight ripoff of a piece Jimmy Kimmel has been doing for years. At first I was just mildly not impressed with this, but now that they're doing this kind of plaigiarized prank it's got me thinking more about how selective and patronizing this idea is.  

You could line up any of a number of groups and have them read offensive ~~tweets~~ posts that CBC's incompetent moderation structure allows to be published.  

Singling out just indigenous for special attention and treatment seems patronizing and counter-productive, and in its own way, discriminatory.  
To me it highlights the lack of accountability and leadership from CBC's social media management.  This guy has been a ghost through all kinds of problems, and now is running an attention-seeking but discriminatory protection scheme for one class of readers?  Uh, OK.  

I gather that foul attacks on blacks, Jews, religious people, atheists, rich, poor, workers, owners, elderly, millenials, whites, Canadians, Americans, animals, the sick, women, children, men, and every other class you can think of will continue to be enabled by CBC's system, and they'll continue to make no attempt to fix it.
If only there was written proof of what I wrote.  [Oh wait, there is.](http://www.reddit.com/r/canada/comments/3vbjbs/trudeaumetreca_down/cxm18im)You're working awfully hard considering the proof is irrefutable, and your contention that -metre is more popular is unTrue.  But since you're a hard core troll, that's what you do.
Of course it does, at least when it's not busy singling out blacks, Jews, religious people, atheists, rich, poor, workers, owners, elderly, millenials, whites, Canadians, Americans, animals, the sick, women, children, men, and every other class you can think of.Easy, just have 10 roomates share a house.  8 if they're lawyers or servers.
The universally recognized standard of being a troll is when you instigate a False accusation of someone else being a troll.  That's what you did. It's the troll equivalent of saying "I'm not racist" before your racist remarks. You decided to make my comment about the faulty domain name personal, and exhibited irrefutable standard troll instigation behavior.  You are by word, deed, and definition, a troll.  Own it.  It could be, and probably is, your main skill.
You're doing a masterful job of acting like you do, so... bravo to you.  If you can't be a decent person, at least you might have acting potential.
The time lapse doesn't show what I gather you wanted it to show?
No idea, but the hivemind is missing out with their misguided and outdated meme of hating The Nightly Show.

For anyone who liked the old Jon Stewart Daily Show, the opening block of The Nightly Show is the closest thing we have left.  Larry rips into topics with the humor and authenticity that Jon Stewart used to provide.  But hivemind decided early on not to like it, so they're missing out.
Yep, ratings is the only way to know if something is quality.  See, you *are* good at trolling. I knew you were probably good at something.  Sadly it's nothing constructive, but own what you are.
I can't knock the performances, but I was just bored silly by it.  The previous musicals were more engaging.  By truth, you mean you lying?  I merely pointed out the annoyingly misspelled website so you and your altnicks jumped on me. That's what you do, that's what defines you, and that's apparently your only skill and interests.  Your personal attacks, trolling, lying, and vindictiveness are you.  Own it, be the creep you so badly crave to be.
I'd be more impressed if he actually did something like not participate in the gouging.  Gouging while making a throwaway diss about it seems shallow.  

It also seems contrived how he emphasizes where his astronomically overpriced shirts are "printed".  Let me guess, saying where they're manufacturered might not be as cool.
This. Sadly, his manipulative statement makes it so the sheep won't realize that.  He gives a handful of shirts that cost him less than $5 to a goodwill, brags about where his shirts "printed", gives a wholly unnecessary and disingenuous prompt to pirate the album (as if pirates have ever sought permission).  And of course, people eat it up with a spoon.  

If he actually wanted reasonable prices, he could absolutely have dictated that, merely by gouging less for himself.You certainly have adopted the hive mindset and thoroughly resisted any kind of independent or critical thought.  So maybe there's two things you're good at.
They do now. Wake up earlier. And learn what ripoff means. And how to spell "Jimmy".
The health benefits of heroin and meth can finally be available to everyone.
People are always going to murder and rape children, might as well collect a license fee for it, to fund education and rehab programs.
The main argument is that our society is still somewhat collective, so many people end up paying for those who abuse themselves.  Id prefer not paying to support a junkie. Paying to coddle alcoholics and smokers is bad enough. To me, expanding that is the wrong move.  Proper study and availability of True medical benefits I'm all for. Encouraging ever-more dangerous drug use I'm not.I doubt it. Criminal enterprises will just pivot to something else. And by all likelihood, it will be something more harmful.
No, CBC videos don't work here anymore, since they "upgraded" them without any user testing.  

The ads play perfectly but loop continuously, and the videos usually don't work.  But CBC's media managers are hard at work showing the strength and independence of indigenous people's by coddling and patronizing them.
The bigger story is who held him at gunpoint and forced him to sign the contracts and cash the checks.
I knew that and accepted it for the premise of the show.  But something I thought about was what would be a good method to ensure your before test will have low scores?  Dilution seems too obvious.
He's been doing this same gag since high school, picture of him alone "with his friends".
Can't knock the singing performances, but found the whole thing boring.  I think it's the play itself that's at fault though.  Costumes and sets were interesting.  Having the Tin Man be chunky was a bit off-putting.Someone's a Negative Nancy, but for you, it's living up to your potential.
And the internet comment sphere's bias towards superficiality and engagement of below average individuals doesn't help.  That's how we have people worshipping the 5 Hour Energy Drink snake oil dude, praising idea thief Mark Zuckerberg's non-charitable corporate "charity" and commitment to suffer along on "only" $5 billion of personal fun money, and Oprah "empowering" depressed people by charging them hundreds of dollars they can't afford for empty advice.  
No. I commented on the article in the link.  Why do you have to so antagonistic and deceptive?  There's untapped potential for you to be a decent person, and you chose to do the opposite.  Why?

Not really. They collect money in other ways, so if this scenario ever comes True they'll simply tweak other collection methods to get their revenues. With 75% wage cut, corporate wins again.
Yep, it's amazing how futurologists seem blind to the present.
Not really, the lag factor means mastaDave9999 won't bury them.  Mastadave9999's boon today is because of demographics
I challenge "steer better during the slide".  All the autonomous cars I've seen have their circuits full just driving under essentially perfect lab conditions that don't match any real world roads most people drive on.  

The idea of guiding from clearly painted lanes is kind of joke for those of us living in communities where potholes can't be fixed and lane painting is hardly a priority.All of this reminds me of the time someone came up with better body panels.  They looked just like regular fenders, but they were flexible.  You could ram a shopping cart into them and they'd just bounce back perfectly.  They were lighter, cheaper, and saved fuel.  With door dinger eliminated, so were ugly, anti-aerodynamic trim strips.  Sure, you could damage them if you really tried.  But they were impervious to 90% of the cosmetic damage that afflicts car bodywork...

.... and they're gone.  For no good reason other than mankind's and corporation's irresistible devotion to inertia.
If what you're saying is True then North Americans would be admiring Vladimir Putin's "leadership" and trying to elect a serial bankruptcy artist and professional blowhard as leader of the free world.
It just seemed like it didn't quite line up and the audio seemed isolated and different timbre.  Maybe wrong but that's how it seemed.  I've done a lot in this field and I can easily catch these, so I'll readily admit this one I have low confidence in my guess.
Let's try and simplify it even more.  Imagine you pick up a novel.  You're introduced to the characters, a drama ensues and within a few chapters, you're engrossed.  In the English language we would say you're "well into" that novel, even if you still have more than half of it left to read.  

The fact you completely misunderstand this entire conversation by thinking I compared Trevor Noah's shitty hosting to a hamburger indicates you have some fairly significant comprehension impairment.  

This was about the phrase "well into" applying to a third of the television year, and the hamburger/novel tutorials are about teaching you what that phrase means.  The hamburger and its quality have no direct connection to Trevor Noah's shitty hosting. 

If you're new to English I sympathize, but it's still no excuse for you being antagonistic to someone that's trying to help you.
Trevor Noah has built up a bit of a reputation that his few and far between 'good' jokes are stolen.  Google Joe Rogan, Dave Chappelle, Russell Peters, etc.
Yeah, nobody should have any ability or potential for several years, what's wrong with everybody!
No, it didnt take Stewart a couple of years to get established. That's folklore bullshit perpetuated by Trevor Noah apologists.  Stewart already had a strong reputation and skills before being selected. 

If you can't tell the quality of a daily televison program show after 4 months, well, let's just say you're different.

Might want to post this to whomever was originally intended, because I never said any of that.  Describe a scenario where you need body armor but you don't want to be legitimately licensed.
It's gone from zero to several in recent years.  What would you say is the percentage increase?
Tell the families of the people murdered and maimed by guys like Justin Bourque that there's no "evidence" that psycho killers are using body armor.
So get licensed, what's your issue?
Sin tax is a token, not representative of True costs.  You might be able to convince me if we had a mechanism where full costs were paid by the "sinner".
The feature set of Bluesmart seems suspiciously identical.  And both are kind of sketchy about their "GPS" and/or locating details.
With the suitcase weighing so much, the practicality as a carry on bag is questionable.
Yes, a roll up door seems senseless. They jam, and the door has to roll somewhere, consuming valuable space.  

I can almost see an argument for charger, since airports are full of people looking for plugins to charge their devices.  But then why not pick up a storage battery pack at dollar general for next to nothing?  

The GPS aspect was weird.  Bluesmart doesn't exactly claim GPS, they just talk about locating in places where there's a "network".  That could be as basic as an IP address geo-guess method, not True real time location like in a spy movie.  

And even if it has GPS, that's only half the issue.  The luggage then needs to transmit its location back to the owner, so it would need to be its own cell phone.  Trunkster talks about an optional GSM add on for $60 that might explain.  

The whole idea reminds me of bad product marriages, like those Fridges with a TV screen.  You end up with a fridge that will obsolete in a year, along with a TV screen you'll never watch.
How would that preclude getting a license?  Answer: it wouldn't.
That wouldn't be a reason not to get a license.
"probably all but unobtainable"

So it's obtainable?Re-state your concern using an F-150 truck instead of body armor..
That would be fun for you right up until your rent is due.
The mismatch of urine and blood tests didn't rattle me, as we know that you can get corresponding results from different tests.  And it's unlikely the doctor is an actor, as we've have three seasons of Nathan For You without evidence of that kind of full on deception.  

I wish there was someone with the clinical knowledge on this.
What activities are you doing that make you want to defend yourself against cops?  Shooting spree?  Armed robbery?
Jim Jeffries was a victim of that exact scenario, and he has an instructive lesson very relevant to your concerns as a rich person who is expecting a home invasion. 

However, this: "a tool that can only be used for defensive purposes" is False.  The exact scenario the police are concerned about is someone going on the offensive and making themselves harder to apprehend.  
Yes there are activities people do that can potentially make them a burden. So let's start with the ones that's are most likely, with the most serious consequences, and the most potential to harm other innocents.  We've got drunk driving and cigarettes covered, so drugs is a sensible next place.  Donut eating will be down the list somewhere, but donut eaters don't harm innocent people as much as say a heroin addict does.
It closes down vectors of crime and reduces the chance of a bad guy having a successful Sandy Hook shooting.  

The better question is, why would you be opposed to that?
This is a weird situation all around.  The story doesn't reveal any compelling basis for planting the suggestion that the leave is related to a glyphosate investigation other than the oblique concerns of the resident named Kohl.  

At the time I found it odd that the story mentioned glyphosate use by Irving and NB Power, but as I thought about it, it seemed like it was to demonstrate that big organizations still use it, as (presumably) do other organizations and individuals that want to control weeds.  

I'm not sure there was any allegation that Irving had anything to do with Cleary's suspension, just that they use glyphosate.  

As a news piece, there seemed to be a glaring lack of explanation for why nobody could discuss the reason for the suspension.  I get why an employer can't say much, but I don't get why Cleary herself isn't free to share the reasons if she wishes.  Is there legislation or a court order preventing that?  

Purely speculating, but based on the employer's statement it was an HR issue, couldnt that be consistent with all kinds of possibilities that have nothing to do with Cleary's areas of investigation?
Can you elaborate on the business about using glyphosate to take down hardwood trees?  I thought it was mostly used in farming to kill weeds?  Not that taking down hardwood trees is a good thing, but wouldn't they be using regular logging methods to do that?
With a forced suspension like this, they can't issue a contract saying "agree to this gag order to continue being paid".  If so the doctor could simply say "no thanks, I'll continue with my regular salary", which would force them to try something else.  

You're thinking of situations where an employer terminates someone and doesn't want to state the actual reason.Has any journalistic source confirmed that is the reason in this case?
If this were True, you'd have the global news story of the year, or perhaps the decade.  

And if it's True, and you're not sharing it, why not?  It would seem monumentally evil to sit on evidence of mass harm and do nothing about it.
You wouldn't need to do that.  Just provide the general info on which lab it is, then the authorities and journalists can do the diligence work to confirm or dispel the story.  
A tool is defensive or offensive based on usage.  Using it in a mass shotting as a way to maximize the killing before you're stopped would make it offensive. Using it to commit the offense of say a bank robbery is not "defensive".
You said "virtually no waste" when the truth is "produces waste". That's the lie.  Own it.
Except your statement doesn't have anything to with "value of life", it has to do with whether or not there's a good reason needing body armor.  You've failed to prove the contention.  Global poverty has little to do with farming productivity.  But Monsanto could drop their round-up ready linked seed/herbicide policies if they wanted to help prove otherwise.
I knew someone who did the same but a much larger area, like 500 sq feet and it was wonderful.  I can't see how 8 sq ft is that impressive, it's smaller than 3 ft x 3 ft.  Not sure that eating multiple eggs daily is the best of nutrition, but I will say his eggs tasted fantastic.  He stopped when predators kept coming and cleaning house on the hens.  

There was no economic incentive given that eggs cost about 10-20 cents. So you make a False statement that I never said and call it bullshit? 

OK then, your expressed desire to eat babies is bullshit.  

I'm also curious why you were opposed to the police helping the woman that was being stabbed to death.

Why not just be truthful and say that nuclear reactors produce toxic waste?  What is it about making a clear and truthful statement that you're opposed to?  Wait, I know!  It doesn't serve the hivemind myth spinning about nuclear power.
Using it in the commission of an offence makes it offensive.

Your accusation of lying is nonsense.  Ironically, you saying that makes you a liar.
So nothing realistic?
The legitimate reason is obvious.  But if you pretend reality doesn't exist, then you'd have a point.
Only if you delude yourself to the lie that armor is only a "defensive" weapon.  
"More food is more security". 

One of the most fallacious statements ever.  We dispose of millions of tons of food while simultaneously millions of people starve.  Shortage of food isn't the issue.  I think someone has been reading chemical company propaganda with the critical think switch disabled.It saddens me that the young and naive see extremely rare and distant situations and don't have the knowledge or discernment to know the reality of their own situation.  That's probably related to why you don't know what the word profitable means too.  Education: don't knock it til you've tried it.

How will it help the poor in third world nations to pay Monsanto for seeds that self destruct?  Monsanto turning hunger into a profit center doesn't help feed them, it makes food more expensive and less secure, creating the opposite of what you want. You have this backwards.
Please post back after you find documented evidence mass murderers using forks.  But don't post any more bullshit until you have the proof.  See you never.

Intelligent people get the same weather as you attack trolls do.  The difference is we know what causes it.
Ah the intelligent "just shut up" argument.  You two should just stay indoors and keep all your militia fantasies in your heads.
Why am I not surprised you'd be advocating the for legalized murder?  You're the kind of raving psychopath that we need police protection from.
What was the issue then, specifically?

The freedom to play dressup and be a warrior in my own mind? I'll leave that for you and the other cosplay soldiers, thanks anyway.
When it's used in the commission of an offence.  Look very very hard at that sentence and see if you can spot it.
Describe why I would possibly need a license for a dog that could protect me from (kooky delusional and unfounded fears of) being shot to death.  
People like you oppose anyone that can think.  Thinking goes against your life philosophy.  It's why you harbor delusions of grandeur that the police are going to come and shoot you.  Please.  You're not worth shooting.  Sure your mother wishes you'd go back and get your GED and get some exercise and quit getting brainwashed playing call of duty 24x7, but everyone just feels sorry for you, we don't want to shoot you.  But we mostly want to make sure psychotics like you don't build yourself into a mini imaginary vigilante who pops on body armor that you were too illiterate to fill out a simple license for, then go shoot up a civil service office because of your deep hate and mental illness.
Doooosh
If anyone seriously thinks they are risk of being murdered by cops, they'd have to be the stupidest person ever to address thag concern by saying "I need unlicensed body armor!"

Assuming we accept their deranged fear as real - momentarily - then even the dumbest of children could figure out the best thing to do is... LEAVE!  GET THE HELL OUT!  THE COPS ARE AFTER YOU!  GO TO MEXICO AND BE SAFE FROM THE FASCIST NOVA SCOTIA POLICE MURDER SQUADS!

Or you could even do something easier, like, uh, I dunno, maybe 
APPLY FOR A LICENCE?

The upside is that there's a chance during your application you can be flagged and get help for your mental illnesses.

Oh no, you got me, Sherlock.  I am one of the many, the proud, the murdering hordes of Nova Scotia Murder Police.  

We look for "thought leaders" like you posting conspiracy shit on reddit, and we sneak in and get you while you're changing out of your Bronie fetish costumes and don't have your fake Kevvlore body armor on yet.  

It's very important to us that you have to take one simple administrative licensing step, otherwise our whole mad operation goes down.

Keep harboring that twisted fantasy about cops wanting to kill you, and how random people on the internet are cops, looking to get ya.
Is it sarcasm or psychosis?  I considered that it might be one or the other.  It's one point each.  

So for my tie breaker I said, which scenario is more consistent with someone ranting about how they need body armor to protect themselves from Nova Scotia death squad police officers, and further, how it's of utmost importance that body armor be unlicensed?  

And with that, the tie was broken.
Sorry we're not accepting radical armament fetishists at this time.  You can stay where you are.
If Monsanto ever had one genuine wish to help the poor and hungry, they could do so.  Instead they exploit nations with self-destructing seeds and oppressive litigation and business practices.  Do some homework on them.
How off topic and ironic.Conspiracy fantasy at its most elementary.

Found the Bronie.
But then the Sharks will have 10% of nothing instead of just 5%!
Nope. In most places, law enforcement still has jurisdiction in parking lots, drive throughs, etc.
Nope, jurisdiction covers parking lots, side roads, drive-through lanes and such
Your completion bond issuer allows that?  No, no they don't.Nope, it's a case of someone taking far too small of a sample.  Most of the hivemind complaints are patently echo chambered with giveaways they reference the earliest part of the show.  

The show is a bit inconsistent, so you minimal sampling could have caught one or two weak spots while missing the rest.  This week for example, 3 superb shows and 1 weak. If someone did a lazy check and caught only the weak one, they'd have a completely False sense of it.
This.  
Monsanto is working to make sure self-destructing seeds spread to impoverished nations.  That helps how?
Just to be clear, which films are you one where your insurer explicitly told you have unlicensed drivers operating vehicles was fine because doing it legally was too inconvenient?

What do you mean?  

I'm saying that to compare this investment, we consider an alternative.  In the alternative, the Sharks create their own cosmetics distributorship, their recruit the best possible people from the wide world of possibilities (not just two random applicants).  The resulting business would be 100% owned by the Shark instead of 25%.  

Kevin used to make this point to prospective contestants: "what's to stop me from starting up my own (whatever business) and crushing you like a cockroach".  

Kevin's probably been coached to stop doing that, as it interferes with the hopes and dreams aura the show wants to create, and it possibly sets up some liability concerns over competing interests.  But it's actually a valid point.  What is so special or unique about any given pitch that it can't be surpassed by someone else doing the same thing, but better, at lower cost?  

That's the case here.  Are these girls doing something that two other carefully selected employees could do, but at $120,000 instead of $425,000?The honeymoon is from over.  We saw that this week when Trudeau was caught directly contradicting his campaign braggadocio about how Canada can't afford millionaires using taxpayers for their child care.  

Infatuated supporters did somersaults trying to pretend he never said those things, and launched smokescreens of hyperbole depicting Trudeau as a a one man superhero army who never sleeps, while frantically trying to bury the deceptive job title tricks scandal under unrelated sentiment.
For a long time I've been saying the 3D printer hype was overblown, and that being able to turn out low quality chotchkies at high cost wasn't particularly revolutionary or useful. Along comes another perfect example.
Finally, nuclear power will be expanded in a safe and stable country, instead of in emerging nations like Japan, who lacked the governmental structure, the peacefulness, and the engineering prowess to do it properly.

Sentence would be True if you remove "most straightforward" (and add the missing "that")

Nuclear power - with its safety, health, waste, weaponry, and political issues - is hardy a *straightforward way*.  It's a way that might have some advantages, but can only be honestly described as a way rife with various complications and risks.Yep, nobody will even think of exploiting their fractured system to obtain material, and their never-ending neighborhood war isn't a risk of any kind.
The reason it wasn't big on blu-ray was because they did a ultra-long exclusive deal with Panasonic to only sell the movie with purchase of an overpriced player. It led to a bluish-grey market of price-jacked copies.  

Avatar could have been the movie that put blu-ray and 3D into every home, but instead they killed it with scarcity.  By the time it was released, nobody cared any more.  That's why stores are still carrying lots of DVD's and their cataract-level picture quality.Whenever a 3D movie doesn't contain gimmicks, fans say it wasn't worth it to be in 3D. 

But I too prefer a more judicious use of 3D.  Not the all-subtle approach you advocate, but using it to assist in creating more immersive scenes and yes, even some thrills.  Good examples are Hugo, Adventures Of Tintin, Despicable Me, and Titanic.


I like 3D but I know the hivemind generally doesn't.  

But it's going to be a fixture in movies for a long time.  The reason is because it offers an upsell opportunity that is almost pure profit.  

Making a major film in 3D only adds a fraction to the cost, but can be recouped many times over by higher revenue per viewer.  The same economic wizardry continues down the line.  It doesn't cost much more to project 3D, but ticket prices are higher.  And it only costs nickels to include a 3D disc in the home video package, but the price can be $10 more.  The electronics industry uses that too.  A 3D television or blu-ray player costs the same to make as 2D, but the 3D capability is reserved for their most expensive and most profitable models.

**3D to the film industry is the equivalent of soda fountains to the restaurant industry: small cost to implement, but hugely profitable.**I keep trying to find articles that say terrorism was just as bad in 1944 as it is now but I can't.  Can you post some?

Also chuckling a bit at the suggestion that India, China, Tibet, and Pakistan are all getting along.I personally know several, so recruiting through an actual head hunter would probably turn up "only" a thousand qualified applicants.
Then don't.  Keep complaining about how the Daily Show is gone, while a reasonable replacement sits obliviously unwatched.  

And FYI, in a typically week, 2-3 out of 4 episodes of the Nightly Show contain greatness.  Your anti-statistics method means you could - and probably have - checked out two weak ones, and in so doing, missed 25-30 good ones.  

My suggestion is tape the opening 10 minutes and treat it as if Larry is subbing for Jon Stewart while he's off shooting Rosewater II: Curly's Gold.   I suspect hiveminders have randomly channel flipped to the weaker skits and panels and missed the strongest portion of the show.
Anyone who thinks India has the wherewithal to manage nuclear safely needs to watch the [documentary Katiyabaaz (aka "Powerless")](http://www.imdb.com/title/tt2466678/)

India doesn't even have minimal safety standards or a working grid or distribution.  There isn't even universal agreement that electricity should be paid for, and those who've tried to organize it have done so at their own peril.

Their nuclear ambitions come from desperation and weapon interests, not environmental responsibility.  

Canada selling to them is about as genuine an environmental move as is Canada dumping asbestos into impoverished nations.
But but but Reddit hivemind said nuclear power was safe and waste-free, so how is this possible?
There's lots of naturally radioactive factors, from bananas to flying to where you live.  

But sadly, superficial redditors will see your banana comment and over-extend it to dismiss the very real risks and harms of nuclear proliferation and normalization.Well what do you know, I was right.  "What has the Daily Show got to do with the Nightly Show?"  If you don't know, that probably explains it.  I'd originally thought it was just because of minimal research. 

"Trevor Noah's doing a great job on the Daily Show. I find it to be incredibly good."  

LOL
WTFD
WTFD
Just remembered: you're the toxic troll who carpet bombed the Colbert subreddit with mountains of unfunny shit.  It got so bad that you had to delete many of your perverse and lame "jokes".  
You're a professional troll that lacks even the minimum sense of humor.  Here's [one example of dozens that made you a cancer in that sub.](https://www.reddit.com/r/LateShow/comments/3t8zax/november_17_2015_the_late_show_with_stephen/cx46zjb)


You're a liar. Find the post where I said that or admit you're a disgraceful liar and a shill.
The profane expression of the uneducated rings out across the jungle.
Two or three a day for weeks, until you were shut down.  But even one of your putrid posts was enough.
It's a bit like standing in Utah and declaring the ocean doesn't exist based on personal observation.
Where didnt you go to school?
Liar.  Here's one of your most recent balls ups:

http://www.reddit.com/r/LateShow/comments/3t8zax/november_17_2015_the_late_show_with_stephen/cx56vi4

I saved it when you got caught trying to pull this shit previously.Homophobic panic outbursts aside, here's one of your deleted comments that was saved before your attempt to conceal your mess.  Look familiar:

**"[\u2013]Needle_In_My_Peehole -1 points 18 days ago 
90% of my posts in this sub response to people telling me how unfunny I am. If you don't like what I say, downvote and move on.
Every single person who posts on reddit is wasting precious moments of their lives. Why are you wasting your life scolding an uncaring stranger on the internet? Don't judge.
permalinkunsavecontextfull comments (55)reportgive gold"**
Proof posted in your delete spree.  Homophobic outburst is when you tell someone you think is a man to "suck your dick".

I'm merely documenting the fact you're a mass troll and your attempts to hide your tracks have failed.  Argued with all the vulgarity and bluster of someone bankrupt of intelligence and class.
And with that, you retroactively fail third grade social studies.  It's either homosexual or homophobic.  Given that you're a habitual offender and repeat xenophobe, there's no doubt your meant it in a homophobic way.  Beside this one that you just busted on, I have more of your trash saved. 

There's no vendetta, I just take note of exceptionally huge liars and when you pulled that crap over in the other thread I proactively flagged and saved it as you were deleting.  Who knew you would this quickly stick your foul foot in your foul mouth and get caught with your pants down?  Well frankly, given who you are, it's not surprising.
Well her parent(s) failed her with that choice as even a poor public school would have or should have taught her better about radiation.  At least home school includes intensive practicums for XBL.

You're the lady that makes up False shit because if you were restricted to telling the truth or telling what you know, you'd have nothing to say.
I'm sure you can't think of one, but maybe if you go out in the sun something will come to mind.  
The point being missed by some of the more foul-mouthed and least educated redditors is that finding like these aren't about how many bananas they are for scale.  What this is, however, is a scientific reminder: nuclear accidents can have wide-ranging and far-reaching and long-lasting consequences.  

Sure it's fun to chuck around the F word and joke about how bananas are radioactive.  But the lesson of hubris is that mankind's overconfidence always leads to mistakes, and that we're delusional if we think that we can just contain spills and mistakes in a small holding area for easy cleanup.  These messes disseminate around the planet, they pollute oceans, they pollute the fish who live there, they pollute the birds who eat them and they pollute the land where humans yet unborn would like to live.

And not even the loudest smart-mouth profanity-spewing redditor can actually prevent these human errors, !or cure them when they happen.  

Of course if there's someone here that knows better, log off now and get to Chernobyl and solve that problem with your big secret idea.  Then go to Japan and cure that accident.  Then get back to us on how fail-safe and accident-free the nuclear industry is.
"shitface. I suggest you go fuck yourself"

Given how often you get caught lying and trolling, you'd think you'd have something smarter and less toilet-centric. The fact it's all you know says everything about you.
My guess is that more re uploads means more clicks and more money they can charge advertisers, which is all google cares about.  The trombonerist totally sells this.
So far not. But your streams of vapid profanity are revealing what you are.
Not only that, but having those huge triangle sides adds nothing but flappy failure modes and a great place to fold and spindle objects like an arm.

If the slick track is soft enough, it might work on carpet or hardwood, but it would do nothing on snow.
Besides what's already been posted about the failure-prone linkages, the skids themselves make no sense as a design.  Their stress point would be at the apex of each fork. They are effectively like chicken wishbones perfectly designed to fail at the neck.  They might add some unnecessary spring, right up until they fracture.
Where is [Ja Rule to make sense of all this?](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Mo-ddYhXAZc)Has it yet been explained why Scotty of all people knows who the father is when Cole and Noah and perhaps Alison aren't really sure?  

We only know about Alison being with Noah and Oscar in that time frame, or do we know for sure Cole was involved?
I felt the whole therapy scene had Cynthia Nixon doing the voice of Sarah Treem.  It seemed to hit hard on the idea that cheating isn't necessarily moral or immoral, that it could be just an inevitable byproduct of "greatness", and the idea that it's quite possible to only be a cheater once.  Even though I don't agree myself, I think this notion of balance was key to her premise for writing the show.From E1 I've been pondering about the second half of E12, and whether it might have the title card for Scotty's POV?
[The bookers may be lurking here....](http://www.reddit.com/r/LateShow/comments/3ti9jk/who_would_your_dream_shows_guests_be/cx7w4h4)Well as long as you've considered one risk, then who cares about the millions of others?  


Of course the obvious question is: since you knew about the Fukushima problem in advance, what kind of sociopath sits on that key piece of information and doesn't tell the world?  You just let it happen.
 If you think Cherobyl is safe for residents to return, I suggest you go hang out there.  Maybe you could get a job working on the first hundred year shield. It bothers me that you knew about such an obviously dangerous situation in Japan and yet you kept silent and didnt tell anyone that you knew, YOU KNEW, it was dangerous.  How can you sleep at night?

Anyone with common sense and honesty can't say a process that can contaminate he entire planet for thousands of years when it has a bad day is "clean" or "safe".  It's like saying a toddler playing with a loaded gun is "safe" as long as it doesn't pull the trigger.
"Nuclear has no safety issues".  This is blatantly incompatible with the facts and track record.  If you're unaware of the risks or track record, should you be posting?  You have a lifetime of education to do first.  As for holier than thou, that's sme snarky bullshit.  Being "smarter than  a third grader" doesn't make me holier than thou, it just makes me smarter than thou.
Are you saying that Japan isn't an emerging nation?  But then how could or would they operate nuclear plants to the point of meltdown and uncontrolled explosion?  Because according to reddit hivemind, India's going to be fine, well Japan, Russia and Ukraine are just basket cases that we shouldn't have trusted with nuclear.
"if the primary agent of the pollution only meets that standard in a tiny area".  

That's some anti-human corporate apologist spin doctoring right there.  Yep, who cares that Cheronbyl is building their first panic shield that will cost billions and last - at best - a century.  Let someone else worry about it for thousands of years after our smug and selfish asses are gone.  

**"Let us now blindly trust this industry, because a nuclear accident is impossible and will never happen again"** *- Redditor, and Unpaid Tepco Spokesperson, February 2011*

Against my instincts, I'll just assume this isn't some subversive marketing trick to try and get people to find you and give you some clicks.  

You may cognitively know - but not fully appreciate - that you've hit a lottery jackpot that 99% of people never will.  Even a dull job that pays $150k puts you in the 1%, so a fun hobby that pays as much is even more unusual.  As such, don't take it for granted.  

You also give the impression that you can be very disciplined both mentally and in reality.  

So my advice comes with those factors in mind.  

I suggest you continue to work the golden goose you've been given.  Nobody knows if the the foolish Youtube money will dry up in 3 months or 3 years or 13 years, but for now it's happening, so why not take it?  You're one of the few who seems to realize that the current social media money machine could be as fleeting as dot com name squatting or other crazy money schemes were back in 1999.  

However, live your life in every way as if you're making $50,000.  Structure it that way restrictively if you have to.  Plow all the additional money into conservative investments, as you've been doing.  The longer you can live the "average" lifestyle, the better.

There's are few ways this can go.  You're youtube career could blossom and grow, or explode which would be fine.  Or it could trail off, in which case you'd have a nest egg to support you for a number of years.  Or it could cease suddenly, in which case, again, you'd have a safety net that could be used to support you while you're deciding what "real" career interests you, what location you like to live, and fund whatever updates to your education are required.  

If you're that lamborghini-books-in-the-garage guy though, my suggestion is you take up
BASE jumping full time.

 
If you knew Fukushima "should have been retired years go" why did you sit here quietly and let the disaster play out? That's some cold and callous behavior right there.  What other nuclear disaster are imminent that you're keeping a secret?  

And just to be clear, you're talking about an industry that has repeatedly milked reactors long past their safe life, that puts them where they don't belong, that ignores danger factors, under-estimates risk, relies on the myth of human perfection, that cuts corners like everyone else, and you're saying today is the day they have miraculously changed and we should trust them blindly?  

The "ignorance" you speak of perhaps should be directed towards anyone who ignores reality and track record.

"I bet you'd be interested to know that the most costly (environmental, $$, and lives) power plant disaster wasn't even nuclear. Where's your outrage against that?"  

How could I not know about it?  Unlike the army of reddit nuclear cultists, I lived through and knew about it years before you were homeschooling yourself on buzzfeed.  And reddit fanboys copy and paste it ad nauseum in a pathetic and desperate attempt to change the subject, so there's that. 

Since you sarcastically asked, there's no outrage because you aren't trying to spread lies about how "clean" and "safe" other forms of power generation are.  In *this* thread, your lies are confined to nuclear power, so I'll call you out on that. 

If you want to start a different thread and lie about clean coal or whatever else, we can shoot you down there too.  

But for now, saying nuclear power can't have accidents is a lie, and saying nuclear power doesn't generate waste is a lie.  I'd respect you more if you'd educate yourself and admit these are serious and significant drawbacks.  But you apparently can't do that, so hyperbole and irrelevant comparisons and distractions are your choice.

I'd pose the question about how difficult and costly it is to clean up a solar power spill, but your cult leaders have programmed you to deflect that by talking about the time a guy installing a solar panel fell off a roof.  
"then to say anything is 'safe' is incompatible with reality". 

So why is the blatant lie of "safe and clean" the mantra of every brainwashed reddit nuclear propagandist fanboy?  

It's not True, and only with extreme bastardization of reality and through outrageous comparison can it even be said.  My toilet water is "safe and clean" compared to a Mumbai slum, but nobody in their right mind should drink it.


Why not just admit some key facts that **are** compatible with reality:  

- industry has always abused safety to the point of disaster
- nuclear operations are only as perfect as the humans who design and operate them (in other words, imperfect) 
- there's no such thing as waste-free nuclear power generation 
- nuclear accidents and waste create burdens that last thousands of times longer than the benefit they provide


You're delusional if you keep trying to pretend nuclear accidents have never happened.  Putting lies like "every piece of available data" in boldface indicates how insecure you are.  I have a piece of "available data" for you: Chernobyl.  

At least that was the first and last nuclear accident, right?  According to "every piece of available data" there have never been any accidents before or after.  
 "Show me a safer alternative."  

**Conservation and efficiency are both safer and cleaner.**  

But shhhhhh, don't tell anyone, that would reveal that Redditors chanting the echo chamber song that "nuclear is the safest and cleanest thing" are naively spreading mistruths.


 So we've esatablished that your boldface statement "every piece of available data" was knowingly False and dishonest.  That makes you an admitted boldface liar.  Seems to be some clickbait and or junk science here. 



Lol.  Millions of people eat steaks that are medium and better cooked.  I know there's million tired jokes about walking live cows past a heat vent and people ordering a steak that's still mooing.  

But the fact is I've never had someone turn down a wonderfully tendered and seasoned juicy ribeye or t-bone that is - gasp - fully cooked.  They drool and rave about it.
Not really. Producers now "tenderized" meat with spikes that drive anything on the surface into the meat so there's no safe assumption that can be made.
Industries and people that transact in dollars can do all kinds of things we wouldn't "imagine".  

Even using forks and hooks can do the same thing inadvertently.
Conservation and efficiency don't kill people, contaminate countries and oceans, or produce toxic waste that lasts for 100,000 years.  How will you choose to lie about that, boldface liar?For you, it's Nathan For You
How do you suppose butchered meat is moved around?  Yep. Hooks and forks.  From the abattoir to you trustworthy neighborhood butcher, it's been poked and prodded more times that you realize.  And it's been dropped on many a floor.

And I hate to be the bearer of reality. But just because some operation has a clean or wealthy or family looking frontage, you can't make iron-clad assumptions about their business practices.  

Every food operation from large to small and rich to poor has had problems.  Chipotle was considered safe and upmarket, and yet today they're dealing with an unsolved E. coli crisis.  That's just one out of hundreds of thousands of examples.  

Thorough cooking is a far safer method than social profiling.
Scotty bribes Alison?  Makes no sense.  He's got no money, she's rich.  

The more obvious scenario based on everything we've seen is blackmail.
Yep.  Unfortunately the maturity base here goes against the odds of people knowing that it's inherent folly to think humans are perfect and some piece of profit-motivated technology is fail-safe.
I guess you're right and the meat food chain uses jewellery boxes to transport their product.  Social profiling FTW, don't bother cooking to temp.
This mess is getting worse by the day.  

She'll have a very strong labor lawsuit.  Unfortunately if the real issues are those of public health, the public may not be in such a strong position.
Some of us predicted this, but were shouted down by the echo chamber.
Tonald Drump?  After a smart analysis, that's your punchlne?  

Although I fear and disdain all the republican candidates for various reasons, as a thought exercise I've been trying to decide which one of the group is the "least worst".  Who would you say?
If like to see this happen, and pork barrel offenders publicly outed.  Look at chronic dissembles and destroyers like Deepak Chopra for example.
I consider Kasich, but for the "thought exercise" to be fair to the republicans I have to consider electability and with that in mind  Rubio gets some points.  

It does continue to amaze me how Trump and Cruz and Carson can even be considered anything other than joke candidates.

Actually it's one week, plus the thanksgiving break. Completely normal in the TV business.
What is Steve Carell promoting? The Big Short?
Yes, you and I are in a very small minority here that loves America, I despise outspoken Canadian superiority, the constant preachiness about how Americans can't say Canadian place names when few Canadians can name or number 50 states, and don't even understand their basic government structure.You're counting other breaks as if they were consecutive.  That's not how it works.  Watch how frequently every other talk show is on break.  Notice how few shows even have a Friday episode.  Listen lady, you're the one that made an embarrassingly False statement in boldface.  Own your mistake admit you were wrong, likr a grown-up.  Or you can keep digging and cursing, like a 12 year old.
Only according to hivemind parroting of lobbyist's bullshit about a guy falling off a roof, or a truck driver being hurt delivering a turbine.  

But if you want to be part of a cult spreading industry propaganda and anti-science bullshit, keep at it.  They love unpaid worker bees like you.
It did?  But the children of reddit said keep chanting that nuclear power is safe and clean. But now you're saying it was "throwing radioactive ash everywhere".  Which of you is wrong?
There's rampant Amercian bashing, and not just on this subreddit.  It's kind of ridiculous for those of us who've lived both sides of the border. Eliminating? No.  

Anyway if you think it's smart to blindly trust an industry that has lied, and failed, and lied and failed, over and over again, then send me your banking details so I can hook you up with some Bre-X stock from my uncle Bernie Madoff. We promise it will be "safe and clean" and that all our lies and failures are in the past.  We're different now.  Our overconfidence plus our lack of any acceptance that we could possibly have missed something, these are the assurances of perfektion. Little miss, you're the one who made outlandish claims, and had the foolishness to highlight them in boldface.  

If you had a shred of honesty, you'd know that nuclear power is an inherently dangerous process that requires extreme measures and designs to be harnessed, that it can cause devastation when it has a bad day, it produces waste that's toxic for 100,000 years, that it's a magnet for those seeking to build weapons of mass terror and destruction, and that its previous claims of being "safe and clean" were unfortunately False as we've seen through monumental failures.

If you could truthfully admit all that but then say "despite all these facts, dangers, and drawbacks, I'm still horny for nuclear power despite the many risks and the bad track record" then you might start to earn a morsel of respect.  

But lying and misrepresenting it as "clean and safe"?  Sorry, but that kind of snake oil is deserving of being called out.  If your fundamentals are a lie, the rest follows.

Your foolish boldface post is still showing here, and teaching you anything about nuclear disasters would be like telling Michael Jackson that repeat rhinoplasty isn't a good idea. You're in such a world of anti-science anti-reality denial that you can't even admit there have been numerous nuclear accidents, and yet you want someone to give you elementary school training?  Try harder.
More impeccable impersonations!  

Chris Matthews, the NFL staff, Ben Roethlisburger(SMASH TIME!), the home viewers, Barack Obama, MSNBC reporters("CAN WE GET INTO THE HOUSE NOOOOOOWWWWWW!"), the San Bernardino terrorist killer filling out a calendar, Kerry Sanders, voice of Doctor Doom.

Finally the Daily Show With Trevor Noah got real.
As powerful as the gutted out panel was, let's not overlook the field piece.  John was at his sarcastic best barging into the politicians waiting rooms and highlighting their lack of giving a damn.  They captured some gold with the tragicomedy of the staffer only getting engaged about the state cranberry instead of the lives of first responders, and what appeared to be some stereotypical energy industry lobbyists getting a rush pass to the inner office.
The point is 60 Minutes used to have 3 Lumber Liquidators stories a week, every week, instead of 1 tough story every 3 years.  Sending Anderson to a Bonobo petting zoo is lovely, but it's not Woodward and Bernstein (look it up).

I'm the antithesis of an "internet kid", which speaks to your perceptiveness :-)

I also never said anything about "all the media is a big lie".
I listened with an extremely overpriced set of over-ear Sennheisers.  Don't listen to his voice, listen to the silence floor underneath it.  Pay special attention *after* the Asian phrase, the after cut is glaring, before is barely/not audible.
That would have been fantastic.
If you're looking to retract, here's your chance.  Are there nuclear disasters, or are they "safe"?  Do they produce toxic waste, or are they "clean"?
For weeks the theory has been she was suspended/railroaded for threatening to investigate glyphosate.  So this is a similar story but a different specific reason.  

I'd sure like to know if her termination was justified but it has been hard to know which side to believe.

But with this week's news that the government is saying she was fired for no reason, just that they don't need her skills, well that's about as suspect a statement as you can possibly make.

You don't suspend and then fire someone for no reason.  I mean you can say it's for no reason, but in that case you're not being truthful.  

Someone really needs to get to the bottom of this.  My worry is that in the next phase someone will "leak" personal trash about her, and we won't know if it's True or False, but it will create the standard smokescreen of doubt.Not sure how they expect to help the economy if they kill thousands of decent Canada Post jobs.  

Killing Canada Post helps the profits of foreign corporations like UPS and FedEx, but it destroys efficiency and a valuable service for Canadians.
Here, it allows you the "privilege" of waiting an extra 1-3 days so you can line up at a convenience store for 20-30 minutes each time you order something.
It's an indisputable fact the Canada Post's door-to-door infrastructure and scale is what gives them to efficiency to turn profits while delivering letters from coast to coast in days for almost nothing.  

Try sending a document with FedEx or UPS.  The price jumps from $1 to $25.
It's more than sustainable, and it actually provides the scale and infrastructure on which the parcel stream free rides.You'd still have the option to let lying thieves at the Big Banks gouge you on your fees.I've dealt with **YOU** on an enterprise level for decades and the amount of pure shit that goes on behind the scenes that never makes it to public knowledge is jaw-dropping.  Hey, it's fun to drop vague False accusations!  

Of course I'm sure you have a good reason for keeping these scandals a secret, instead of bringing them to light and helping your fellow Canadians.  
Can my frail aunt borrow your car to do this every day?  She'll need to drive it up and down the hallways of her living complex, hope you don't mind.  I'm sure you're a nice person and not just a self-interested _______ who doesn't care about the needs of others.
On reddit, everyone thinks if they only use the Canada Post coast-to-coast mail delivery infrastructure to get their free Fallout 4 shipping, that the rest of Canadians should screw off.  Nobody here has physical challenges, and certainly none of them will age.The thing is if you add pure selfishness and cruelty as a motivation, then the reddit anti-postal service propaganda makes sense.
No litter because of leg sand.  Well that makes perfect sense, and doesn't sound at all like dishonest gibberish.
And kill the jobs too.  Canada does need jobs, we have Redditors.Shhh, can't talk about anything that would solve the fake problem.
I have numbers that show killing Canada Post's efficiency and scale would be 5.23624 times *more* expensive.So they're lying when they say there's no need and no demand for Canada Post?  I mean we know that, but usually those calling for the jobs to be killed aren't so up front as you in admitting it.  
No worries, FedEx and UPS will be happy to scoop up the business and gouge you for it.
You ask "what about everybody else"?  Well, the community mailbox and /r/Canada actually share the same philosophy. It's **"screw everybody else"**.Actually no there's not "services for those people".  But if you like, you could pay for those services.  I mean the cost will be thousands of times higher than the efficient postal service. But that's your call.
She collects along with her essential mail and parcels, so it's easy.
We'll see if you remain the lucky one once competition is killed.
Respectful people recycle it, but I have a feeling I'm not talking about you.
Uh, you do know that killing Canada Post helps FedEx and UPS get more power in Cansda right?  You're cheering your own executioner.
I've heard many people say their requests to stop junk mail have been worked just fine.  I can't say for sure but maybe you aren't following the right steps, but if you did, your issue would be cleared up.  And then hopefully you wouldn't confuse the issue of junk mail with the killing of much needed decent jobs.
I'll bet $100,000 or the value of your home - whichever you prefer and have the authority to lose - that I can send you a letter using Fedex or UPS.
It's delivered to the indoor handicap accessible vestibule and she has an oxygen line measured specifically to allow her to retrieve the mail independently, a "luxury" that she had skimp to afford because longer medical grade oxygen hoses aren't included.  She writes and receives personal letters every single day.  Some of them are about the hardships and sacrifices she endured to create a free Canada, all so that selfish young /r/Canada hiveminds can tell her to GTFO.

She's on an extremely tight fixed budget so she has to economize on things like oxygen and food, but /r/Canada would like her to buy a car and drive a km round trip every day.  You people have all the patriotism and compassion of a manure pile.


Provide the name and number of who is providing these free services.  I mean it sounds like you have zero clue about the challenges faced by real people, but maybe you have a secret hotline they don't know about.
Can we kill your job first?
I'm not "dismissing it out of hand".  60 Minutes used to be a journalistic institution, but has turned into a pathetic shadow of its former self.
How does sand prevent litter?  The reason for the mess is people are sick of driving to a Canada post garbage wall to pick up junk, and they're generally selfish __________ as you can see on /r/Canada, so they just dump their junk mail right there.  With efficient high scale home delivery, you just slip your junk mail directly into the recycle bin.  Even selfish _________ do that since it's the default option.So $100,000 that I can't use a private courier to deliver a letter, or would you to make the bet larger?
No, it's a mailbox in the common area.  But if you're proposing that Canada Post can maintain door/indoor delivery then I'd be supportive.

I think you can reject it at the mailbox level, which would have been a lot easier I think.
Your job is a Conservative party lobbyist?  A big banker fee strategist?  A nuisance lawsuit litigator?  Justin Bieber's publicist?  Offshore fraud-telemarketer?
Great for you.  Now hear me out: under both systems, you'd maintain the choice that you prefer. In fact, anyone who currently just hates their home delivery can opt out, free of charge.  Or you can get a PO box if you prefer.  Someone who decides to move or purchase a residence can choose between the established neighborhoods where door to door is absurdly efficient, or they can choose a sprawling neighborhood that was designed for community self-drive-self-serve-mailbox-and-litter stations.  Everyone gets the inherent fairness of choice and it's the best of both worlds.

The problem is that that selfish and inconsiderate vocals want to flip that system so that there is no more "best of both worlds" scenario.  They'll get to continue having what they prefer, but they'll be making sure everyone else suffers.  Choice and freedom and fairness will be gone.  

Now I would never be so inconsiderate as to try and kill your preferred option.   If you like it, then that's nice for you. 

So the obvious question is, why would you want to impose cruel and unnecessary hardship on those when it's entirely unnecessary?  Your choice can live on just fine without deliberating making life worse for others.  

Canada Post's operations are efficient and possible *because* of their universal mandate.  Chopping select services only provides False savings that are lost when the bigger picture of scope and scale are included.  

For example,suppose some selfish redditor is Canada Post's bean counter and figures out that Manitoba and Alberta and Atlantic Canada are slightly less profitable than everywhere else.  So we discontinue service to the locations under the myth that money is being saved.  Suddenly, volumes and efficiency go down, plus expensive alternatives need to be developed, there's complex transfer mechanisms, and reputational damage.  Every nickel saved is costing a dime in workarounds and besides that, overall volumes are dropping.  

That's what you're proposing when you seek to kill efficiency and lower volumes.

I think 20-something redditors have an unrealistic sense of the importance of parcel and document delivery, and it's a realization that will only occur to them later, after they've gleefully killed a beneficial service.


I tried to respectfully explain it, but you've gone full asshole and responded with all the compassion of a brick.
Funny you should mention that. I did agree to a long term all-encompassing arrangement with a large number of products and accounts.  Fundamental to that arrangement was an explicit promise of no service fees ever.  The accounts have a variety of regular inter- and extra- transfers and payments, all of which were declared as no fees, ever.

Less than half way through the duration of that agreement, a major bank has become a royal pain.  They arbitrarily instituted significant service fees across all my accounts, no matter how much or how little they are used.  They threatened to institute a load of charges on prescribed transactions and payments.  I never agreed to these fees, and in fact, any fee whatsoever is contrary to all of our the marketing, proposals, negotiations, agreements, terms and conditions.   

They backed off some fees temporarily during a time of public backlash, but then quietly reconstituted them shortly afterward.  I explicitly rejected payment of these fees, so they began seizing them from my savings accounts, against my orders.  

They know what they're doing probably won't hold up to a full challenge, but they're forcing me to spend tens of thousands on legal action to recover thousands in illegitimate fees.  They are refusing to end the agreement based of their breach of the terms unless I pay a 5 figure penalty.  

If you can fix this, let me know.  But if you can't, then please consider that before you dismissively blame the consumer.

Are you prepared to put your money where your lying mouth is?  Let's set an amount, let's start at $50,000 but we can go higher if you have the money.

You and I will have our solicitors exchange contacts and confirm or refute your libellous statement.  
Whoever is right takes the other's money.  The loser posts here and admits he or she was maliciously lying.

Are you up for it, liar?
The drop-off point option is pure garbage here, but I would never begrudge anyone who wants to use it.  That's why it baffles me at the complete selfishness and cruelty of those who would extend the same basic human decency to others.
Again, do you wish to step into the bet and support mulcairs contentation that I can't send you a letter using a private profit courier?  

Saying they can't set up a lettermail service is like saying McDonald's ambitions of converting to a food bank are prohibited.  Do you need someone to translate that into asshole so you can understand it?
FYI, Larry Wilmore often rips into these issues with a similar tone, style, and authenticity that Jon Stewart used to.  The two day shipping benefit is a fake AF.  

Amazon has DC's that can hit 99% of Canada in 1-2 days, and they have loads of excess capacity.  But now, with any non-prime orders, they stick on a 5-7 day hold before releasing your order.  If you complain, you get to go through several India rep to eventually get one who says it's Canada Post's fault, and they can take up to 9 days for delivery.  

They're very quick and happy to do that, they probably have a way of putting a lot of that in the carriers though.  But don't do it too often. They're getting more aggressive with their lifetime customer bans.
Prime doesn't give discounts, it just removes the artificial delay they put on non-Prime shipments.  Since most retailers in Canada have free shipping, not sure how you can count savings on shipping as real dollars?
We had a similar thing hanging over the dish station, a card with essentially fed/not fed and you just flip it as needed.  Actually it had funny images depicting each situation, but same idea.  Also had an inside/outside card at the door.S,if,you'd like to join the net, you're invited.  If I can send you a letter using a private courier, you pay whatever size we agree to.  If I can't send the letter, I pay you.  
**Shawn68z: "Your an idiotic troll"**

Ah, the irony of an illiterate troll Falsely calling someone else a troll...
At least we know you're too scared to stand behind your libel, gutless liar.
Especially considering it was fake.
RRSP isn't "tax evasion"
I despise the Harper regime and his cronies, but I'm not liking the way this government communication is using Harper-like editorialization and partisan styling.  

Just communicate the tax changes without that crap, and avoid dressing it up in party colors.  This is the kind of shit we rightfully criticized Harper and his minions for doing.  
There's a chance - however tiny it may be - that a friend or crony of Stephen Harper may have a shred of ethics, integrity or personal shame that might help them realize they're being unjustly enriched and with many of the crooked appointments covering future dates, they'd know they haven't lost value for work.  

Do you think it's completely impossible that one of his appointees has basic ethics and decency?Well if you're chickening out, just say it.  And that's besides the irony of someone like you Falsely calling anyone a troll.
Sorry to be the one here that actually read these and paid attention... But what you missed is that the articles are written by different writers, and they form an overall review of Colbert's first block of Late Show episodes, each covering different aspects under a more comprehensive assessment.   And it's entirely possible to have weak interviews and still be the best late night show - just look at the level of competition. As is the descriptive narrative.  Just provide the facts and let us figure out the politics.  Just because the last regime did this crap doesn't mean the new one should repeat the same gutter tactics.
I agree with your assessment here that passenger could have and should have been compelled to verbally identify themselves for radio confirmation.  


But what about a hypothetical situation where the peace officer believes there might be an offence but you believe there's no offence.  Say for example a passenger is scratching their shoulder, peace office thinks they're fastening up a seat belt, but they weren't.  The passenger, operating from the view that no offence, refused to identify.  The peace officer then sees that as obstruction.  How are these independently valid perspectives to be resolved?
It's practical to show it.  But "literally no reason not to show it" is just wrong,  there's lots of reasons someone might have for not wishing to be carded.
I'm against a "police state". But is it actually contributing to a police state if everyone is cooperative?  If anything, easy cooperation lowers the temperature of interactions and reduces the need for more harsh measures and stricter powers.
Spoken like a True troll (and _______)

But if you want to put your money where your mouth is, I'll be glad to take it.
Ideally, the first person in any thread that goes to a personal attack would be tagged as "instigator" and sanctioned. [This is very relevant](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=1pBougV1JK4)But then quandary becomes: if the peace officer reasonably believes there's been an offence, but only asks for the ID, the passenger only hears a request for ID with no basis, and declines.  

Ideally the peace officer might say "I suspect your just pulled your seat belt on as I walked up, let me see some ID".  In that case a reason has been established for requesting it.  Without that, the passenger could think they have a legitimate right to refuse.Of course they would, any party could or would.  I'm mostly concerned about what's happening today, and tomorrow.
Not the best way, nor the way a craftsman would do it.
Don't fall for the obvious trap that you have to try and create patches that match the exact shape and size of the hole you want to fill.  Short of futuristic laser cutting, getting a perfect match is impossible.  

The solution used by craftsmen for years is deceptively simple: cut a new hole and plug with the same tool, so they will be identical.  Often, it's also wise to just make a rectangle around the round hole, and make rectangular patches to fill it.  

It's easy to make rectangular patches that fit exactly, when you've just cut the rectangle.  In many cases the fit is so perfect you wouldn't even need glue (but still, use glue, I just say this to illustrate how perfect the fit can be.)

Update: here's [a video that shows what I'm talking about.](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=lMiTdVM7bik)
The problem though is I could see a situation where a peace officer is only considering whether to pursue a discretionary ticket on the passenger.  If they mention the seatbelt, the passenger could get riled up. But if they don't, the passenger might question the validity of the ID check.  She gets lots of help, but has something you couldn't possibly understand: self-respect.   And nobody deserves to be kicked in the face by jackbooted Trumps like you.
Do you actually think FedEx and UPS are feeling "restricted" in any way because they aren't allowed to slash their price by 90% so they can deliver documents for $3?  

It's like telling the common /r/Canada redditor they are forbidden from learning proper English, or that they can't move out of their mom's basement. 

It's not a True restriction in any practical sense because it doesn't restrict anything they would do, or could do.News flash: /u/1of42 believes FedEx and UPS want to drop their price from $27 to $3... Has no explanation for why they don't just drop it to $4.  Or $5.  Or $6.  Or $10.  Or $20.  Or $25.  Appears to have no understanding of business.More sweet sweet impersonations:  Muslim cab driver, Donald Trump, TSA agent, Muslim traveler, sun-baked racist, fashion impaired douchebro, Ivanka Trump's therapist, Rolling Stone VOEven if we accept your premise about lettermail, parcels and bubble packs are way up, so, there's more reason than ever before to keep having the decent men and women of the postal service delivering to every household every day.  I'm glad you agree.  
Try an order today and watch what happens.
By Falsely calling someone else a troll, you confirm yourself to be a troll.  Good work(?)
No.  How can it be Canada Post's fault if the package isn't even released to them for 5 days?  And besides, shipment of the same items over same routes from a different retailer: 2 days maximum.
  We can't allow blatant bastardization and partisan propaganda to become the government's communication mode... even if this time we agree with the message.  The principle is important here, and wrong is wrong no matter which side does it.
No. What's "ludicrous stupidity on your part" (quoting you) is to believe that profitable foreign couriers are crying because they can't drop the price of their $27 envelope to $3.  If they really were that backwards and stupid, they could just drop the price to $3.01.  Tell us why they haven't don't that!  It's astounding you need such simplistic facts explained to you, but apparently you do.
"Neither a borrower nor a lender be" - Yoda
"I don't expect things to be very fast 2 weeks before Xmas. That's just foolish."

Actually, if you knew how logistics works, it's foolish to think the opposite.  During heavy surges they suspend the fake delay because they need their storage space and chains moving full tilt.  Plus they have massive seasonal staff up.  

You sound very confident so I'd pose this suggestion: if I can show you examples where this has happened, would you be willing to pay a "oops I was wrong fee"?  Let's say $20 per item where I can demonstrate with documented history this has happened?  


Specifically the partisan narrative about the means and presumed social outcomes of tax regulation changes, and the abuse of political party colors.  

I guess the reason dirty tricks like this work is when they're subtle enough, some people don't notice them overtly.
I'm not saying these tricks don't work. I'm saying that it's disingenuous and unethical to use them.  It's kind of like campaigning that you would never use taxpayers money for child care, then slyly taking taxpayers money for child care workers, but trying to hide it under secretive cabinet orders and deceptive job titles.Having followed government communications for several decades, I could even accept if they dressed it up with red highlighting, as there is some historical basis to use red as the highlight color.  

I get that the politicians and the government departments and media and most citizens with higher IQ's and people with compassion and even myself.... we all are relieved and optimistic about having swept the old corrupt regime out of power.   But the classy and mature thing to do is just "be different", not harp on about how different things are doing to be.  Show that your way of governing is distinct through deeds, not words.
Can't help but wonder how certain details of this investigation just happen to be carelessly handed out for publication.  These are top investigators, sworn to their duty and knowing the importance of confidentiality, yet certain key details just happen to be handed to the world's media.  Why?  

That's the title, which is unnecessarily promotional.  Now read the actual article which is full of similar fluff, useless "average" numbers, and celebrity fluffing of the minister with comments that serve his personal and party image.  It even goes on to brag in vague terms about things in the future that haven't even happened.  

This is exactly the crap that the Harper government used to do with their bogus "economic action plan" propaganda campaigns.  It's unethical no matter which party pulls this stunt.

The obliviousness of trying to subvert freedom of speech because the speaker happens to be an asshole.
Get Santa Claus to resurrect the cat, because that's how True this story is.The first time?  No.  After that yes.  No different than waving around a loaded gun.
Pro tip, heat the milk to the point of boiling in a coffee mug, adding cold milk ruins the process.
Sounds like he has more experience being alive than you.  In fact a lot of us have lived through various CPC and Liberal governments, and we've seen corruption and ineptitude from both.  The old guy ranting isn't wrong.  If/when the Liberals are in power for too long, they will also commit ruinous acts, just Harper's band of thugs.  

You may not have been voting age when Harper came along and swept out a crew of crooks, and now it's time to do the same thing again. 

And hopefully vote them aside in 4 years or less.

Or perhaps more ideally, have some kind of balanced minority that keeps the obscenely undemocratic powers of FPTP at bay for awhile, and makes for a scenario where leaders have to compromise periodically.

I explicitly retract any consent you may have misinterpreted that I find texting while driving acceptable. Hopefully that will clear away your wacky impression of what I consent to.
The article fawns over SNL so much that it almost tempted me to watch that junk show.  I was wondering, could the reviewer be right?  Is SNL actually watchable?  But then I noticed the reviewer also saying the most successful comedienne of today should step backwards by a career and join SNL, and that's when I was reminded the reviewer is fruit loops.
Watch the actual broadcast and he does a news rundown at the beginning. You're probably only seeing clips where he does the main story only.
Oh.  What deep questions would you have asked?  


Keep in mind at the time the majority of Americans couldn't distinguish him from any other suspected creep, were buying the traitor narrative, and in many cases, were living the cliche that "I'm not doing anything wrong so who cares about illegal surveillance". 

Making the interview amusing and informative did more good than just turning out yet another repeat interview of the same asked and answered questions that would just get ignored by the masses.
Back in the day the correspondent segments used to be hilarious because they would capture the interview subjects saying something stupid or funny.  But now, lazy producers have switched it to having the correspondent-comedians do all the dumb gags while the subjects just sit and watch.  It's far less effective.
Makes me sad it's only going to be 4 short episodesIf the story as presented is True, asking for a raise is pointless and it's bizarre you would think that way. Doing 300% work for a slightly higher wage makes no sense and isn't physically possible, unless the lost work capacity isn't quite as it seems.  

Obviously you should be seeking another job but quietly and in the mean time just keep your head down and do as well as you reasonably can.
In a way I agree with this.  I've had some assignments that were mostly bad, but as soon as I made the internal decision that I would simply ride them out and move on at the next opportunity, suddenly my attitude changed, and things that would have bothered me became less significant.  

Let me refer to these states of attitude as the "old" me and the "new" me, for the sake of illustration.

For example:  Client makes ill-advised decision that will have major consequences in future years?  The "old" me might have argued and tried repeatedly to show the risks and a better option.  The client would have perceived this as insubordinate or not "being a team player".  Watching them knowingly do the wrong thing would grate on my nerves and I'd see all the predictable problems developing.

The "new" me would realize those future problems won't be mine, and the decision isn't mine to make.  I'd clearly and concisely suggest to the right person an alternative, and why, and then leave it to them.  Done properly, this is seen as principled and constructive.

Sometimes this would come back to pay off when people realized I was the one who knew ahead of time.  But the key to this is not bringing it up ever again after the first time.  

Once you make that decision that your life doesn't depend on that job, the sky opens .  You no longer feel bad about leaving on time.  You do the best you can in the time provided, but without energy-sapping fear and distraction.  You can (silently) laugh off your boss's dumb decisions.  Bullying colleagues just become temporary amusements, not the jail wardens of your career.  

In my experience, a funny thing tends to happen.  Your care-free attitude is perceived as positive, and you exclude the impression of a balanced employee who is secure in their person and not a threat to the authority or a malignancy.  I would find myself being treated much better once I realized a temporary bad placement was just that: temporary.  Raises or opportunities would look for me instead of the other way around.  In time, the bosses would clash with other frustrated workers, usually resulting in the departure of one or the other.  Sometimes the resulting changes would turn a terrible placement into a genuinely good one.  
Candice Bergen is a clear liar, which should have be predictable given her slavish devotion to the CPC.  

But CBC's Chris Glover really misinterpreted the cartoon.  He strangely confused the Stephen Harper character for an "imposing event organizer".  How can he have missed that?
That's not erring on the side of caution, that's just erring - badly.
That's sort of generally True, though not always.  It depends on the culture and the situation.  But often when someone is working crazy long hours they aren't well rested, they make mistakes, and they are unpleasant.  

Then they acquire an over-developed sense of responsibility, that they are the savior of the company, and that because of their sacrifices, they should be given a pass on other things, which they deem as secondary to their heroics.  

I've seen lots of these prima donnas.  Hey where's Joe today, it's almost noon?  Oh it's Ok, he was here til midnight  fixing the computer system.  Joe skips meetings and training because he's always doing something "more important".  

But when he screws up or misses something because he wasnt at the meeting, again that's because he's a hero.  

Joe doesnt have time for little housekeeping thinks like filling out his time card, documenting stuff, or updating the project log.  Or explaining what he did, or sharing his progress with others.  He's allowed to be rude and doesnt have the patience to share his special knowledge with the junior staff.  Pretty soon the whole place is stepping around him, because he's the special guru who saves the day during emergencies and you need him... Except he creates nearly as many fires as he extinguishes, and breeds a bad working atmosphere.  Moral of the story: don't turn into Joe.
Wow, that was a fairly candid report from the Harper campaign.  Clearly Robert Fife isn't looking for a conservative senate appointment (unlike certain corrupt former journalist-senators). 

And whoever is dressing Harper really blew it on this day.
I'll confess to feeling a twinge of satisfaction and justice to hear that jerks like Paul Calandra and Joe Oliver are forecast to lose their seats.  

Still, I'm not naive. The old boys club will find cushy spots for these cretins.  But for at least one day they'll feel the sting of joblessness and rejection that they've directly imposed on millions of innocent Canadians. This reminds me of when that school banned the Barenaked Ladies because the idiot principal thought it was nude women.
First past the post, it's what can give a party 100% of the power with only 35% of the votes.
Nothing as romantic as when your guy tries to prove you're wrong about something trivial
Loved the trailer, even the driving background music.  This will be 4 hours of quotable gold.
Except ["The Joke: The Musical"](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=PLDGoEh7jqA) is probably the best sketch of the series.
It's a myth that jobs building automation exceed those it replaces.  Think about it for 2 seconds, industry doesnt want to replace low wage workers with high wage workers in equal measure.    

As for your contention that if robots threatened jobs, there'd be a snap back reaction, well sorry but we've already seen millions of jobs killed with offshoring, and so far, there hasn't been any significant opposition take hold.  Sheep just praise corporations for being such great capitalists.
Technically it's a British remake of the Swedish series.  All that happened for the Amercian broadcasts is they removed huge chunks of scenes to pack in extra commercials.
It was sort of a neat, fun series.  I wish they hadn't gotten so metaphysical with it by the end.
It's more about what it takes to get access to a Julliard education.
It's the same way that for the most part, Americans eat garbage and read garbage and elect garbage and promote garbage.  Well [here's what I said](http://www.reddit.com/r/LateShow/comments/3nbikm/one_month_in/) after the first month of shows had aired.It was a wickedly funny Pink Floyd reference.
Seemed to be an increased amount of the absurdist humor today, the TED Talks and especially the on air meeting, which I'm inclined to believe was real.  

Now looking forward to the payoff of the Rituals piece with the live chicken (?!)
Downsides were he kind of brushed Carey Mulligan aside and I found he was fawning over Elvis Costello a bit much.What I heard was four 30 minute episodes plus some kind of behind the scenes/backgrounder episode.
According to Robert Fife anyway.  From my point of view any finance minister that calls a deficit budget a surplus just because his maniac boss said it has to be a surplus to activate a megaton of election spending promises deserves to get clobbered at the polls.  


Never mind the fact he was incompetently late tabling a budget, which screwed the provincial finance planning.  

Then the way he's gone into complete hiding?  Three strikes and you're out Joe Oliver.
The guy was a relentless talking head for Harper, he would say literally anything with no regard to the truth.  
Well actually probably not.  Fife already had his piece, the sudden cancel would have more effect on the host and the show producer.
What's the difference between paying an Asian child $1/hour to assemble Apple Watches versus running a robot that averages $1/hour in maintenance costs?  
Well Blacklist has been [ripping off Nathan For You](http://www.fastcocreate.com/3052081/image-of-the-day/if-the-billboard-for-nathan-for-you-looks-familiar-there-is-a-hilarious-rea). 

Season 3 staring this week!
For the 26th time in a row, that seemed forced
Darn, Stephen jumped on what would have been a hilarious and typical Sarah Silverman punch line ("I'll just flash the top of my pubes")
Stephen trying to tell the home kitchen story was kind of clumsy, and it just made me remember how incredible Letterman used to be with telling those unscripted 10 minute slice of his personal life stories.  Stephen's talents lie elsewhere :-(
Congrats, how did you get the photo?
Well that Zelda conductor has a lot of zazz.Not really. Dave is mostly reclusive and spent all his free time at his home or ranch.  But he could do a 10 minute story just about one small real life event and make it hilarious.I'm seeing lots of online ads from Elections Canada looking for workers.  Are they rapidly trying to staff up, or are these ads just running in the wrong schedule?
Finally, although she should have been canned for conflict of interest.  Here's hoping the next wave of CBC journalists have a shred of ethics.  

And here's a tip to CBC brass: quit trying to play "starmaker" with your hosts.  Let their work and merit do the job.  Constantly promoting them as celebrities does more harm than good, and it's unnecessary.
I've [praised the Late Show with Stephen Colbert](http://www.reddit.com/r/LateShow/comments/3nbikm/one_month_in/) on many occasions.  But it's undeniable that it was clumsy when he went unscripted last night.I don't know about that.  Yes I agree the overall appearance wasnt her best.  He stepped on her opening bit and he got a little carried away with praising her.  And reading the bad jokes was kind of a flop, even though she did add a bit of life to it.  I liked the story of how her careless joke tweet turned into a news "fact".
I found myself wondering promotional consideration changed hands, maybe does Nintendo fund the orchestra or something?  That's not exactly how money works.  A "billion dollar" industry doesn't just hand over 100% of every dollar of revenue.  And the dollar value of drug trade is wildly over-stated by law enforcement's bias to fluff the public relations value of their seizures.  

Think about it.  If you bought $950 worth of pot and sold it for $1000, you didn't "make" $1000, you made $50. 

Please note that I'm not necessarily against reforming drug laws, but just trying to inject some financial reality.These ads are sleazy campaigning at it's worst.  And it's cynical and revealing they are doing them with foreign language only.
I see many people commenting didnt read the story.  Also, some appear to considering this based on a naive assumption of a clean and sanitized life.  

In the real world, things get a lot more fuzzy.  People who swear abuse against each other one day and back in love the next.  Children, poverty, depression, survival... all can factor into cases like this.  

For those who didnt read, the crux of the issue is she applied for the protection order, the JP found that the last incident was 5-6 week prior, and decided that didn't fit the criteria for immediate danger.  I don't even know the typical standards being applied and whether or not that was a normal or typical decision.

In hindsight of course we can see it was wrong.  But what are the common law standards for such a denial?
$1000 worth of pot for $50?  Doubtful.
I'm disappointed to see this mostly bullshit story and misleading headline getting circle jerked for the umpteenth time this month.  

First off, this guy isn't an inventor.  He sells overpriced crap in a small bottle with unproven health claims.  He hasn't given "99%" of his fortune away, he's pledging to give a a certain amount to research, an amount that will eventually total most of his current value, but neglects the fact his current worth will grow.  And besides, he has so much that these sums become meaningless.  It's like you or me offering to give away hundreds of dollars we don't need.  
  
His track record is not good, so how about we wait til he actually does something good before we shower his with congratulations?
It's a fallacy, like wondering how Coke can sell 1 cent of sugar water for $2, by ignoring and discounting 50 intermediate steps.

In a Chinese paper.  I'd like to see them run this in the National Post.  Ok, I don't mean that I would actually *like* them to do that, but that there's a clear reason why they place ads like this where they do.
Whoever conceived of this ad deserves to be sentenced to live with Kory Tenecke for 20 years.
Did I see Rob Ford sitting back of home plate during the early innings?  Not joking, I thought it was him.
Maybe it was the so called "lizard of oz", but do we know that for sure?
Cannot wait.
Time slot is *everything* in regular network TV.  It can make or break a show.  SNL isn't regular.  It's kind of an institution, a relationship program.  Ratings and production costs are still key metrics.
Fine, call it preferential treatment
Plot aside, why wouldn't you immediately quit school and move to another state weeks ago? This is a fictional TV show
Hire an instructor.  The cost for lessons is far less than you'll pay when you wreck some cars or kill someone.  Or maybe just use public transit, that's cheaper than owning a vehicle.
Size of the assailant, knife and the % chance of medical care saving your life after a drugged up freak stabs you in the heart are not considerations.
Because this happened in Toronto, not a Hollywood movie set.
Interesting video. I'd heard the hive mind all along that this was supposedly a trigger happy cop that just walked in shooting.  

While the video is not fully convincing to me, I will say it has gone a long way towards me understanding the police officer's action.  

This was clearly a volatile and blatantly armed suspect.  He was steps away from being able to stab the police.  (Young redditors need to review the experiments on the lethality of short range knife attacks versus guns). 

With the benefit of hindsight, it looks like less force and more caution could have been applied.  But this video goes a long way to reducing my earlier impressions.  

Anyone who thinks knife attacks are easy health fix is a person who knows zero about law enforcement or medicine.  In many cases they're a lot worse than GSW
That isn't what was said.If it was, then someone would say "was it done in a street car in a city with similar elevation" and so on.  Suffice to say, extensive experiments have found knives are surprisingly lethal at longer ranges than most people think.

There was very good reason for the cops to approach the streetcar: they were brave, and knew there was a volatile armed hijacker on board.  It's still unclear if they even knew he was alone on their.  

Interesting thing is that if there were any passengers still on the streetcar, this identical shooting would be heralded as heroic.
If he appoints her environment minister, I'll campaign to have Stephen Harper be made permanent emperor of Canada.
Obviously he was wicked good in presenting his argument.  


But something was lost in the fact she couldn't smoothly articulate a very real issue that's being swept aside in pot-mania.  Government's embracing marijuana seem to be gravitating to the Colorado-style "pot theme park" approach, where it's not only legal, it's fun! It's healthy! It's supporting the tax base!  

This woman rightly knows that the sad reality for some stoners is not that it cures their glaucoma and helps them be the next Seth Rogan of Hollywood.  They get baked and neglect other priorities.  I've seen it countless times too.  

It's only harder to break those cycles when the media and now the government promote pot as harmless health food.  
In my experience it's the complete opposite. Alcohol and cigarettes are trivial but drugs are much harder to get.An awful woman?  She helps addicted and impoverished people.  She probably does more good in a day than you've done ever.  But yeah, because she raised a non-reddit approved concern, and she cares about her daughter's well being, she's "an awful woman".  I'm not thrilled about this.  The Olympic rights are massively expensive, with huge profits being siphoned off to a corrupt organization.  

The Olympics generates exactly 2 weeks of programming whereas the same money could be spent hiring 10,000 excellent permanent employees who would produce 52 weeks of fine programming a year instead of 2 weeks that you can't possibly consume.

Bell/TSN private sector Olympic coverage was good, better actually in many ways because they have far more channels than CBC.

We should have let Bell buy these and use CBC's small budget more wisely and efficiently.   We'd still have 99% the same coverage, the same analysts, the same high production value... but spread across more channels, and not wasting tax dollars.
If you were to learn they don't, would you then reverse your opinion?   Because "chicken_wallet" is right.I've monitored both for decades, and actually the US coverage is excellent, but you won't find too many Canadians that will admit that.  The old trope about them only covering US athletes ceased being True several Games ago, but home pride is too strong here.

NBC has stumbled with the issue of airtimes, but their analysts, technical, research and on air crews are the best that money can buy.  But most Canadians can't objectively see that.
CBC's coverage is wall to wall packed with similar schmaltz stories.
I wouldn't agree, but I'm hard pressed to find one thing wrong in your assessment.  Well actually "unwatchable" is thoroughly wrong.
No
Well that's not really True.  I've seen countless scenarios were intoxicants have ruined lives, or made a hard life even tougher. 

Riiiight.  Nice try.  

In my experience, drugs were 10+ times more prevalent in rural schools.  Kids can party miles away from the nearest adult. Kids could grow and store bales of pot or mushrooms in barns that could never been found.  In a city condo, good luck sneaking so much as a rolling paper in, and try having your friends over to smoke up in the den of your parents condo.This post just proves you've never raised a child.  If you think every (or any) 16 year old just follows what their parent says, probably best you sterilize yourself now to avoid disappointment later.  

And if you think it's hard to ask your 16 year old daughter to stop getting baked and do her homework, think of how much harder it will be when she says "but there's 10 new legal "medicine" shops that just opened, and PM Trudeau says it's Ok and it must be good or the government wouldnt be promoting it and opening so many locations.  So get lost mum, I'm going to go smoke some health food.  Who needs education?"


I read,it, obviously, so no need to be snide. Maybe you didn't understand or read what you wrote.
You'd have to care about other humans to even begin to understand.  Check back with me if you ever do.
Sources for alcohol in a 1000 student school: 900+.   Cost: $0

Sources for illegal drugs in a 1000 student school: answer yourself and notice the difference. Cost of illegal drugs: &gt;$0

Yep, blame the lady. I guess your mother sucked too?
That's consistent with your assumption that the earth is flat and that nobody knows why the tides go in and out.  Even your "good day" is a patent lie, so it seems to be endemic.
Speaking of "ass backwards", why did you say alcohol had to be bought by someone over 19?So in other words, "steps away".

"Stab proof" vests don't work the same in real life as they do in video games.
Oh, OK then the throat. Happy?
That's what happens when all your knowledge is acquired from video gaming.
And sometimes even a good sixteen year old doesn't always slavishly obey their parents.  By your logic, your parents completely failed your education when they missed teaching you the difference between "effect" and "affect".  By my logic, you can still have a few weak spots in your language ability and it's not because of bad parenting.


What difference does that make?
He did his best to make young people aware of the gross excesses of partisan patronage, and the dangers a PM-appointed Senate.   He taught them how stunts like proroguing Parliament can be used to diminish democracy even in a nation like Canada, and how even the most False statements can be believable of you spend hundreds of millions of dollars advetising them.  

As a walking, talking object lesson of how hard-core Conservatism and Capitalism can be harmful, Harper was great.

Uh, not sure if you realize your title is blatantly racist.
- Put the brakes on the Canada Post delivery extermination, change the CP executiveRead the article, and it will make sense.She's not wrong about Kory Teneycke being toxic.
Speaking of "out of control teenage daughters""Fearless cop stops hijacker"

It was another spectacularly crafted appearance, and yet another in which the host genuinely breaks out laughing.
As the police arrive, two officers are seen with guns drawn and in brace position.  In a separate audio capture we hear confusion about whether or not he has hostages in the streetcar.  

It's at least conceivable that in those early seconds a cop might wonder if Yatim is darting back and forth to threaten or harm hostages, and that taking the first clean shot might be a good idea.  

With the benefit of hindsight, you and I can see a better path.  But for police rolling up on the scene, it may have have looked that way.
Not even close.  Maybe the easiest shortcut is to just never use "effect" as a verb. It can be a verb, but based on reddit posts, nobody here is equipped for that. 
That's a nice theory, but look at the closest few hundred Conservatives all around him: they too are walking, talking examples of badness.  

Look at Kory Tenycke.  Paul Calandra.  Jason Kenney.  Jenni Byrne.  Joe Oliver.  Peter McKay.  Pamela Wallin.  Nigel Wright.  We could list 200 more, just off the top of our heads.  

Harper wasnt some unique bad example of Conservatism.  There's a million more just like him.
I don't think Reddit's primitive system allows edits of titles.Have you used *any* other web bulletin board forum software in the last 20 years?  WYSIWYG?
What is even a "progressive" conservative other than a jumbo shrimp?  And if you've heard the short list of Harper replacements, the CPC isn't leaving the flat earth any time soon.

No, not literal bales.  Large quantities.  And it's the drugs that weren't found, not the barns - that's my quick sentence structure to blame.  The curious question is how these issues you speak of are a problem across acres, but not a problem in a compact condo?
You can't imagine how it's possible to lose by spending millions on licensing and millions more on lavish production, for an event that can only generate at maximum 2 weeks of revenue?  Can you audit my taxes, I like the color of your glasses!

Comparing to Rogers NHL isn't really valid because myself and anyone in the business can tell you it was an absurd deal.It isn't that someone specifically tells her it's OK, it's the message that's sent when society and government embrace and promote and celebrate something.  Hard to tell kids about the dangers of alcohol when liquor outlets are everywhere, having celebratory promotions.  
So what?  Olympics broadcast coverage is a boondoggle that loses money.  Broadcaster can only report meagre profits if they fudge some numbers. It's done for ego stroking, "indirect" benefits, and to prop up corporate psyche.

The maximum bid and production cost should be proportional to its broadcast contribution: 2/208 weeks of CBC's budget.  And that's being a bit generous, since the Olympics don't broadcast 24x7 anyway.

The Olympic format could use tweaking anyway.  Cramming so much into so little time means that most of the amazing content can't even be viewed or appreciated.  Spreading it out over a longer period would seem a worthwhile experiment.  Athletes are ostensibly not making much per hour, so four weeks versus two weeks might be interesting from the revenue side.  Instantly, you'd be doubling the relative value of investments like research, licensing, production planning, prep, coaching, etc.  200% revenue while bumping your cost up a few % is any business venutre's dream come True.

But I've got no problem watching the Olympics on Bell/TSN, while simultaneously keeping the thousands of good employees that CBC had to make jobless the last few years.  

You mean reddit is antiquated compared to 1999 web board edit boxes right?  And if you think reposting stolen posts under different titles doesn't happen, may I welcome you to your first day here?
I can say with over 99% confidence I've watched a lot more Olympics than you.  But never mind that, let's just look at the most recent Olympics which even the youngest and most inappropriately overconfident redditor should have seen.  CBC was taking breaks from showing their expensive coverage to play the Simpsons, Coronation Street, and junk movies.   

I wish they would have aired more repeats of the events they spent 9 figures procuring, but re-runs of commodity filler was more important apparently.

With your antenna you should have noticed that if you'd been watching.  As for how you'd watch the games under Bell, you'd get cable TV for two weeks and the disconnect it afterward.  Based on costs here, connect and disconnect are free and service is pro-rated.  So your cost would be $14 plus taxes.
If only there was some kind of user, moderator, and administrator level review and authority that could remove any such rare instances that you describe.  

And again, whether you like the feature or not, or would use it or not, it's lack of existence is undeniably primitive, as is the lack of WYSIWYG.  I think WYSIWYG was on C64 Geos almost 30 years ago.
It's been generations since conservative politicians in North America walked any of their conservative economic talk.  Look at several past administrations on both sides of the border.  

The democrat/liberal administrations were always rumored to be crazy spenders, but ended up having sane budgets and driving down debt.  The republican/conservative administrations, Falsely flying the "sensible economic stewards flag" are the ones who engaged in ludicrous spending and massive debt accumulation, often for non-productive purposes like military industrial sinkhole spending or corporate bailouts.
If even one Belieber girl had been cowering behind a seat, there'd be praise for the cops who spared her from getting her throat slashed.  

In hindsight - repeat in hindsight - it's possible to imagine a scenario where they might have waited this guy out and subdued him non-fatally.  

Of course that would have probably required at least some breaches of training and protocol along the way, because a suspect prepared to use a knife isn't one to be wrestled with because this isn't WWE wrestling.  

But the redditors who played this level in Metal Gear Solid and think they knew better have never been first on the scene with a duty to serve and protect.  They'd fill their diapers in a situation like this.  

I do think he shot too soon, but I can see same rationale now that the videos are out.

And there's the distinction.  

Mom why can't I drive, you do?  Because you're not old enough.  When you're of age and legal and safe, you may.

Mom, why can't I do meth?  Well it's unsafe and illegal and no sane adult does it.  

The original silliness was some nonsense about how city kids have drugs and rural ones don't.  In my experience, that stereotype is False, and there's some logistical reasons for that.Gretzky post-rationalization is as airheaded as his original endorsement.  Oh well, you can't expect to be a great hockey player and a great intellect at the same time.
It's like a shortcut to sensibility.
I was trying to think of an excuse why what you were saying was so factually wrong.  Perhaps you only watched one Olympic coverage cycle and didnt pay good attention, then let bad memory syndrome cloud out the truth.  I was giving the benefit of the doubt that your misinformation was benign, and that your instigation about me stemmed from overconfidence, not malice.  But ok, perhaps I was wrong.

If you're now trying to claim a lot of experience and knowledge, then what is your excuse for being outside the facts? Even if we accept your overstated distance estimate, check the experimental research on close range knife attacks.  15 feet isn't that much.
Debt to GDP only matters to apologists and the most blind CPC devotees.  

The rest of us watched him blow though surpluses, burn up various rainy day funds, and sell the house and car to create a final fake "surplus".  
FYI: Marijuana and meth are both illegal drugs.  Both have medically useful variants.  The moral and persuasive arguments become irrationally void when we decide that it's now cool to get baked as long as it can raise taxes.  The same can be said about cigarettes and to a certain extent, gambling - both of which are blessed by their government endorsements.


Yeh, your facts are way off which I guess may explain your sentiment.  Nobody's discussing the quality of the CBC coverage, but I'm questioning the use of money.  As for their mandate, CBC should favor content where others won't.  I get why Coronation Street would be selected, but I don't get why they'd want to outbid the private broadcasters for Simpsons and the Olympics.Since pulling a gun trigger has to be assumed as a lethal response, you don't want to taken lightly.  Professional training views knives inside of 21 feet as high risk.  15 feet, or 6 feet plus a jump down the stairs is too close for sensible comfort.
No credible firearm expert would recommend using a gun when there's someone else's body and arms in the vicinity.  Real guns don't work like Xbox guns. It's rather easy to injure yourself with a gun even under good conditions.  Rolling around like a movie hero?   All bets are off.

Go right ahead psychopath.  Although you actually don't want information, otherwise you would have found it in 20 seconds using your favorite search engine.  That means you just want to be stalker, and you'll lie in that effort.  

And since this *IS* one of your alt accounts, you lied about that too.  But I guess a liar lying isn't news.
Right before the first shot Yatim rushes into frame. And your view of "I don't see why any shots were fired" is because you have the benefit of perfect hindsight, and four interior camera views.  

If you were the first cop on the scene, you'd see a public street car containing an unknown number of hostages.  You'd have zero hindsight and zero interior camera views.  You may have been told a deranged man with a knife tried slashing someone's throat.  You'd flash back to memories of another knife wielding hijacker in a bus who decapitated someone a year or two before you entered police training.  You'd be more than a bit edgy.  

Every time he darts out of view you don't know if he's slashing another person's throat.  Will your hesitation cost another innocent life?  Oh!  He's back in view and he's rushing to the door!  Shoot him!
  
The back story is she didn't really care much for Justin Trudeau, but thought it would be a fun pic. 
For those who may not know, John Manley isn't some random CEO.  He was very nearly the leader of the Liberal Party, but ended up losing to Paul Martin.  My opinion, Manley would have been a far better choice and that historical miscue might have contributed to the long and painful Harper era.  (Manley was more relatable than Paul Martin, a billionaire tax dodger and shipping magnate.)

No matter who it's from, I hope Trudeau tunes out CEO's and their lobbying.  Even on their worst day, they're doing just fine.  A few decades of favouring people over corporations might start to level the field.The Conservative clown car still hasn't rolled to a complete stop.
That was me too.  His first episode was about making a poo flavored yogurt.  Well I hate "shock" comedy, and I hate prank shows.  So I figured his show would be intolerable.  Wasnt I surprised.
Is worth noting that every talk show appearance Nathan Fielder does is meticulously crafted for comedic value.  He doesn't just show up for a casual chat. Guy is brilliant.  

You can also see masters of the genre like Conan and Kimmel genuinely laughing their asses off whenever he comes on.  I'm talking genuine surprised laughter, not Fallon-folly.  

Watch when he calls Conan a clown.  Conan isn't expecting it and completely loses it.
Yes it's True.
They are set up, but I would call them crafted, not scripted.  Nathan Fielder does this for all his appearances.  The host has to hit a few simple key cues, but Nathan does the whole show.  He's a lot like old Bill Murray or Steve Martin appearances on David Letterman used to be.
Everyone you know is clueless then, the show has never been canceled or even hint of being canceled.

If your goal is to deny the Holocaust then sure.
Veep and Girls and Togetherness and Hello Ladies and Ballers and Getting On and The Brink and Silicon Valley will be airing soon.  

So not really sure what you're talking about that there's no half hour comedies.


Which brand promotes child labor?
It was lightly implied, but supporting Taiga is not a joke.
Wellhead they're set up, but that's because it's a masterful comedy piece.  Check out his Kimmel appearances for other good performances.

Most talk show interviews are just a celebrity common out and saying whatever meaningless pap comes to mind.  The human body hasn't evolved as much as you think cars have.  It still gets injured and killed at the same speeds it did previously. Most speed limits are fine, and are derived from impartial laws of physics, not "the man". 

I travel the speed limit, and every day I pull up to a light or parking lot within seconds of some idiot who blew past me but ended being stopped at the same bottlenecks.  He complains about how much fuel he goes though, his frequent collisions, and expensive insurance.  
That's not accurate in terms of your fuel consumption sweet spot.  The flaw in the statement is "reasonable" level.  Studies show at lower, safer speeds, when increased, drivers keep exceeding.
Threads like this, you can always tell who has studied physics, who has been first on a crash scene, who has struck an animal on the highway, who has buried loved ones.  And you can also tell whose driving experience is mainly on video game consoles.
Because impatient and selfish people tend to be speeders, and they need an enemy, hence why you'd be Falsely accused of "enforcing" the law when all you're doing is driving safely and legally.There isn't.  You're responding to the typical fallacious arguments of speeders.
It was probably one of the numerous myth packed speeder sites or youtube videos.
The people you're trying to convince think they can just restart the level and play again.  They've never seen the True consequences of speeding, texting behind the wheel, nor do they know the physics involved.
If you can develop a magic machine that controls the weather, makes every vehicle have perfect mechanical condition with new top quality tires, and every driver on the road with elite race skills, on and make sure there's no hazards on the road no no animals... Then sure.
Curious that you drive within your car's ability first, but your own ability second.  Sadly, there's many the same.
FYI, many of the speed limits being whined about here *are* derived by engineers.  

There is an upper range at which people can't or won't keep increasing their speeds.  Sadly, few drivers understand the actual distance a car can travel just during their reaction time, or how long it takes to stop, or the physics involved, or the risk of weather, hazards, or the fragility of human life.

The difference is between dying and living, and between topping in 200 feet instead of 300.  We can do demo where someone hits you in the knees with a baseball bat at a slow speed, then at full speed.  You'll see that energy is relative to the square of velocity.
Your last statement is actually not True, but that's the laws of physics saying that, not me.  And if you'd read the thread, you would have known the comment you jumped on was sarcastic.
Well that's not medically True.  Stopping distance much?
Already today someone died at lower speed than 120.  Physics doesn't care what your high score is.  Going slower gives more time to react, makes stopping times shorter, reduces collisions, and and lessens the consequences of any collision.  But speeding allows some hothead to be waiting at the stop light when I roll up to it a few seconds later, burns more fuel, causes more injuries, deaths and property damage.  Which set of features is smarter?
Lower speed can be the difference between meat paste and a major injury, or between major injury and a bruise, between a bruise and nothing, or between a collision and a miss, or between a miss and a controlled avoidance.  

But speeding offers the ability to get to the next stoplight, train crossing or parking lot a few seconds faster.  Sounds awesome.
Why didnt Harper give it to Conrad Black or the Saudis?
Gretzky may be taking a brave stance and showing the cognitive effects of hockey concussion.
You may have missed a lot of the acrimony that accompanied Mulroney and Chretien eventually being ousted.  Mulroney was perceived as a detached crook and Chretien as an uncaring thug.  

But nothing really compares to the sustained two year campaign of personal attacks on Justin Trudeau and the months of racial fear mongering.  In the past things like that were done as quick hit jobs, they weren't something that went on and on.
Unfortunately no.  Before Fox News there were email lists, and newsletters, and anonymous faxes, and guys photostating vulgar cartoons or propaganda and putting in mail slots or lockers.  And back in the day fist fights between olde tyme politicians.

In fairness, Ignatieff was criticized for being an absentee Canadian intellectual.
[Oh?](http://www.theglobeandmail.com/report-on-business/us-saudi-firms-to-buy-former-canadian-wheat-board/article23966156/)I guess you haven't driven in the USA where that's exactly what happens.  When you jack it up from 100 to 140 The braking distances 2x+ and fender bender becomes catastrophe.
The idea is wrong. The "science" isn't science, is conjecture, for anti-cop, pro-speeding web theorists - many of whom get money from "ticket fixing".  You'll always find a "study" to support any paid viewpoint, you just have to weigh it against thousands of other data points, and then figure out where Newton got physics wrong.
Overconfidence is a common factor in "accidents".
Question, what's the purpose of making vehicles safer?
I'm not the one pitching conspiracy theories, so bzzt you lose.
I've got you beat, but who cares about anecdotes when facts and science are overwhelming?
A "lot" of people believe in Elvis, psychics, and "all season" tires.  I prefer to side with intelligence, science, facts, and psychics over group think.
Uuuuh?
Daymond?  Best deals?  Like what?  My impression is that Lori has managed to make the most of a lot of deals.
The history of signal vault vs ID stronghold makes this understandable.
The owner of SignalVault was supposed to provide a properly tested sample, and didn't.
That's my opinion also, a True House of Commons would be a random selection of everybody.  It should be done like a jury.  

All we have now is a House of Narcissists.
Hundreds of trillions even.  I mean why buy an affordable toy drone when you can buy an expensive one that smashes your phone?Fuel costs aren't really relevant with hobby UAV's.  

What's the use of longer flight time if the UAV is out of legal range within seconds?
The next level will be a service that gets the library staff to carry it from the pickup shelf and put it in your hand.I have a relative who does that to several digits, and can willfully remove all mandatory supplemental fees.  

"I thought you were broke, how'd you get this TV?"   

"Oh it was only $1000, and I got free extended warranty."   

"Isn't that the one we looked at that was on sale for $1500?  That you couldn't afford?"

"I went back and the sales guy give it to me for like a thousand and something. Here's the bill... $1,199"

"What's this other thing for $299?"  

"Oh warranty, he said if I buy the $200 warranty he'll knock it off the price of the TV"  

"We'll it's $300, not $200"  

"Yeah $200 and something.  Anyway, it's basically like I got the extra warranty for free."  

(Look at bill, shows a couple hundred more in taxes and fees, total is close to $1700)

I've since heard her bragging to various people about her great TV deal: "$1000 and free extended warranty" but has no idea why she's always broke.


History and logic 
Maybe I missed but where's the Colecovision?

Edit: NM, close to bottom left
Dumb writer was probably thinking of Justin Timberland, the boot magnate.
Article says TD Bank is the most shorted stock on TSE, is that real?  Surely there's some others with more short interest?   Or are they using some weird stat that is absolute, not relative?
It's a strange metric considering the baselines could be completely out of whack. It's like who got the best deal on the most magic beans.
Well publicity by itself doesn't produce money. You still have to persuade consumers to part with their cash.It was probably filmed months ago, when the UAV hype was less, but still.
Because their mandate is interesting TV, the TV producers don't care as much about the business success.
Huh? She's not the one who did, she was just thr wilfully blind customer.  And onboarding is business speak for the hiring and introduction of employees.  And I don't think it's illegal.
Well she's complicit in artificially understating her own spending.  She also thinks all of her iPhones have been "free".
If Xcraft only sells to oil rig owners that's a low number of customers.
Please send me your camera and gyro equipped smart phone you're not using. 
I see a pallet of them selling for 60 cents each at the liquidation center on Nov 1 2015.
I bet it is tasty, as beef jerky usually is, and premium cuts are even better.  But aren't there a million and one artisanal jerky makers?
% short interest would be a more fair metric
Kimmel, not Fallon

Seemingly not in Canada, it's standard practice.  

And why would Best Buy care?  If they make 30% margin on warranty and 6% on electronics, why wouldn't they want their staff maxing out the high margin stream at the expense of the low margin?
My parents would take half of the candy I collected to teach me the concept of income tax, then 10% more each day to teach about property tax.  That made sure the candy was gone quick.
Thus contradicting the idea that people have spare smart phones sitting around that they don't value.
Because nobody remembers being hyped about 3D printers, or Sidekick phones or Go Pro cameras or George Foreman grills.If I were them I'd be thrilled too.  They only sold $143,000 gross (? I think?) and yet they were being valued at up to $10 million.  That's like 80x sales, or probably Infinity P/E ratio.
It's not me that's having trouble understanding. Smart phones still have actual cost/value of several hundred, and aren't the valueless objects you suggest.  You even proved it by getting all possessive when I said to send me some of your dust collectors.The article shows that Mikki Bey **STILL** doesn't get it.  Crying is OK.  But crying for silly reasons during a business presentation isn't a great move.  

Equating herself to Huffington and whoever else is also delusional.  And any woman who falls for Sheryl Sandberg's claptrap deserves to be declined.  "Leaning in" means nothing, and accepting motivational survival tips from the world's most privileged and overrated women sets us back, it doesn't help us.  

Mikki Bey's problem was she's got an eyelash technique, not a business.  They actually praised her business in the scale she's at, but she started needlessly blubbering.  

Now, instead of taking the important lessons from that, she's doing whiny justifications.  She thinks that because she cried and Huffington cries, that means she's the next Huffington.  Guess what Oprah takes dumps and so do I, but that doesn't make me Oprah.
The situation was that the sharks were being complimentary, but it was becoming obvious nobody was going to give her big bucks for her nail salon... And rightfully so.  They even tried explaining to her about scaling the business, but she didnt seem to know that, and I think she was embarrassed.   The embarrassment plus the realization she wasn't getting the jackpot was why she cried.  Maybe, but as of 1 day ago, you didn't even know about phone drone, so you weren't saving it for that.  

It's one of those ideas that seems intriguing at first but then after you think about it, not so much.Exactly.  Sandberg got more than a few promotions due to affirmative hiring, and she appears to spend 99.99% of her time promoting Sandberg and ignoring her day job.  

Same with Zuckerberg.  His sole idea was creating a bullying/hate/perving web site with his classmate's faces on it.  He apparently even stole the photo content.  It caught on for other reasons, namely students contacting other students.  

Even after going public he was considered a joke of a CEO.  But once the Wall Street money took control of it, Facebook started selling ad space, something Zuckerberg had always said wasn't in the plans.  

Yet now Zuckerberg is hailed as a genius and hero. For what?  He was crooked and lucky, succeeding against his own instincts.  He's worth billions, so now whatever he says must be brilliant.You're just speculating right?  Because the metric of how many warranties sold would still be accurate. 

And margin would be much higher on the same COGS, so the company would (and should) have no problem with that.  Around here they also write up the sale as a package SKU, so that the consumer can't return any portion of it.
Just because you haven't doesn't mean anything. You want people to suffer needlessly? Nice.  

As for "you want to see the cost of postage quadruple" indicates you don't understand money.

"No way that Canada Post can afford to deliver mail" - uh, they've been doing so profitably for many years.  Do some research, don't be brainwashed by lies of Stephen Harper and his hand picked propaganda team.Uh, each piece of mail has this, it's called postage.
If Canada decides to be a first world country, you might get it.Speaking from the perspective of someone losing home delivery to a badly implemented "super" mailbox, this job-killing transition is stupid and cruel.  And the "savings" are fake.  

Instead of having one person - the carrier - efficiently delivering mail to thousands of people, you have thousands of people wasting their time and fuel.  Every day.    

Instead of receiving packages quickly and efficiently, you receive a card that forces you to go visit a shitty private sector business (like a 7-11 or a Loblaws Shoppers Drug Mart).  You have to find parking in their cramped private sector lot, walk through their jacked up goods, line up and wait for their underpaid, undertrained, demotivated staff member, and wait 5-30 minutes while all your neighbors in line do the same thing.  And that's if you're lucky and the private sector worker is even at their post, and not off doing other things.  

This whole project is a scam for driving more business to Stephen Harper's corporate buddies' storefronts.  It's based on lies about costs and seniors supposedly begging to lose a valubale service.  And redditors are the useful idiots unwittingly promoting it on Harper's behalf, misguidedly thinking they are blessing some kind of technology god. 

If there were any truth to the cost argument (there isn't, but let's pretend) then they could have simply gone to 4 day/week delivery.  They didnt do that because that was never the real motive.  Killing jobs and more corporate pork-barrelling were the motives.

Oh good, soo the 5 feet around it are clear.  That just leaves the other 500 feet to get there. 
You truly don't get it.The whole fallacy is where you said "You would have made more by not selling the warranty at all."  No, because you wouldn't have made the sale at all.  

Also, the warranty sales are more like a pure commission revenue to the company. They don't have to carry an inventory of $100 warranty plans, stock it shelve it.  They can't be shoplifted, damaged in shipping, or erode in value as they age.  They simply get $30 (or whatever) from the underwriter.  And the more they sell, the more they get because those deals are typically performance based and incentivized.

As for salesperson being fired for it, that appears to be a myth.  I've personally experienced scores or perhaps 100 of these.  The salespeople aren't fired for it. they're celebrated.  

Maybe it's one of those things they have in their visible policy, but never actually follow.  Like price matching.
What other False CPC propaganda have you fallen for?
  
But if you were to suddenly learn that everything you've assumed about Canada Post is False,  and that Canada Post actually is profitable, would you reverse your opinion? The decision to kill home delivery was made during Harper's majority, by the CPC's corporate plant CEO.  It's False business sense.  Home delivery overall isn't going down, it's rising in volume, weight, and revenue.  Have you not heard of online shopping? 
Well I guess your one anecdote of a guy fired for an unknown reason trumps my scores of actual transactions and numerous employees who are promoting and who actively do these deals.  And let's sweep aside the fact that I've had to correct you on a few of the financial aspects.
You can't legally (or practically) follow a car or boat because you'd be out of range in seconds.  And the land rush right now is to have a UAV of *any* kind, not over performance differences in niche application.  

They have a remote controlled plane (not new) that can hover (not new)  I'm not saying that's bad, but is it worth the infinity valuation?
If you need to believe your anecdote trumps basic accounting and math, and that one anecdote invalidates mountains of evidence, then go ahead.  From the beginning, you showed you don't even understand the fundamental way those warranty plans work when you seemed to think they were a $100 piece of physical inventory. 

Halfahalfling: "Packages still get dropped off in the form of a door hanger"

Surely even you can see the pure nonsense of claiming that dropping off a door hanger is the same as dropping off a package.  Can your employer pay you with a photo of money instead of actual money?  Can you eat a picture of food, or do you prefer actual food?
 

.... turning a useful service into garbage, and forcing innocent citizens to have to inefficiently travel to a Conservative-friendly corporate outlet to waste time and money.  

Before the job-killing: A Canadian with a half decent job would had the package to me with a pleasant greeting.  

If you prefer being a corporate cog and killing good jobs, why not cowboy up and admit that's your agenda?
Canada Post's new job-killing slogan: "go pick it up your own God damn self"  

The Conservative Party's apologist's new slogan: "I know you used words but I have no idea what they mean"


Oh no, now you're doubling down on not understanding how warranty packages are underwritten.  The liability is with the plan carrier, not the distributor.  No wonder you're so confused about the mechanics of the business.

You are right that this site can give a voice to a best buy salesman to give incorrect information, get caught. then later claim he did it deliberately to "simplify", when an already more simple and factual explanation was already provided.

Tell you what, if I supply receipt evidence, you pay the invoice total.  Fair?  It's an easy way to put your money where your mouth is.  and while it might cost you some money today, it could be a more valuable education to you than your accounting class.

You're unwittingly working on behalf of CPC's planted Canada Post CEO shill.  And saying "period" doesn't change facts or data.
Oh boy, yet another reposting of the "speed kills your pocketbook" conspiracy video with a crazily sensationalized title.  


If only there was a simple way to avoid speeding tickets, like driving within the law or something equally easy.
This is probably wildly unrealistic on my part, but I'm going to give you the benefit of the doubt that much of your stance is the result of being brainwashed by conservative bullshit, and that there's still a chance that if you were to learn the facts, your opinion might change.   

In that spirit then I'd encourage you to resist the stereotype that "postal services are all bad and inefficient m'kay" and do some actual research.  [Here's one place to get you started.](http://thetyee.ca/Opinion/2014/02/05/Ten-Myths-about-Canada-Post-Cuts/)Someone driving a boat and their chase UAV at the same time is a "huge use case"?  In what universe?    Anyone with the money to be running their own James Bond fantasy camp isn't going to be that motivated about saving a few bucks on a toy drone.

Valuation is a technical metric, it's based on numbers, not subjective feelings about the feature set.
The carrier bears the liability, and they pay the distributor an acquisition fee.  Claimants, including Best Buy, can be reimbursed from the carrier's reserve and claim funds as required.  It's OK if you didnt know that.  

The offer stands.  I produce a case, and further, I prove the salesperson wasnt fired, you pay the receipt total.  Easy and the cost to you will pay back in spades for ita educational value.

Not really sure what your f-word laced comments about google finding you in 20 seconds are about?  Conspiracy theory?  

As for your disingenuous claim that you admit to being wrong and "I'm out", it would be slightly more honest if you'd done that *instead* of posting a text wall rant in the same post.  
Yes, but I drove legally and safely, so I didn't get any tickets.  My vehicles all have accurate speedometers, so there was no reason to get any "10 over" speeding tickets... in any city, across many states and provinces.  Speeders seem to think breaking the law is their duty.  I'd rather drive legally, safely, in control.  I like not wasting fuel or selfishly risking lives. I like being able to avoid road hazards and over-confident speeding drivers.  I like having the lowet insurance premiums and having collision free vehicles.  
Lol, every study on "ticket buster" web sites maybe.  In the real world, speed is a factor in a majority of collisions. Also obvious physics is obvious.  

Even when there's other factors, lower speed means better outcomes.  Trucker dumps lumber on the road?  I avoid it because I'm traveling at a legal speed.  Speeder runs over it because "Canada is big".  Road is icy?  I control my vehicle at a lower speed, speeder slides into the ditch.  Deer jumps out on the road, I brake and hit it slightly, denting a fender.  Speeder obliterates it, sending animal parts into the passenger compartment.  

The advantage of speeding: none.  Unless you count being at the next stop a few seconds sooner than me an "advantage".

First world countries have postal services.
They haven't killed the postal carrier jobs in your neighborhood yet, it's coming if Harper's CEO appointee gets his way.
Every time a fanatic posts this conspiracy video I think to myself, maybe this will be the time that an intelligent person will come and make a coherent argument in favor of speeding.  

Maybe they know something new or clever that all of science has thus far missed.  


Maybe they'll argue the civil liberty issues, or make the case about whether roboticizing law enforcement is constitutional.  

Or maybe they'll even admit that speeding isn't actually safer, but they'll approach it from the relativist angle, saying that they don't care that much if speeding hurts or kills more people, because they feel that's an acceptable price to pay for faster traveling speeds and thrill-seeking.  Maybe they'll say they realize bottlenecks in the road system bring drivers of all speeds to equivalence every few miles, but they prefer the rush of going faster in between choke points; that they want to push performance and excitement levels, and they don't care that much about the safety aspect, the liabilities, the risks, or the costs.  

Obviously the day that someone like that will appear and make those truthful and insightful arguments has not been today, and it may never happen.  

In the meantime, we'll continue to hear that law abiding drivers traveling at relatively high speeds are "road blocks", and that energy isn't relative to the square of velocity, and that every guy on the internet possesses Formula 1 driver level skill and reaction times, with vehicles, roads, equipment, weather and conditions that are never anything less than absolutely perfect.

In my experience, where speed camera are posted, drivers magically slow down.  It shows they are capable of doing the speed limit when it matters.Google the name Deepak Chopra, sort out which one is the Harper toadie, learn about him, and then review your incorrect suggestion that the influence of Harper's regime is gone.
You make a good argument for expanded speed enforcement.
I support your idea of  harsher punishments including vehicle seizure for speeding.
You're the one who brought up all the anti-cop propaganda.10-20 over isn't the actual flow of traffic, it's the speeder's perceived scenario, not backed by actual statistics.   And let me guess, with the harder driving exams, you'll still pass, right?  I know I will.  And so will every person reading this and every person you ask.  Everyone thinks they are elite super-skilled drivers - despite the statistical impossibility of that.

In plain English: if you're bombing along at 110 in a 90 zone, YOU are the illegal road hazard.

And did it ever occur to you that actual trained roadway engineers - (not the Reddit Speedboys Club) may already have considered the risk factor that's there's a few scofflaws like you around when they set the speeds? 

There aren't **many** "speeding is safe" studies, but that's because more credible peers would pummel them.  There's a handful that are regurgitated over and over by young and overconfident speeders who won't accept facts, physics, medicine, statistics, or common sense.  

And if you selfishly, unnecessarily, and persistently endanger others like that, you deserve a stiff penalty including mandatory driving classes in which passing requires you to prove you (finally) understand important safety concepts like reaction distance and stopping distance.


Other than being at the stop light a few seconds before me, what are the top 5 or 6 "benefits" you see in illegal speeding?
I have zero to do with a postal union, other than having the common sense to know that the last thing the Canadian economy needs is more good jobs being mass exterminated.  

If you have no problem driving somewhere to pick up your mail and letters every day, I fully support your choice.  You can easily request your sole mail delivery be killed if you want.  I won't try to stop you, or infringe your freedom.  But what's curious is that those in the "kill the letter carriers" camp won't reciprocate that level of basic human decency and respect. They won't be happy unless other innocent people suffer the loss of an important service.  That blows my mind how that goes beyond pure selfishness to full-on maliciousness.  

If you want to waste an hour going to Sobey's for your mail go right ahead.  But please don't force me to. 

And don't force a person with MS to.  Or a home maker.  Or a senior. Or someone that works from home.  Or a babysitter.  Or someone that's injured.  Or agoraphobic. Or busy.  Or doesn't have a car.  Or has an infirm dependent.  Or is waiting for the plumber to arrive. Or is just a normal Canadian who doesn't want to turn a 1 second mailbox check into a 3600 second exercise in frustration visiting a shitty corporate drop center. Or a taxpayer who would rather see postal workers paid to do something useful, rather than paid to suck up EI and welfare.

"Setting an arbitrary low speed" = fallacy upon which the rest falls apart.

Saying that high speed collisions aren't "hurting anyone" is exceptionally obtuse, especially to the police officers and EMS personnel who attend to the victims and remains, and to the loved ones who suffer.  

Even slight speed increases mean much longer reaction distances and stopping distances.  Extra speed can mean a miss becomes a hit, a bump becomes a major collision, a bruise becomes a debilitating injury, and an injury becomes a death. 

Vehicles are deadly even at legal speeds.  Those who use folklore logic to promote even more death and injury are really not valuing human life very much. 

But what's your argument in favor of speeding?  That it lets you arrive a few seconds sooner? Big deal.
It may have crossed his mind.  But the contestants and the room were really hammering the "all sharks" idea, so he might have realized that might not look good.
What's wrong with parcel mail going up?  Have letter carriers deliver parcels just like the always have. More parcels is a reason to enhance Canada Post, not kill it.  More parcels is an opportunity to build on their already high efficiency, not a reason to systematically destroy efficiency.If you haven't noticed, the majority of drivers do stay near the posted limits, especially after they've been nailed for speeding.  I do question your math and physics perceptive abilities if you don't understand how higher velocities mean much longer reaction and stopping distances, and how higher impact energies mean much more injuries, fatalities, and property damage.
  
I will note that you've again failed to convey any actual advantage of illegal speeding.  I still catch up to you at the next intersection, the next rail crossing, the next cloverleaf, the next town, the next time you see a cop and panic break and skid mark your pants.  Then I pass you at the gas station when you're refilling and I still have fuel.
Oh, but when you made those False characterizations of my opinion I thought that's what we were doing.  You're right though, the speed limits shouldn't be raised.
You can continue to deny science, medicine, facts, and physics if you like.  The pro-speeding viewpoint requires that.
More nonsense.  "Scaling down" is anti-efficient, and Canada Post has been continuously profitable for decades.  Oops, don't let facts get in the way of your "smoking hole" myth.
Yes this could cut into the dozens of times that the average American rents a helicopter and film crew to film their lengthy beachfront coastline every yer.
If that's True, I have a secret way to give 